1
AUTHORSHIP,
A TALE.
BY A NEW ENGLANDER OVER-SEA.
CHAPTER I.
YANKEE IN WESTMINSTER-ABBEY: FAITHFUL ACCOUNT OF THE
WONDERS
THERE... ADVENTURE.
I must
be allowed to tell my story in my own way; and
though I speak in the first person, I hope to have it attributed
to the true causea desire to be understood.
I left America and went to England, not to see
Westminster-Abbey
,
nor any other `part of the British-Constitution,'
whatever the Quarterly-Review may suppose,1 but in the
hope of seeing much there, that I hope never to see in
America
,
much that I do hope to see here, and much that I should
have looked upon, wherever I might see it, with more joy
and a deeper emotion I dare say, than I ever yet felt or ever
shall feel at the sight of abbeys and cathedrals, churches and
castles, green with age though they be, rocking to the
northern
blast, or very dark with the shadows of centuries. Not
that I did not go up to Westminster-Abbeythe Sepulchre
of Kingswith a sort of awe, which, republican though I was,
I could not well get the better of: nor do I mean to say
that I ever was, or that I ever hope to be, so reasonable as
to find just what your over-reasonable creature1 would look
forand no morein the ruins of such a placethe wreck
of what in the day of its power was only the strong-hold of
Superstition, or a part of the huge outworks of Tyranny.
But if I
had
perceived the truth; if I had gone back to that
age, when the very foundations of military and religious
power
were laid in Europe, where would have been the evil,
where the mischief I pray you, of that awe which I suffered to
creep over me like the penumbra of a great eclipse happening
at noon-day in the depth of summer? Why may not the strong
holds of Superstition or the outworks of Tyranny (if
dilapidated
)
be worth a voyage over sea, to the poet or the dreamer,
to the artist or the philosopher, to the man or the statesman?
People may say what they please; but though I was not boy
enough to go a thousand leagues, nor boy enough to talk as if I
thought it worth while for another to go so far, merely to
get a peep at Westminster-Abbeyto say nothing of
Magna-Charta
and the House-of-Lordsstill, when I had arrived
there, I could not overlook what I saw before me, nor
outrage
the spirit of the place by considering what must have
been the substance of that power, the very type and shadow of
which six hundred years after the glory had departed from
it, was awful to the heart, and oppressive to the mind of
man. Nor was I fool enough either to put off my shoes, or
to say that I felt as if I should put them off, or as if it were
sacrilege to walk otherwise than barefooted, when I drew
near the arched door-waythe holy spot, where you pay
sixpence to a man with a stick, for leave to run by the poet's
cornera marble congress of `Gods and Godlike men,'
whose mighty ashes after all, are
not
in Westminster-Abbey,
but somewhere in the depths of the sea, or in the far parts
of the earth. But still, though I was not blockhead enough
either to behave or to talk as it would appear to be the
fashion
for the people who have strayed away from the woods
and waters of America to behave and talk, when they have
got fairly ashore in the heart of Westminster-Abbey
especially
if they were landed at the custom-house, or shipped
to the care of S. W. or B. B. & Co.I could not laugh at
every thing I saw, though much of it was very laughable;
nor could I philosophize over the origin of what was before
me, and about me, and above me, till I forgot where I was,
and had no pleasure in what I saw; nor behold without
emotion
the barbarous beauty that overshadowed meso superior
to the classical beauty that other men love to talk about, or
the savage pomp that uprose on every side of me, as with a
spring, and over-arched my way, and shut in my view
whithersoever
I went, like ano,
not
like a spider-net sky of
solid stone, nor a carved or fretted sky, nor a firmament of
tracery
,
but very much like a roof built of oak timber, wrought
with the chisel and hewed with the axe of mortal man.
Others may be able to see moreespecially if they go to
the Abbey when it is getting dark; others have been able
to see more I confess, for their money. But as I live, though
I paid my sixpence at the door, and my eighteen-pence
after I got into the church, and although I took off my hat,
and particularly desired to see every thingI did not see a
fortieth part of what I expected to see, after reading the
Sketch-Book and the Quarterly-Review. I saw no huge
canopy of interlacing tree-tops, like the inside of a vaulted
wilderness. I saw little or nothing to remind me of the
great woods of North-America. I saw no sceptred
shadows
gliding hither and thither among the pillars and tombs;
no crowned nor headless apparitions parading slowly in the
`dim religious light'; no heavy-armed spectres either on
horse-back or afoot, watching over their buried households,
or keeping guard night and day, in this, the marble city of
the dead; neither Gog nor Magognor any other part
of the British-Constitution. But if I saw nothing of this, I
saw much that would appear to have escaped the
observation
of other people. I saw antiquity refreshed before my
face. I saw a live man at work renewing a part of
Henry
the Seventh's chapel,1 re-carving the imperishable
beauty
thereof at so much a-day, covering up the signs of old
age, and rebuilding with sacrilegious new stone, the very
parts which, if antiquity were so awful as men say, he
would have been afraid to touch; the very parts indeed which
wore the most of that very look, and were the fullest of that
very virtue, which they would have you believe it were worth
going three thousand miles to seethe look of old age,
the virtue of antiquity.
I saw too a crowd of people, with their hands in their
pockets, running about after a guide, all bare-headed and most
of them with lips blue and teeth chatteringperhaps with awe
perhaps with cold. I saw moreover a marble countess
on her way up to a marble sky2with a chair of state
placed for her in the clouds, and a marble cherub, who
occupied
another chair, waiting for her to arrive. I saw men of a
warlike shape armed cap-a-pie, with wigs on. I saw the
figure of death, a skeleton such as we see in our
picture-books
,
or in our sleep when we are naughty, issuing out of
a marble safe with iron doors and aiming a sort of spear at a
marble woman, which a marble man was upholding, if I do
not mistake, with his right arm in the air.3 I saw a party of
1*
sober people, who had come to the show and paid their
sixpences
a little too late, galloping after the guide, just near
enough to be always a little too late for whatever he had to
say; so that while he was describing the achievements of
Edward the Black-Prince, they were looking at Queen
Elizabeth
;
and all the notice he took of them was to order their
hats off, `by order of the Dean,' though we were shivering
with cold, and they hot with exercise. I saw tooand
you may judge of the fear that oppressed me, you that have
seen live kings, and live heroes with your own eyesa troop
of royal personages in a glass case, all standing in a row, and all
made of wax, and rigged out in all the finery of the stage (the
stage of Bartl'my Fair too), and a figure of Lord Nelson, also
made of wax, in a part of the very clothes he wore at
Trafalgar
clothes
which were evidently made for somebody
else. Think of thata group of waxen imageswax
heroes
and kings fairly set up for show in the habiliments of the
toy-shop among the sepulchres and solitudes of
Westminster-Abbey
!
Who would not have come over the waters for
a peep at such a spectacle in such a place? and who
would not, if such a thing were told of the barbarians of the
South-Sea, or of the Dutch, who would not speak of it as
altogether characteristic of their barbarous condition, or
deplorable
want of taste?
But while I was there, keeping rather aloof, as my habit is
when I desire to enjoy what I see, musing over the biography
of the dead who were about me, loitering on the way,
and wondering why it was that I had no such sorrowful
thoughtsno such beautiful faith as Addison had, or as
Irving had, while they were in the heart of
Westminster-Abbey
,
or as I myself might have had a few years before,
when that which I believe to be the common-sense of my
nature now, was nothing but poetrypure poetryI found
myself so far behind the rest of the company, that I could
only hear their footsteps every minute or two as they hurried
away from chapel to chapel, after the voice of their guide.
Being in no hurry either to get away or to overtake the
others, I walked into a niche, where stood many altars like
tombs, and gave myself up to the luxury of meditation. It
was indeed a luxury, though not of the graver sort; for I
was just asking myself, I remember, what would be thought
of the age of Elizabeth now (Not
her
age, but the age of her
people), if the rude statuary that I saw before me,
covered
with paint, with filigree-work, and with gold leaf, were
dug up out of the earth by a strange people, otherwise
ignorant
of that age. There was the statue of Elizabeth
herself
the
carved image of power. It would have passed
for a bit of Mexican sculpture, if it had been dug up in that
part of the world. But before I could satisfy myself on this
head, or shake off the deep thoughtfulness which had
begun
to steal over me like the shadow of another world, in
spite of the provoking absurdities that lay heaped up on every
side of my path, my attention was called off by the sound
of approaching footstepsfootsteps that followed mine afar
off, stopping where I stopped, and loitering where I
loitered
a few minutes before. Ah! said I to myself, here
is another of our tribe I dare say, who comes hither to
indulge as I do, apart and away from the rest of the world;
or to mock at the deep-seated prejudice of our day that
sanctifies every part of a pile, no part of which is what
men believe it to be; or mayhap to wander as I do in the
everlasting
twilight here, and brave the awful spirit of the place
the overshadowing spirit of gone-by ages, the mystery and the
pomp of the sepulchre of kings; or he may have come up
hither to write poetry, to breathe an over-peopled
atmosphere
,
to undergo a sort of transfigurationto find material
for a job; in which case, it may be the delightful author of
the Sketch-Book himself, or it may be some other shrewd
speculator from over sea, who goes about the world very
much as I go about the Abbey just now, with a desire to
see and not be seen. If so, what a capital joke to turn the
tables upon him, to beat the spy at his own game, to
I was interrupted. Two persons appeared coming toward
me with a very slow step, a man and a woman. The step
of the two was like the step of one. He appeared to
be lost in thought; for his hat was on his head, contrary
to the law of the church, and pulled over his eyes; and
she was leaning with all her weight upon his arm, both
her hands locked over it, and her face upturned to his, in
that indescribable way which every body knows to be
peculiar
to a doting wife at a particular period of her love. They
passed me while I was debating with myself whether I should
move on, or make a noise to let them perceive that if they
spoke above a whisper, they would be overheard (for walls
have ears, at such a time), or whether I should remain where
I was, without moving or breathing till they were safesafe
I sayfor though neither of them spoke, I knew by the step
and by the whole manner of the female that she had come to
the Abbey for other purposes than to see the Abbey, and I
could not bear the idea of giving pain to a creature who leant
so lovingly upon the arm of any man, as she did upon his.
You may smile; but I assure you that I would not have had
her see me for the world; and that although it was getting
rather dark, and I could not see much of her face, and they
were in sight for hardly a minute; before they had gone by,
I felt assured, perfectly assured of three things reader which
I dare say will surprise you. I felt assured that she loved
himthat she was a wifeand that probably
he
was not
her husband.
Reader, you are shocked. I am sorry for it, especially if
you are ano, if you are a woman, I am
not
sorry for it;
I am glad of it (for in that feeling is our safety), although I
had no desire to shock you. I was merely describing what
I saw and felt at the time I speak of. But how could I
know that he was not her brother?
How
I knew it I cannot
saybut I did know it, as well as you know the step or the
carriage of one man from the step or the carriage of another.
How do you know this? You do know it, and so does every
body; but who is there able to say how he knows it? No
woman ever looked up into the face of a brother as this
woman did into the face of the man I saw. Well, but how
could I be sure that she was not a widownor a maid
nor his own wifenor his child? I do not know, I say
againbut still I was quite sure. A widow may be known
by her step, her look, her most guarded speech, nay by her
very mode of sitting on a chair. It requires no great
experience
to detect a widow, or a married woman, or a woman
who ought to be married. You do not believe this, I dare
say. If you do not, allow me to ask you one question. Do
you not feel pretty sure, without knowing why, when you see
a strangerpretty sure that he is, or is not a married
man? Staythat is awkwardly expressedwhat I meant
to ask you was, whether you do not feel pretty sure that such
and such persons, although you may know very little of them,
are
not
married? and that others, of whom you know as little,
are
married?pretty sure, though you have never been told
and have no reason to believe, except from their general
behaviour
,
that these are married, or those unmarried? Look
about you, if you would have more proof, and fix your
thoughts upon some individual, who
may
be married for
aught you know, but whom you have always regarded, you
know not why, as unmarried. Are you prepared? Have
you some such individual in your eye? If solet me ask
you how you would behave, were you told by a trustworthy
person, that, after all, he was a married manafter all! Would
you not be astonished? Of course you would, and that proves
what I wish to provenamely, that there is a look, a manner,
a something about the behaviour of the married, which serves
to distinguish them every where from the unmarried. If you
believe this (And if you are twenty years of age, without
believing
it, there is no hope for you), you may conceive it
possible
for a keen observer to know by the carriage, yea by the
very step of a woman, whether she is a maid, a wife, or a
widow.
But how could I be sure that she was not
his
wife? I was
not surenot perfectly sure, I confess; for though she hung
upon his arm as if she were a newly-made wife (Not like the
unvisited maiden, for
she
never betrays her love in that way),
she appeared strangely shy and anxious, and kept away from
the more frequented parts of the church, and avoided the light,
and stole through the shadow with a slow step; not like the
newly married when they are with their lawful partners; but
like one that has little to be proud of, or much to fear.
Well, they passed by me and left me, and laughable as it
may appear, I cannot help saying that I felt unhappy when I
could no longer distinguish her step. My heart was heavy
with inquietudewith a sort of sorrow for the woman. I
felt as if I knew heras if she were in great peril, and as
if I, with power to help, had forsaken heras if I should
never see her againas if we had parted for everas if, to
say all in a word, as if she was the very woman that I could love
with all my heart and with all my strength, and as if I would
give the world (my share of it, I mean) to be so loved by her
as that man was. Readerbear with me; what I tell you
is the simple truth, and I wish to preserve the recollection of
what happened to me on my first visit to Westminster-Abbey.
It may encourage others to tell the truth, after they have
been there. It may serve to show that even there, unholy
thoughts may intrude.
Let me pursue my story. I waited a full half-hour I
suppose
after they had gone, before I completed the tour of the
church; I lingered and lingered with a feeling which I
cannot
describe, though it was much like what used to be called
the home-sickness when I was a boy; and I should have
staid, I know not how long, if the man with a stick had not
come up to me as if I had no business there, and told me
with a bow, that all the rest of the company had been gone
for at least an hour. So I followed him off; but just as I came
to the place where they receive the money, I heard a quick
breathing and a step that startled me. I looked upthe
woman herself was before me, the woman that I was already
in love with (I am quite serious), although I had never seen
her face, nor heard her speak; in love with her merely
because
I saw that with a superb figure and the walk of a
Spanish woman, she knew how to love. She wore a thick
veil, but she turned her face toward me as if she knew me,
and caught by her companion's arm with a sort of
convulsive
hurry, and waited my approach as if she thought I was
going to speak to her. But I had no such ideaI was only
anxious to get by, so as to relieve her from the visible dread
she was in. We were close to the door, and I observed that
instead of turning to look at me as she did, the man drew
up, as if collecting himself, and put his hand upon hers
with a strong, though gentle pressure, as it lay upon his arm,
and then as I made my bow and passed out of the door, he
turned slowly toward me, so that I had full view of his face.
I never shall forget his look. He was a pale grave man, with
a steady eye, which awed me in spite of myself as I darted
away. He looked me through and through, and I felt I
assure you, not as if I had caught him, but as if he had
caught mewith another man's wife.
1 The Quarterly-Review has declared Westminster-Abbey to be a
part of
the British-Constitution;
and supposes that Americans go abroad chiefly
to see that and other similar passages of what never existedthe British
Constitution.
1 Such as the Utilitarians of the celebrated Westminster-Review.
1 They have been re-building, or rather re-carving and restoring the
celebrated
chapel of Henry the Seventh.
2 These are facts;the statuary of Westminster-Abbey, the wax-work,
and the monuments are just what I have described.
3 The renowned group, to which out amiable countryman, the author of
the Sketch-Book, and all the London guides, refer with unspeakable
enthusiasm
.
It was by Roubilliac.
CHAPTER II.
ISLE-OF-WIGHT... PORTSMOUTH... ENGLISH INNS: WONDERS OF
THE ISLE.
Month
after month passed away, year after year, and
though I went much into public in the hope of seeing
somebody
with or without a veil to remind me of her that I saw
in the shadowy depth of Westminster-Abbey, and for full
three years never entered a theatre, a ball-room, nor a church,
nor any other place where the beautiful and high-bred
congregate
for show, without recalling her proud step and
haughty carriage at the door, the trepidation that she
betrayed
when she saw me approach, although she stood up like
another Cleopatra to receive me,1 and her loving affectionate
waythe deep humility of her manner, so long as she thought
herself unobserved: for three whole years! and in all that time,
I had met with nobody to remind me of herno shape like
hersno tread like hersno love like hersnothing to make
my heart leap and thrill as it did when she passed by me
without seeing me, though I stood near enough to lay my
hand upon hers without stretching forth my arm.
At last, after I had given up all thought of ever seeing her
againall hope I should say, for it
was
hope, and a hope that
I could not bear to part with, even while I knew that I was
behaving more like a great green boy, or a youthful poet crazy
with such love as they retail in the toy-shops and
circulating-libraries
,
than like what I wasa man of the worlda
circumstance
brought us together.
2
I had long been wishing to see the Isle-of-Wight; and by
the merest accident in the world I found myself there in the
beautiful autumn of eighteen hundred and twenty .
Such weather I had never seen before out of America. It
was the very counterpart of our Indian-summer, that we brag
so much of. I do not know what other men may feel, but
I
feel in the rich drowsy atmosphere of that particular season
very much as if I could make love to any body or any thing
that fell in my way. To breathe was a luxury. To tread the
green turf, to walk under the great beech-trees that
overshadowed
my path, to look up at the sky and out upon the
sea, from every side of the Garden of England, as they
call it therea miniature picture of England,
I
should call
itwas to be happy, to be charitable, and to be at peace with
all the worldauthors excepted. For about a week we had
had a regular alternation of good weather and bad weather
first a rainy day and then a fair day. Of course therefore
we were trebly happy when a fair day
did
arrive; and at
every change from fair to foul, we had so little to hope for
the morrow, that if the morrow turned out fair, it was enough
to make a fellow jump for joy. Every clear sunshiny day
was a miracle, after a day of white fog and heavy rain, such
as we had had every other twenty-four hours for a whole week;
and every body knows or should know that miracles do not
last for ever.
I had gone to bed with a secret fear that my trip
was all over, that I had come rather too late in the season
for such a tour as other people talked of, and that the next
day could not by any possibility be fairthe chances were a
million to one; for the day before had been a beautiful day,
and the day but one before that, and the day but one before
that; every
other
day for a week, while every intervening
day was badvery badmuch too bad for the travellers of
our age. Of course therefore, when I packed off to bed,
though I desired to be called at six on the morrowif it
should happen to be clearI had no great hope for the
morrow
.
But lo! on the morrow, when I awoke  I do
not say when they woke me, for they never do such things
in the Isle-of-Wight, nor on the way to the Isle-of-Wight, I
am sure. If you behave well, they do not like to part with
you, however much you may desire to part with them.
Nothing can persuade them to disturb your sleepthey are
too civil for thatand though you were to bribe all the
chamber-maids
,
all the boots, and all the porters between the
Pavilion
Hotel at Brighton and the Bugle-Inn at Newport, or the
Sand-Rock Hotel (Of which a word or two more by and by),
you would have to wake yourself in the morning at a guess,
or lie half a day on the watch, afraid one hour of
oversleeping
yourself, and the next, of being up too early for the waiters
and chamber-maids, or the coach, or the boot-black. What
a parenthesis  However, when I awoke, the whole
sky was bright with sunshine, the new air alive with it. I
never saw a finer day.
So I set off on my pilgrimage from Ryde,1 after running
down to the pier for the fourth time, to look at the Portsmouth
shore as it lay glittering afar off through the thin haze and
over the smooth beautifully-shadowed sea, like a sort of
arial panorama.Stop, readerI must try to give you a
notion
of Portsmouth as it appeared to me at the time I speak
of, whether you have or have not stood upon the pier at
Ryde, while the waters were spread before you like a sheet
of changeable satinchangeable with shadow and light and
with every hue between the deep yellow of the shore and
the deep strange blue of the seaI mustI must
whatever
may become of my story, my heroine, or myself. Two
or three nights before, I had been struck with the amazing
beauty of a sunset, which I saw from the Portsmouth sideit
was like the sunsets of North American; not so brilliant
however
,
nor dyed with such exalted and fervent hues, but
like
them in the stillness of their beauty, when to look at them is
enough to bring the water into your eyes and to make your
heart run overespecially if there is a woman at your
side. I grew melancholy, and I thought how very little we
know of each other in this world, nations of nations,
neighbours of neighbours, brothers of brothers. On
every
side of me was the proof; on every side of me
beauty
and power that were considered peculiar to America;
a real Indian-summerthat Sabbath of the whole year; a
superb sunset, and huge trees overloaded with foliage that
appeared
like a sort of gorgeous blazonry. Their colors were
not so vivid as we have them in America, nor so various, nor
did they overhang all the mountain-sides, and all the rocks, and
every foot of the earth as far as the eye could reach, with a
sort of ponderous and fluctuating shadow; but they had a
beauty of their own, a beauty that we never see in the
New-World
,
a sort of pomp which is not the pomp of the
wilderness
,
and a sort of wealth which is not the wealth of our
everlasting
woods, but graver and quieter. They swell up to
the eye, cloud over cloud, with colors that we love to see
in a picture. Not so with our savage North-American
landscapes
they
would startle and scare you if they were
painted
with fidelity. If you had gathered your ideas of nature
from Claude or Poussin or Hobbima, or Both, or Ruysdl,
or from any body that ever painted a landscape in Europe,
you would never be able to endure the truth in a landscape
of North-America. The bright blue, the deep fiery crimson,
the scarlet and gold, the orange and purple, the innumerable
shades of brown would appear unworthy of a picture. You
would feel as men who have been brought up to the stage do,
when they see the terrible passions at work off the stage
you would swear that Nature herself was unnatural.
So much for the sunset which I had seen two or three nights
before; but nothing that I saw then, though it was all that I
have described it to be, could equal the view that I had now
of the Portsmouth shore off Gosport, of the shipping, of the
military works, and of the far blue sea with a fleet riding
slowly over the dim barrier which hardly separated it from
the far blue skylaunching away, ship after ship into the
unfathomable air, as if they knew, like the huge birds of
South-America
when they float over the top of the Andes
into
the
skywith all their mighty wings outspread, that there was no
power in heaven or earth able to wreck them, or shatter them,
or disturb them on their way. It was a picture to be
remembered
for lifeto be carried away on the heart, as if the
colors
were burnt there, and the moveable beauty of a camera
obscura had been shut up for another day, or melted into the
material and fixed there for ever and ever.
The broad-striped waters were like a smooth satin, glossy
with light, and rippling with a low soft air that stole over the
green surface like a shadow. You could see it move. They
were green tooof a beautiful positive green, such as I never
saw any where else; no doubt owing to the mixture of a
sober yellowish dye produced by the sands near the shore
with the cold blue of the oceana blue that appeared as
black as midnight, where the waters were very deep. On
every side of me were happy facesgrown-up children
wading about on the shore, and looking as if they had never
heard the name of sorrow, as if to them life were but one
long holyday; barges and wherries dipping to the swell;
great ships at anchor with their sides turned up to the air as
2*
if they had been cast away in the very middle of the great
deep; and others afar off towering into the sky like prodigies,
or floating up and fading away, like so many superb creatures
of the air, each abroad on some great particular errand of its
own.
The night before there had been a gale, which prepared
the way for what I saw now. I stood on the pier and saw
it approachthe breeze sounding over the deep, the mist
rolling toward me like a heavy white smoke, the tide moving
with a steady roar, which grew louder and louder as it
heaved
and weltered underneath our feet; and the Portsmouth
shore, while it seemed very high and very far off, breaking
through the mist with an effect such as I never saw before,
either in life or in poetry, either in pictures or in sleep. The
sky was cloudyit was even darkthere was nothing above
able to produce what I saw, nothing of brightness in that part
of the above which I could see; and yet the high lands of
the opposite shore, lands that were neither high nor
picturesque
when the wind was another way, were gleaming with
a sort of mysterious beauty, such as you may conceive would
be the character of a fine painting, if it were covered with a
grey gauze and lighted up from within. It was what I should
call, if I were not afraid of being charged with affectation,
a
sketch
by the Deity, a shadow of the landscapes that we
are to see hereafter; so faint, so ethereal was it, so unlike the
landscapes of our earth.
After looking at what I have tried to describe, and feeling
what I
have
described, I turned away from the multitude who
were enjoying it with me, and was about leaving the pier,
when I saw a crowd of people pressing up over the end of it
in such numbers that I stopped to look at them. It
appeared
as if they were coming up out of the sea, shoal after shoal,
or as if they had found a highway under the waters, a sort of
tunnel, such as they are to have under the bed of the Thames.
A three-year-old habit is not so easily thrown off as the
reader may imagine. I felt this, for before I well knew what
I was about, I found myself occupied once more in
watching
every woman that passed me, while I stood on the top of
the broad green slippery stairs, at the bottom of which a
steam-boat and half a score of little galloping wherries were
discharging their live-stock. Off guard, if you please,
reader
.
I am laying no trap for you, though I am sure you
expect one. You are already more than half prepared
for a surprise, on the score of that heroine I told you
of. You foresee that I am going to find her at last among
the people of the steam-boat. No such thing, reader; I shall
do no such thing. Ah but, Mr. Author, a trap's a trap, and
you may as well catch us one way as another. You did
mean to bait for a serious, or mayhap for a pathetic interview;
but just when you had got to the pinch, either your heart
failed
you, or you took it into your head that if you had been at
all anticipated by the reader it would be a capital joke to
disappoint
him. So
that
for your catastrophe,snapping
your fingerswe are on our guard now. We are up to
your tricks.
No such thing reader, no such thing, I tell you. I had no
idea of the sort; for the truth of the story is, that I
did
see a
woman while I stood on the top of the stairs, waiting for the
approach of the boata woman whose air and step were
enough like the air and step of the proud creature I was in
search of, to make me feel as I had not felt for three years
before; but when I saw her face, and saw her look at me
without a tragedy-fling, I felt, I have an idea, pretty much
as the man felt, who had been very civil to a woman that
rode with him all night in a stage-coach, when there was
daylight
enough to show him that the lady he had been so very
attentive to, was a thick-lipped Ethiope. Even so with me.
I could not bear to think of the imperial step I have said
so much of, nor of the august carriage I mean to say more of,
in the same week with the intrepid eye and little prim positive
mouth, and large feet of this woman of the sea. And sothat
my dream, which I still hoarded up as a mother would a sick
babe, the more because no other creature alive would care
a fig for it, my dream of what I would still go very far to see,
a proud woman deeply, desperately, irretrievably in love,
might not be wrecked for ever, and so wrecked as to leave
me no joy in the recollection of it, I hurried away from the
pier, leaving the feet, and the shape, and the face that I saw,
at the bottom of the stairs, to help one another up as they
best could over their slippery path; jumped into the first
coach I saw, and never looked behind me till it stopped in
Newport at the door of the Bugle-Inna very good house by
the by, and the only house that I know of in that part of the
world, where a man may get so much as a comfortable
breakfast
,
either for love or money, to say nothing of a tolerable
dinner. I do wish I could say a fortieth part as much of the
Pavilion-Hotel,1 or the Sand-Rock Hotel,2 houses that I
mean to bestow a paragraph upon before I leave the subject,
and houses that I shall dream of, I dare say, for the rest of my
life, whenever I am troubled with the night-mare. At the Bugle,
a very good house I say again, with a cordial gush of the heart,
for it was there I found what I had not seen for weeks before,
a good cup of tea, good cream, good bread, and good butter,
luxuries, downright luxuries to the traveller who has been a
week or two at Brighton, a day or two at Portsmouth, or a
single hour in the trap at Sand-Rock; a very good house,
believe me, (mindI speak here of the Bugle) though even
there, if you go to bed in the hope of being called at a future
day, you may never be thought of again, or be told as they
told me, when you have got up an age too late (As if you
were one of those who go to bed when they have nothing
else to do, and get upoccasionally), that you
had
been
called half a day before, and that either you answered in your
sleep, or that somebody else answered for yousomebody
else who occupied one of the four-and-forty next-rooms,
every door of which opened either into yours or so as to
darken
yours, and who had been so very obliging as to wake in
your place, and get up in your stead; a story which you are
obliged to be satisfied with, for a sure way of making the
affair forty times more disagreeable than ever a joke was yet,
would be to regard it as no joke: a very good house, after
all though, where I contrived to get a boyfor a guide, a
very decent horse, and a very tolerable gig.
Before two o'clock on that every day, the morning of which
operated on me as if I were breathing sunshinethe vitality of
the skyI found myself stretched out with all my length upon
the little narrow unsteady seat, which is fixed near the verge of
the precipice at Shanklin-Chine, the flat wide sea before me,
and the waves breaking with a steady roar underneath my very
feet; a troop of young happy creatures below me,far, far
below
me, running about on the pebbly beach with their clothes up
to their knees, dipping their little dainty feet one after
another
into the salt sea, and shaking them very much as a cat
would hers, or coquetting with a surge as it breaks afar off
and floats over their path till they are overtaken by a huge
wave or entrapped while pursuing it; when they stop
and cry out as if they were all overboard, drop their clothes
and scamper off with a backward step and a delightful show
of childish joy and yet more childish terrorwondering at
their own courage and rejoicing at their narrow escape; a
group here digging after shells for a trophy, or sea-weed for a
weathergage, or sifting the wet heavy sand through their
fingers, or wading about half-leg deep among the smooth
pebbles
and white glossy gravel thrown up in huge furrows and
heaps all along the shorefeats to be told of when they have
got home: here a grave idler with a basket and a hammer,
a book and a magnifying-glass, abroad after flowers and
butterflies
or bits of variegated flint; and there another group,
their cheeks flushed with joy and their eyes lighted with
girlish
hope, ascending and descending by the hourlike the
shapes that were seen by the patriarchbetween the top of
the cliff and the narrow beach below, and by a path as like a
ladder as a path could well be: here a cottage or two half
buried among the trees, and there a fisherman's hut which
appears either to have slipped down, hut hedges earth and
all, from the very top of the cliff, or to have been carried
where it is by a very high tide.
I grew sleepy. The sky and the waters, the blue deep
and the noise of the blue deep, the warm smooth atmosphere,
so like the breath of one you love, and the fatigue of the day
made me so; and as I did not like the idea of rolling over
the cliff into the nest of a sea-bird, or plump through the
fisherman's hut into the lap of somebody below; and as I
knew very well that if I did sleep, I should either dream of
that provoking mouth, or those ugly feet, which whenever I
shut my eyes appeared to be coming toward me, I got up,
shook myself, threw away my guide-book with a very
audible
pshaw, and set off down the path, leap after leap, with a
feeling hereherethat I would not forego, if I might have
it again, for all the sober joy of a week wisely occupiedit
was the very outgushing of childhood.
Having satisfied myself with a peep or two from below that
I had acted with singular propriety in descending the way I
did, I dipped my foot into the sea, like the other children
as if the sea were a new thing to a fellow who had grown up
so near it as to be nearly amphibiousand came away weary
and vexed with my own thoughts; for, go whither I would
and do what I would, the disagreeable idea would keep
returning
to me, that if I should ever be so happy as to meet
with her whose imperial shadow had haunted me so long,
year after year, by night and by day, and whether I was
awake or asleep, it was quite possibleI could not bear to say
probablethat she might have as bad a mouth, if not
altogether
so bad a foot, as the shape that I saw coming up out of the
agitated sea, as I stood leaning over the rail of the pier, just
ready to drop into it.
1 It is told of Cleopatra and believed, that strangers were so transported
by her magnificent carriage, that many sold themselves to death for an
opportunity of being with her a little time.
1 Ryde, or Ride, on the Isle-of-Wight, opposite Portsmouth.
1 A somewhat celebrated hotel at Brighton, where I
put up
(with more
than ever mortal did before) on my way to Portsmouth.
2 A trap so called on the Isle-of-Wight.
CHAPTER III.
TOUR OF THE ISLE... HOME... LABOR DISTINGUISHED FROM
EXERCISE... GRAVE-YARD.
So, leaving those who had no such dread of the sea, as I
now began to have, nor any such dread of sleep as I thought
I soon should have, to pursue their search after smooth white
pebbles and other like wonders of the deep, I reascended the
cliff, called the boy away from his beer, tumbled into the gig
as if it were a wherry, and left him to steer whithersoever he
would, until he drew up and asked me if I had not better
leave him where he was, and walk round by a little church
and a cottage or two, that I saw huddled up together among
the trees a great way below the wood. It was quite
impossible
to stay in the gig after one look at the entrance to the
cool shadowy hollow where these cottages were concealed
a green cave, a narrow path-way, a thatched-roof, and large
trees were before me; but they were not long
before
me, I
promise you. Ere the boy could make me understand
where I was to meet him, I had escaped through the cloudy
path-way and arrived at a large barnthe very
counterpart
of the barns that we have in America, where we
never think of leaving either hay or wheat exposed to the
open air. Attracted by the familiar noise of the flail, I drew
near and saw a sight worth going a voyage for, one that
I never shall forget, I am persuadedneverthe longest
day I have to live. I stoppedI stood stillevery thing
about me, every thing I heard, every thing I saw reminded
me of America, and of the habits there while they were
happy
,
and before they had begun to tread out their grain with
the feet of young horses, driven about in a circle. Two
young men were at work, in a stillness like that of the
Sabbath-day
,
and in a strong current of air, with a pile of wheat
on every side of them as high as they could reach, and
cartloads
of straw at the door. The barn where they worked
was all open to the sky.I could see through and through
it, and there was nothing to impede my view but a mass of
bright green foliage that overhung the further door-way with
a sort of transparent shadowI never did see any thing so
beautiful. I could have sworn that the very sky itself was
covered with grape-leaves.
I inquired my way to Bow-Church, and they directed me
without looking up. I was to keep the path and go through
a wicket, when I would see the church `right afore me';
if I stepped quick, I might overtake a lady and a gentleman
who had preceded me but a very few minutes. Now, though
I am not of a very hard or unsocial temper I flatter myself,
nor much given to solitary indulgences, I declare to you
reader, that after I had gone a little way, I would rather have
met theahemor any thing else alive or dead, a ghost or
a bailiff, than such a thing as a gentleman or a lady in my
path. A man or a woman, or any other natural thing I
could put up with in a place like that which I saw before me,
though I would rather be alone I confessaltogether alone,
if I could not have with me some one of the six or eight
brave girls that I might happen to be over head and ears in love
with at the timegirls of the sky, creatures of the blue
atmosphere, the blue sea, or the green wood, superb
spiritualities
I mean readerof course. A man or a woman I
could bearbut God preserve me from those who prattle
when a shadow is all about their feet, when they live and
breathe and move in a shadow, and the great green trees
are above their way and about their way, go whithersoever
they will; creatures who dare not breathe as we breathe,
3
who dare not step on the wet grass, nor move without being
tied up and laced up, from the very crown of the head to the
sole of the foot, and who look as if, in spite of all their outcry
and artificial rapture, nothing on earth would provoke them
to a hearty romp.I speak of the male creatures too,
the tidy little things who run about in the woods a-tiptoe,
and who if they ever happen to be caught in such a
grave-yard
as I saw before me, a grave-yard all open to the sea
and sky; or on the top of a great hill (such as Leith-Hill1)
with an empire lying under their feet like a map; or at any
other place where a
man
would be sure to hold his breath,
are pretty sure to be occupied in picking their teeth, or in
wiping their new hats or their new boots (both of which it
would be torture to wear) with a white pocket-handkerchief.
Gentle
-men forsooth! As if to be without manhood were to
be gentle; as if to be gentle were to be weaker and more
helpless than a great girl; and as if it were worthier of a
man to have a little white hand, or smooth soft hair, than it
would be to have a little white face, or no beard.
I know very well that if you hope to enjoy any thing here,
(in this world I mean,) a walk in the woods, or over the
hills, or along the shore, by night or by day, you must have
a woman with youfor a man, if he is a man, will be very
sure to disturb you with argument or philosophy or
something
worse; a woman too that you are in love with, and just
enough in love with, to enable you to see and feel the
beauty and the power of solitude. If there be too much
love between you, you may overlook the landscape and
forget every thing but each other; if too littleyou have
no relish for what you see, you might as well be with
a man. With a man!ay, with a dogyou had much
better be a dog, yourself and be
with
a dog; for you are a
slave without even the reward of a slave, or the privilege of
one.
But while it is very true that if you are to enjoy a walk any
where, you must have a woman with you, and such a woman
as I say, with wit enough to know when to talk and when to
hold her tonguea beloved wife who is able to understand
you and make herself understood without speech; and while
it is true, that in no other way can you enjoy a walk or a
stroll as they are to be enjoyed by the true epicure, it is also
true that if you wish to be tired before your blood is warm,
weary before you know why, fatigued before you are
exhilarated
;
or if you are to walk for your sins, and have done
something or thought something, for which a trip to the pole
with peas in your shoes were too mild a punishment, you
have only to take a woman with youa ladyfor whom
you don't care a fig.
Labor is not exercise. Fatigue is not exhilaration.
Therefore I say to those who walk muchDo not walk alone,
for if you do, it is fifty to one that your mind is harder at
work, than it would be in your study; you might as well
rock in a chair till you dropped out of it, or run up stairs
and down till you were ready to cry with fatigue. But if
you do walk alone, beware how you walk the self-same road
as a great many do, day after day year after year. You
had much better be at home; you would have as good air,
nay better, nine tenths of the time, and you would not be
half so likely to overdo your mindfor the mind and the
body will work together. And if you walk where there is
nothing new to make you loiter on the way, you soon get
walking faster than you should; for the mind will hurry
on if there be no check nor stay to the current of thought,
and the body will keep step with it, like a soldier treading to
music. But your step may be quick, whatever be the state
of your mind. If it be cheerful and your thoughts flow like
a river, you are anxious to get home, where you may turn
that river to account; if it be perplexed and your thoughts
flow like the drops that are wrung out of the body by hard
labor, you are only the more anxious to be at home; for it is
there, if any where, that you hope to meet with and overcome
your adversary. I never knew a solitary walker who did not
begin with walking a much slower pace than he left off with;
nor one who was not sure to outwalk other people
whenever
he got on a road which he was familiar with; nor one
who did not walk as if he had a job waiting for him at home,
or as if the walk itself were a job, which he would be glad to
have ended. Of what avail are such walks? They are
downright labor; they beget no exhilaration; they are sure
to be followed with a sense of fatiguea sign of itself that
you have not been relieved by your walk, either in body or
mind. They are all this even if they are made in fair
weather
;
but how much worse are they, when made in foul
damp weather? I have an idea that I could tell by the
very step of a man, by the swing of his arms, by the stoop of
his neck, by the lounge of his whole body, or by his
half-military
air, not only whether he was in the habit of walking
much alone, but whether he was in the habit of walking much
over the same road.
If you wish to profit by a walk therefore, do not walk alone.
But whether you walk alone or not, never walk the same road
till you are tired of it, or so familiar with it as to remember
nothing of your walk after you have got home, save that you
have been to a particular house, or a particular tree; in
which case it would be well for you never to go that road
again till you had forgotten every step of the way.
Otherwise
,
your walk would be of no use to you, either in body or
mind; you might as well trot round a cage of six feet by
four. Above all, do not walk with a woman, if she be not of
those, who while they are very dear to you, as I have hinted
already, are not so very dear as to shorten your walk or spoil
it. Nevertheless, if there be no other way, if you must walk
or die, you may take the air with a female you don't care a fig
for; you may even go out with a dog, or a stick, or a child,
if it be to save your life; but let nothing induce you, nothing,
to walk with a gentleman or a
lady
, in a place that you ever
hope to see again with pleasure.
There! will any body tell me now that my story has no
moral to it? Or will any body say that I have not packed up
as much good new and useful truth in it, as the age will
bear?
So, such being my notions of the matter, I need say no
more to convince you that instead of trying to overtake the
lady and gentleman who had `stepped' a little before me,
I rather chose to keep out of their way. I did so for a good
while, when at last, having got near enough to peep into the
little grave-yardit was like that of one family, the graves
were so few and so near to each other, and the whole were
so near the sea, that a stranger would have thought a brave
ship had been wrecked there with all her crew, and the church
had been built over themnear enough to peep into the
grave-yard
,
to reconnoitre all the paths about, and to satisfy myself
that I had nothing to fear from the lady, I sprang over the
barrier
,
with a step not well suited, I confess, to the green dwelling
of the dead, the antechamber of the sky; and after looking
into
the little portico of the churchit was all written over
with names that nobody knew, and with dates that nobody
cared for, scored on the white-washed wall or cut into the
wood,I had begun to puzzle out a few of the epitaphs that
were mouldering away, virtue by virtue, from the wooden
3*
tombstones about me, and was getting ahead bravely, when I
lighted upon onea very droll affair, which I knew that I had
seen somewhere else, but where I could not remember for a
long while. It ran thus
`I hope the change is for the best
To live with Christ and be at rest.'
Why, Voltaire could not have expressed himself with more
caution.
To live with Christ
and be at rest
I hope
the
change is for the best! Well, well, it was a very odd
epitaphbut where had I seen it before? After a few
minutes
I recollected whereit was in a church-yard at
Dorking
Surrey. At DorkingSurreyin a momentin the
twinkling of an eye, the whole course of my thought was
changedI forgot where I wasI saw nothing more of the
church nor the church-yardI thought only of Box-Hill, of
Leith Hill, of the heights, and of the Holm-wood, of the barren
heath, so like the lands of America that have been exhausted
by tobacco, and of the wild shrubbery; of all I had seen, of
all I had thought for an age, in that glorious and beautiful
part of our earth, where if the wind shifted, or the sky
changed
,
while we were out in the high places among the purple
heather, every part of the landscape would come and go with
a perpetual variety, wearing every minute a new shape, and
looking every day as if we had never seen it before. What
business had I in a grave-yard, while my heart was heaving
with such recollections? Very little, I fearand so I came
away, and pursued my walk for a good while without looking
up or turning aside in the narrow pathway which I had
stumbled
uponso still was it, and so like a path made by the
feet of children or loversor sheep. I know not how long
I might have walked here, if I had not been roused by the
approach of a dogthe finest dog I ever saw. I called him
to me, and was trying to get acquainted with his cur-ship
(I borrow that idea from the philosopher of Q. S. P.), when
I heard a whistle in the sky, and immediately after that, a
voice, the tone of which I shall never forget. I looked up
and saw a man far above me on a huge pile of rock that
appeared
to have been hewed for a pedestal, ages ago, with
a flag-staff rooted in the middle of it. I startedfor the
shape of the man was that of him I had encountered three
years before in the solitudes of Westminster-Abbey. But
what of that? Who cares for a shape? In the course of
that period, had I not seen fifty people with a shape like his,
and half a score that were otherwise like him? And if it
should prove to be the same individual that I saw there, of
what use would that be to me? I did not care to see him:
It was the woman I was after (in a lawful way), not the man.
Very truebutbutif I were to fall in the way of the man,
would not that be one step toward falling in the way of the
woman, or at least of learning who and what she was, and
whether married or single? Ahbut if she were married
if she should turn out to be that man's wife? or any other
man's wife, and very beautiful or very wise, what would
become of me? It would be unlawful, you knowvery
unlawful
to care a fig for another man's wife; and soand
soand so, while I was determining to avoid the mischief
and keep clear of the temptation for the rest of my life, I
found myself, I never knew how, at the foot of the rock, on
the top of which I had seen the stranger not five minutes
before
.
1 Near Dorking Surrey, celebrated for its broad, variegated, and very
English
prospect.
CHAPTER IV.
THE CELEBRATED WALL... THE LAND-SLIP... SCENERY...
COMFORTS OF DINING... SAND-ROCK HOTEL.
I hurried
uphe was gone. But whitherand why
and how? Did he know me? Was he trying to avoid me, as
I avoided other people?Did he mistake me for a
gentleman
?
I hope not; I had as lief be mistaken for a lady,
or a lap-dog.
It would be altogether vain for me to try to describe what
I saw from the top of the rock; for my thoughts were away,
far, far away, and my heart was heavy, and I felt some how
or other as if I myself were away among the solitudes of
North-America, by the river-side or the water-fall, in the
darkness and beauty of another world, `with one fair spirit
for my minister.'
The view was delightful, and rich, and various, and like
nothing I had ever seen before. I remember thus much, and
I remember too that whatever there was to see, I saw, and
that before the day was well over, I (But for my life I cannot
say now whether it was while I stood on that rock or after I
had peeped over and crawled away) among a multitude of
things, the memory of which had escaped me before my head
was on the pillow that very night, I sawa huge high wall1
so huge as to appear like a part of the foundations of our
earth, and so high that I mistook a white cloud sailing over
the top, for smoke. It was like the vapor that follows the
discharge of cannon that are too far off to be heard; a wall
stretching over leagues and leagues of territory; cottages
underneath
my very feet (I could have jumped through the
roofs) grouped here and there among the trees and the rocks,
and the gushing water and the wild shrubbery, as if they
were copied from old pictures; on every side of me the
bulwarks
of an empire, great square blocks which appeared as if
they had been wrought by the hands, or piled up where they
lay by the power of giants; here a cottage or two garnered
up in the holes of the rocks, and there half a dozen more
literally
folded among the ruins of what appeared like the
overthrown
barrier of a huge citadela barrier overthrown by
flood, or by earthquake, or by fire from abovenot by the
wrath of mortal man; here a heap of the greenest foliage I
ever saw, overhanging a roof, the loveliest I ever saw (not
seven feet high), and a little bit of smooth rich turf, yet
greener than the foliage of the young trees, and as lively as
the plumage of a parrot`Green to the very door'and
hedged about with flowering shrubs and great rocks, much
higher than the roof, and scattered clumps of blackberry
bushes, with never a bit of a pathway to be seen, so that you
could not conceive how the people got there alive, nor how
they got the children there that you saw laughing and rolling
about, or hiding in the shadow of the rocks, or creeping half
sideways over the smooth turf.
All this I did see, and I saw it either while I was on the
top of that rock, holding by the flag-staff, afraid to move lest
the rock should tip over among the houses, and afraid to let
go, lest I should be blown away; or I saw it, after I had
escaped
;
but furthermore I cannot say, for while I was looking
about me and wondering at the beauty of the landscape, and
wishing I had thought of looking at the dog's collar when he
was with me, by which I might have been able to guess out
the name of his master, my attention was caught by a well
drawn figure on the flag-staffa figure thatthatupon my
word I begin to be half afraid of telling the truthyou will
think me mad I am sure, and I confess that I began to feel
rather shy on that score myself when I thought over all the
occurrences of the day. First I had met with a female
shape which I mistook for that of the woman I had met in
the Abbey three years before. Hardly had I got over that
shockthe shock that followed a near view of her face and
her feetwhen I fell in the way of another shape, so like that
of the male apparition who walked by her side in the Abbey,
as to throw me into a grievous flutter, and provoke me to
pursue it up a huge pile of rockI hardly know how; in the
hope ofI hardly know what; for I should have looked
rather sheepish I fear, if when I arrived at the top of the
pile I had found the stranger there, alive and occupied in
sketching the admirable figure that I saw before me. But
the truth must be told, whatever you may think of such folly.
I could not be mistaken nowthe figure that I saw on the
flag-staff
was
the figure of the female I had met in
Westminster
Abbey. A mere sketch, a mere outline, though it
was, still the air, the carriage, the superb height, every thing
was like her and like nobody else. But for whom was it made,
wherefore, and how? And
by
whom? Was he a lover?
I looked at the sketch again; I tried to transfer it to my
pocket-bookI did not succeed. He was not only her lover
thenit was not enough to have her image in his heart as I
had, but he must have been a capital draughtsmanI caught
my breathand perhapsI caught my breath again
perhaps
,
the proud woman herself was at his elbow leaning over
him while he was at work, just as he had represented her in
the sketch. I now saw another figure partially effaced, and
after looking awhile, aided perhaps by a little imagination, I
succeeded in persuading myself that I knew just how the
whole originated. The drawing was the work of two hands
of that I was perfectly sure. One part was the work of a
pupil, the other part the work of a master. But which was
the master? and which the pupil? One figure appeared to
be sitting with a large book upon his knee, peradventure a
Sketch-Book; the other, a female, was standing up and
overlooking
the first while he appeared to be reading or drawing.
The sitting figure, though nearly obliterated, so that I could
not so well judge of the execution, was clearly the work of a
hand much inferior to that which drew the upright figure.
Was it not very probable therefore that one of the two
persons
who had clambered up the precipice for a view, was a
teacher of drawing, the other his pupil? What could be
more so? Was it not very probable moreover, that while he
was occupied with the large book upon his knee, sketching a
part of the landscape, she had been at work on the flag-staff
trying to sketch her master? And that he, having caught her
in the fact, had the impudence to portray her in the attitude
that vexed me, (the wretch,) leaning over his shoulder, with
one elbow resting upon it as if she were a newly-made wife?
And that she, indignant at such audacity, had thereupon
rubbed out the figure below? And that, in a word,
whatever
else they were, they were not on such familiar terms
with each other as to admit of their being coupled in this way.
For about five minutes, nothing could have been more
delightful
nor more satisfactory than the conclusion to which I
had now arrived. But before the next five minutes were
over, I had begun to fear that possiblypossiblyby some
possibilityI might be mistaken. If she rubbed out his figure
in wrath, why the devil had she not rubbed out her own?
If he was able to prevent her from destroying the beautiful
sketch of herself, why could he not prevent her from
destroying
the sketch of another? For a while I could not escapeshe
had suffered her portrait to remainshe had therefore not
rubbed
out
his
with a feeling of displeasure, but perhaps from a
feeling of dissatisfaction; it was not enough like him perhaps,
or perhaps not worthy of his pupil, or perhapsI began to
feel as if I should certainly cut his throat if I ever came in
his way. But softlywas there not a hope still? a chance
of a hopethe hope of a chancethe hope of a hope?
There wasthere wasI perceived the truth nowit was
clear as noon-dayI only wondered I had not seen it before.
She was a very good girl, and she had been up there and
made a sketch before breakfast, and not being half satisfied
with it, she had rubbed her pretty fingers over it, and effaced
every line of the whole as she thought, and come away.
But after breakfast, another had gone up, the fellow that I saw,
and he had partially restored her sketch and put in the
figure
that I saw. This idea did very well too for about an hour;
at the end of which time I had begun to ask myself whether
it was not very possiblejust within the limits of possibility
that the woman I saw on the steps of the pier might after
all be a relation or a sister of the shape that I saw in the
Abbey
;
and if so, whether it was not very possible that I had
come in the way of the family at last without knowing it
popped
into their very hiding-place by the merest accident in the
world. Butif it should prove, as it possibly might, after all
if
it should prove that the woman of the Abbey was like the
woman of the sea; or if it should prove that the woman of
the Abbey and the woman of the sea were after all one and
the same person, what on earth was to become of me?
Should I hang myself, or jump overboard? hang up in
that very niche where I first began to make a fool of
myself
;
or go back to the pier at Ryde where I had first begun
to behave like a booby, and jump into the sea?
Before I could make up my mind which course to pursue, I
had arrived at the Sand-Rock Hotel, where I suffered so much
from a sort of trouble which few have the courage to speak of,
that I mustI
will
give a history of what occurred to me
there. I should remark before I begin however, that on my
way to this Hotel, I saw on every side of my path wonders
which appear to me now, like what I have seen somewhere in
my sleep; and beauty and verdure that I never can lose the
memory of, though it is out of my power to say in what part
of my road they broke upon me. There was the great wall
as beforethe outworks of another Babylon; there was the
great sea too, and look where I would, there was a bit of
lovely
pure landscape, with a cottage nestling under the rocks,
and a few sheep, and a few trees, and mayhap a little stream
of water to encourage me on; but still every thing that I saw is
like a dream to me now. My thoughts were so occupied
with the earlier occurrences of the day, that I rode through
a part of the most beautiful country in the world, as if the
ride were to continue for ever. Of course I had no safe
recollection of what I saw before I slept; and after I had
slept, so carried away was I, by the hope of what was to
occur
4
during the day, and so teased by the petty vexations
about me, that I could hardly remember how I had come;
and before that day was over, such was the variety and such
the strangeness of the incidents that occurred in the course
of a single hour, that I could not have said whether much that I
have related here was not a dream. Others I dare s ay have
been so perplexed when they were at sea, or travelling, as
not to know the day of the week, or the day of the month;
but as for me, I could not have told what month it was
without
a deal of consideration, nor whether I had been one, two,
or three days on the road. I do not say that I had actually
lost the run of the year at the time I speak of; but I do say,
that if I had been fool enough to stay twenty-four hours
longer
at the Sand-Rock Hotel, I should have lost my senses.
But let me give the reader a notion of what may be endured
by a man half crazy with love, when he has an idea that he
is under the same roof with the woman he loves, and
separated
from her, as people are separated from death at sea,
by a half-inch board (more or less.) It may be well to
begin
at the very beginning.
The approach to the house delighted me. The roof was
thatched, there was a green piazza running the whole
length of the house, and there was a very pretty patch
of green turf spreading out before the piazza far enough to
allow a sort of a promenade. As I drove up to the door, I
saw several faces at the windowbut I could not see of what
shape or form they were, much as I desired it; for there was
a bit of thin white drapery between the faces and me. At
the door too, several persons appeared, and others were
walking about on the little patch of green; but nobody in the
shape of a landlord or waiter, chamber-maid or hostler. I
went up to the door, and was going in to look for the
coffee-room
,
or the traveller's room, or a room where I could see
somebody belonging to the house, when I perceived that I
should get into the kitchen if I stirred either way, or into the
room at the window of which the faces appeared. A
knocker
was on the doorI believebut I dare not be certain, for
I have quite forgotten much that I saw there, and I hope to
forget the rest before I die. But whether a knocker was on
the door or not, I knocked; and after awhilefaith, it was a
good while too, so long that I began to fear the guide had
brought me to a private house, and that the people about me
were the retired nobility of our agea very good sort of a man
appeared, with a face that I took the liberty to be pleased
with. I asked for a room. He hesitated. For the
coffee-room
,there
was no coffee-room. For the traveller's-room,
there was no such room to be had; he was very sorry.
Could I have a private room? or a place to eat my dinner?
I was hungry as a tiger. He did not know, but would
inquire. He left me standing at the door, and after a few
minutes came back, and desiring me to follow him, took me
round the house on the outside, and opening a door which
led me up a narrow stair-case, entrapped me into a room so
meagre, so desolate, and so like the rooms we see in the new
public-houses of my country when they stand out of the
general
thoroughfare, that I felt rather inclined to be merry by
occupying all the furniture I saw. Pray,
Sir
, said I, where
am I to sleep? He did not know as he knew, but he would
inquire. Very wellwhat can you give me for dinner?
What should you like, Sir? Any thing, whatever you can
get me soonesta mutton-chop or a rump-steak, or whatever
you please; I should like a bit of cold chicken, or beef, or
in short, any thing eatable. You can have a chop, Sir. Have
you nothing else? No, Sir. But you have a tart, I suppose,
or a pie? Neither Sir; but if you would like some fritters, he
added with a bow. Fritters! the very thingmutton-chop
and fritters! The very idea was enough to make a starved man
cheerful. But when are they to be ready? In half an hour.
I pulled out my watchit is now six; I am now going out
for a walk, and at half past six I shall be ready, if you are.
Having settled this matter, I walked off to see what I could
see in the neighbourhood; rejoicing all the way that I had
been so lucky as to find a sitting-room and a bed-room, with
such a delightful walk between the two as I foresaw that I
was likely to have. The great wall was before me, hardly
a gun-shot off, and there was just light enough in the sky
to see my way up.
So up I went by a perpendicular path-way, which had once
been made use of, but having been found too dangerous, it
had been stopped with a sort of loose wall, which it was not a
very safe nor easy thing for a man to get over. I got over it
nevertheless, and before five minutes were over I stood on
the top of the precipice, looking down upon the houses
below
me, and feeling as if with one effort of my foot, if I were
a large man, I could bury them where they stood in earth
and rubbish for ever. But if the getting up was unsafe, the
getting down was a great deal more so; for I soon
discovered
that I had not courage enough to come down by the
way that I had gone up byso different is the measure we
take of heights when we are looking up, from what we do
when looking down. It was now getting dark, and my
dinner
was ready, and I saw people at the windows of the tavern
looking up at me as if they had gathered together in a hurry;
and among others, a female, who stood as if expecting me to
step over the precipice. I did not much like my situation
I saw that I had no time to loseand I persuaded myself
once more that I could see a resemblance in her figure to
that of the woman I was in search of. Not another
moment
would I have staid where I was, for ten times more than
I was likely to get by my voyage of discovery; and so I gave
it up, and seeing a deep fissure in the rocks running from the
very top to the bottom, with irregular projections all the way,
which I thought I could manage to hold on by, long enough at
any rate to secure my passage from one to another, I
undertook
a descent in that manner; and after groping my way for
a minute or two, and slipping my hold once where if I had
not instantly caught again, I should have broken my neck to
a dead certainty, I arrived safely at the bottom; proceeded
directly to the housefull of the strange hopethe strange
fear, I might as well say, that I had now come to the place
where I was pre-ordained to meet her that I was in search of,
and see the mystery cleared up.
But I was not able to find my room. The house which I
left on one side of me when I went up the hill, I found on the
other, when I had got back. I went to the door and
knocked
;
and after waiting the usual time, the waiter
appeared
and acted as guide. I was lucky enough to find the room;
but where was the dinner? It was long past the hour agreed
upon; and yet look which way I would, no sign of dinner
was to be seen. The very cloth was not laidnor were
the candles lighted. I had just begun to feel vexed, when
the waiter appearedsaying that two ladies had come who
were obliged to drink tea in their bed-room, there being no
spare room in the whole house. They are welcome to this
room said I, the moment I have eaten my dinner, if that will
do? No answer. They may have it now indeed, if you will
give me a place where I can sit long enough to swallow a
chop. No answer. You will inquire, if you please, and I beg
you to say that I do not offer them a
share
of the room, but
the whole of it. Still no answer. He leaves meand I
have then leisure to think of what is to be done. If the
ladies
were kind enough to accept my offer, especially if it should
4*
happen to rain, what was I to dowith no booksnot so much
as a newspaper to keep me alive? I should have to go to bed.
Before I have quite made up my mind to hang myself, if it
should rain, the waiter brings me a heap of mutton steaks
in capital orderand leaves me to ring for whatever else I
may think proper to need. After a while I ring. Nobody
comes. I wait a few minutes and ring again. Still nobody
comes. I get uneasy; I begin to ask myself whether I am
quite safe in such a desolate room. At last however, I get
some wretched wine, a spoon-full of sugar, and a few fritters;
but before I can speak, the waiter is gonegone too, without
saying whether he has made the offer to the ladies or
not, and whether I am to go to bed, or turn out and walk till
bed-time, without having a right to come back to the room I
occupy, whatever may happen. It is very vexatious. Ring
ringring. After a while somebody appears at the door, and
I beg to know what the ladies have concluded upon, that I
may know what to do with myself till bed-time. Away goes
the messenger, and I wait and ring, wait and ring, wait and
ring, for another half hour; at the end of which time, I am
told by a red-haired girl who peeps into the door just long
enough to deliver the message, and let me hear the voices of
people below as happy as heart could wish, that the ladies
have concluded to take their tea in their bed-roomwithout
so much as a civil word to me for the offer I made them.
Very wellthat affair being ended, I have nothing more to
say, whatever I may think about such
ladies;
and off I go for
a walk, I care not whither, noting the land-marks at every
step as I proceed, and leaving a candle burning upon the table,
that I may know which way to steer when I get back. I
pursue
the path for a whole hour, over a sort of broken-up
highway
on
one side of me the everlasting wall with stars watching
and burning along its vergeon the other heaps of mighty rocks,
piled up as if they were gathered by giants for battle, and the afar
off great sea, black as midnight and awful as the grave. But
with so much to chill mefor the night is dark, the
weather
cool, and the prospect dreary as deathmy heart is
bounding
with hope, and go whither I will, every step of my foot
is a spring. But whywhywho is there to explain this
deep mystery? I am no longer a child; I know that I am
above being disturbed as the youthful are, by dreams and
presages. I have gone by that period, when the heart leaps
for joy at the approach of a new face; that period when if we
happen to be where we never have been before, we are sure
to see more sights and meet with more adventures,
laughable
or serious, in a single day, than we should see or
meet with in a twelvemonth if we were a few years older.
And yet, although I have passed that ageI pray you, do
not jeer meI feel as if something is about to happen,
something which is to have a material influence on my
fate here and perhaps hereafter. I cannot shake off the
persuasionI walk hurriedly onI breathe hard as I
go, and my temples throb at every step; and yet I am
trying to persuade myself that I do not care a fig for
the past or the future (in this life), nor a fig for the female
shape that I saw at the window holding herself apart from
the rest, with an attitude expressive I am sure of deep
anxietyno, not a fig, though it should prove to be the
original
of the sketch that I saw on the flag-staff, or the blessed
creature who swept by me as I stood in the darkness of a
gone-by age, among the marble creatures of
Westminster-Abbey
.
After a good hour's walk, I return flushed with exercise in
spite of the cool night-air, and feverish with expectation. I go
up to the door and lift the knockerand am just going to
let it fall, when I recollect myself and hurry away, passing the
window of a lighted room, within which I can see the shadow
of two personsI would give the world to know who they
arebut I have not courage enough to ask: I tremble at the
very idea of discovering that she whom I saw, is not so
beautiful
as I have thought her for three long years; or that she
is a married woman, married perhaps to the very man that
I saw her with; or that she is unworthy of the strange regard
that I feel for her and shall feel for her to my dying day, if she
be not more unworthy than I dare to suppose. I get up to
my room as well as I canI throw myself into a chairI lean
my head upon my handsI reproach myself a good half hour
for my inconceivable folly, and finish by jumping up and
ringing the bell, with a fixed determination to find out who
the people are that I have seen below. I ring, and ring, and
ring, at intervals, for about a quarter of an hour, when a good
sort of a woman shows her head at the top of the stairs, in a
very interesting situation. My courage is gone, I dare not
speak a wordI dare not ask who the people are,and I go
up to her, that I may save her all the trouble I can, praying
her to give me a newspaperI care not how old it may be
or a book, I care not how worthless it may be (I could read
one of my own, I verily believe now). Stopwe must begin
with a new chapter.
1 The geological phenomena of the Isle-of-Wight are as much celebrated
as the scenery and fertility. Mr. Webster, in the second volume of the
Transactions of the London Geological Society, says, `The chalk covered
by the London clay, passes under the channel, called the Solent, and rises
in the middle of the island, forming a range of hills, which extends from
Culver-Cliffs on the East to the Needles on the West. Here we meet with
the only remarkable derangement of the beds of chalk, and the superior
strata, which has been noticed in England. The strata of this range of hills,
says Bakewell (in his Introduction to Geology) are thrown into a position
absolutely vertical
, evincing the action of some mighty disturbing force,
which can be so often observed to have acted on the lower strata in various
parts of the world, and also on the upper strata in the vicinity of the Alps.'
`The whole thickness of the beds in the Isle-of-Wight,
which are nearly
vertical
, according to Mr. Webster's measurement, is not less than 3000
feet, including 1481 feet of strata above the chalk, about 987 feet of chalk,
and 500 or 600 feet of lower strata. Farther south the strata under the chalk
are seen again in their
original horizontal position
, and on the northern
side there are hills composed of horizontal strata, evidently of a formation
posterior to the time when the chalk strata were overturned
.'
CHAPTER V.
ENGLISH INN FOR TOURISTS... ENGLISH BEDS... WAITERS...
ENGLISH BREAKFAST... HOUSEHOLD PHILOSOPHY... ALLUM
BAY... THE NEEDLES... THE LIGHT-HOUSE...
The
landlady (for it was she) soon re-appeared, and I was
careful to meet her again at the top of the stairs, and save
her as much trouble as I could, in her peculiar situation, which
was of a nature to render a woman very sacred in the eyes
of a good man. She had brought a book to amuse methe
second I had met with in the whole course of the day. The
first I had got by heartit was a guide-book for the
Isle-of-Wight
in duodecimo; and this turned out to be a guide-book
to the Isle-of-Wight in quarto. I could not enjoy such
variety
it
reminded me of the fare I had been used to in the
heart of New-Englandfish-and-potatoes one day, and
potatoes-and-fish
another; and after waiting a while in hope that
some of the voices that I heard wrangling below might come
within reach of mine, I took a chair and sat down by the
bell-rope
,
knowing by experience what sort of a job I had before
me, and forthwith began to pull a sort of
triple-bob-major
,
with rests long enough to afford me a nap at the end of
each bar: with much difficulty, and after I had played out
all the tunes I knew, and was just going to begin again with
variations of Yankee Doodle by Matthews, intending to
accompany
the air with the original words
Five times five are twenty-five,
And five times six are thirty;
Five times seven are thirty-five,
And five times eight are forty, &c. &c.
I succeeded in getting a guide to my chamber, a
corroty-haired
girl with a pretty good face, who after leading me out
into the cool night air, as if that were a part of her duty
before
she put me to bed, conducted me through the kitchen,
which was crowded with servants all talking together; and
having apologized for leading me that way (the only way there
was to my bed-room), she passed me over to the ugliest
creature
I ever saw in the shape of a chamber-maid, who starting
off the moment she saw me, with a heavy trot like a cart-horse,
begged me to follow. I did so, pursuing her at half speed
this way and that, up stairs and down, till she arrived at a
door in the garret where, letting fall a courtesy as if she had
trod upon something that hurt her foot, and pushing open the
door, she informed my worship that I was in my bed-room.
I started at the girl in amazement. A bedroom!how
on earth could she manage to keep her countenance
what in the name of all Cape-Elizabeth was I to do
laugh or cry? There were two little beds in the room, six
feet by threestuck just under the eves, like a pair of
swallows'-nests
.
Pray said I to the girl,who appeared rather
anxious to get away, as if she knew by bitter experience what
was to be expected from the wrath of a lodger who had been
decoyed into that particular roomshe stood as if she had
entrapped a wild beast, ready to jump over the railings if I
spoke or movedPray said I, am I to
sleep
here?
If you please, Sir.
If I please! why, my good girl, I cannot get my breath
here; the roof is too low, and as for that little window there,
whyhang the window! little as it is, it was never made to
open, I see; I can't move it a pegneither up nor down, nor
sideways. What am I to do? occupy that little bed there,
not more than two or three feet wide, and stuck under the hot
smoking thatched roof, upon which the summer-sun has been
blazing all day. Am I to sleep there, I say?
Yes, Sirif you please
Whyif I should happen to lift my head in the night, I
shall certainly knock my brains out
If you please, continued she in the same tone, half
frightened
to death, and letting fall another courtesy as ugly as herself.
You may gomy dearsaid I, in that most persuasive way
so peculiar to our family; being satisfied that if she staid
another
minute I should be strongly tempted to open the
obnoxious
window, by pitching her through it head-foremost.
Hardly was she gone when it occurred to me to look at the
bed more narrowly. I went up to itthrew down the
coverlidand gasped for breathheavy cotton sheets,
that clung to whatever they touched! and a feather-bed,
precisely such as I would employ to suffocate a man, if there
were no hope for him in a case of hydrophobia! And this in
the middle of September, between a floor which was warm to
the tread, and a roof that was warm to the touch, with no
way to introduce a breath of air into the room though you
were dying for it. Such were my prospects.
I walked up to the bell-rope once more, threw off my coat,
and after ringing two or three times gently, to prepare the
folks in the kitchen, whose uproar continued long and long after
I was in bed, I drew up my chair and set to for an
their half-day's work. By and by, the steps of
somebody
were heard, and a smothered laugh, and a couple of
persons, followed by a third, who I dare say was the
chamber-maid
,
passed by my door and took shelter in the room
opposite
,
which I hoped was like that in which I was
doing
(or being done). I'll teach them to titter, said I to myself as
they tripped by the door.
When these people were disposed ofI would have given a
trifle to see who they were, but there was no chance for a
peep, the glass of my door being covered with a green stuff
when they were disposed of I say, the chamber-maid was
obliging enough to see what I wanted. She must have been
used to like behaviour in those who occupied my room, or she
must have thought by the noise, for I kept pulling away, that
her lodger was in a fit, with his hands tied to the bell-rope.
I cannot possibly go to bed in this way said I, the moment
I saw her face at the door. I cannot sleep in cotton-sheets
my good girl, at this season of the year.
She dropped another courtesy, without looking up or saying
a word in reply.
Have you no linen sheets? Why don't you speak? Nothing
but heavy cotton sheets with the fur on, for such weather as
where the devil are you going? what is the matter with
you? why don't you answer me? Stop, I say!
Another awkward courtesy, and away she drove to inquire
if I might be indulged with a pair of linen sheets, leaving me
half undressed and sore with perplexity, to prepare for the
issue. After awhile she came back to say, that she's very
sawry, and Missis very sawry, she's no linen sheets haired.
Very well, if that be the case; but I should like to know
if I can have a pair of cotton sheets with the wool off
Sir!
If they are not haired, so much the better.
Very well, Sir.
Stopsend for my boots, or take them with you now, and
let me be calledfire and fury, you don't hear a word I say.
Yes I do, Sir.
Well, what have I said?
Why Sir, you said you, youyouyou asked me where
the devil I was goin'?
Pshaw! send for my boots, or take them with you now,
and let me be called at seven to-morrow morningat seven
precisely, d'ye hear.
Another courtesy and a sort of whimper, which sounded to
me like a smothered giggle.
Have my boots ready for me outside the door when I get
up, so that I may not have to disturb the whole house for
themdo you hear?and tell the boy to be ready with the
gig at seven, will you?zounds, are you deaf?
Yes Sirno Sir.
Yes Sirno Sir; what am I to understand by that?
Yes Sir
Yes
Sir!
No Sir!
Pho pho, leave me.
I now prepared to go to bed, not knowing whether to laugh
or be angry, though I knew that if I did
not
sleep, I should
wish the Sand-Rock Hotel at the bottom of the Red-Sea;
and that if I did sleep, I should stand a pretty fair chance of
being smothered, or of knocking my brains out whenever I
lifted my head. But sleep was out of the questionI had
little to be afraid of on that score; the noise below would
have kept me awake, if I had been ever so sleepy, or
in ever so delightful a bedto say nothing of the fever
I was in for having suffered myself to be so packed
away; nor of the bitter self-examination that I subjected
myself to, touching the inconceivable folly of my behaviour
towardnot a woman, but the shape of a woman, who
though I had never seen her face, nor heard her speech, had
haunted me night and day for three whole years; nor any
thing of the peculiar structure of the window and the bed,
one of which, though it would not suffer a breath of air to
get to me, kept rattling to the breeze all night long, while the
other shrieked so as to be heard all over the house,
whenever
I stirred hand or foot, and was so narrow, that move
which way I would, I was sure to roll the clothes off.
5
I lived through the nighthow I escaped the catastrophe I
spoke of, He
only
knows who watches over the ship-boy on
the giddy mast, and the lodgers of the Sand-Rock Hotel.
But
I
know that I had a narrow escape and that I never can be
sufficiently thankful. I was very sleepy toward morning (
after
the house had got still) and yet I could not sleepI durst
not sleepI was afraid,for whenever I shut my eyes, a
tomb like a city was before me, and a beautiful apparition
that I knew, swept by me with a slow majestic tread that I
knew, and disappeared in the far shadow of the grave; or
she stood still before mein the attire of a bride, and when
I strove to look at her, my heart was heavy with unspeakable
sorrow, for I knew that she was not of our earth, and yet
I loved her. Nono, I could not sleepand yet, after I was
up and out in the fresh morning air, so happy was I, that I could
hardly speak for joy. I recollected having seen her shadow
pass by my chamber door, arm in arm with a shadow that I
knew to be her husbandpass by to the bridal-couch, even
as
they
did in the story told by Rousseau, and that I started up
with a feeling that no language can describe; it was like that
which I suppose the lover of Julia had, when as he lay
awake after he had parted from her, he heard her step and the
rustling of her dresspoor wretchas she and her husband
passed by to their marriage-bed. But such thoughts are
evil. They may do mischief where I would only do good;
they may be a trouble to her, who if I could have my way,
should never know what trouble is. And therefore, casting
off the recollection of what I suffered in my sleep, for I must
have been asleep, though I had no other proof than the
memory
of this cruel dream, I shall proceed with my story.
I should have got up early, as early as I could see, if I
had not been afraid of disturbing the house; but having had
some experience of what is called the breakfast-hour in
hotels, I chose to lie and wait to be waked. But I could
not wait for ever, and so after looking at my watch, and
finding
that as usual the hour had gone by at which I was to
have been called, I jumped out of bed, and consumed as
much time as I possibly could in the hope of hearing a knock,
before I laid hold of the bell-rope, or opened the door to look
for my boots. It was all in vain howeverring I must, and
ring I did, five or six times before a soul came near me.
At last the girl appeared. How soon can you give me
breakfast?
As soon as you like Sir; what would you please to have,
Sir?
Nothing but a little tea and toast, with a fresh egg, if you
have one
Yes Sir.
I shall be back in about an hour, and I must be away as
soon as possible after I get back.
Yes Sir
Stay, staydon't forget the egg; do you hear me?
Yes SirNo Sir, I meanwe 'll not forget the egg.
After a full hour's walk over what is said to be the
highest
part of the island, I came back, and without stopping to
inquire the way, went up to the little room I had occupied
the evening before. I found it now occupied with luggage,
and as if that were not enough to provoke me, with the
luggage
of women, who judging by their shawls and bonnets
and umbrellas, and grey-cloaks lined with silk, and the huge
bag that I saw stuffed out like a feather-bed, must have been
ladies of a certain ageunmarried. Being rather surprised
at what I saw, I had begun to prepare for another tug at the
bell-ropethe more, as the cloth was not laid and there was
no sign of breakfastwhen the red-haired girl came up, and
gave me to understand that I had no business in that room
the room that I had engaged and occupied and was paying
for, and that I was to have my breakfast below.
Belowwhere
In the coffee-room
In the coffee-room; I was told you had no coffee-room.
No more we have Sir; but there's a room below that you
can have now, as the gentleman has just gone out.
IndeedI am very lucky
Yes Sir.
And so I am to be turned out of my own room whether I
will or no, that I may have a chance of being turned out of
another man's room when the proprietor gets back?
If you please Sir; the ladies are expected every minute,
and if they should find you here
If they should find
me
here. Why, what the deuse!upon
my word young woman, I have a great mind to stay here till
they do come; and if they were not females I would throw
the baggage out of the window this minute, and leave your
master to settle the affair with them as he could. Where is
hewhy did he not ask my leave?
Law Sir! how could we ask your leave; wa'nt you gone
out to take a walk?
What could I say to that? Nothing. And so I did as I
was bidwalked down to the room below, where I repeated
the order for tea, toast, and a fresh egg. Still there was no
other sign of breakfast than a tea-pot and a canister, a table,
a chair, and a bell-rope, three things which I made immediate
use of, but with little or no effect you may suppose; for the
waiter did not appear till I had rung repeatedly, and when he
did there was neither egg nor toast. After a while however
the toast came, and I inquired for the egg; but no egg
appeared
till I had actually finished my breakfast and begun to
ring for my bill. By this time I was in the mood for
horsewhipping
any body that might happen to fall in my way. I
do not know that I was ever so angry beforeeven with a
trifle, though trifles by the way are the very things to try the
temper of a man. I could always bear sorrow without
flinching
if
it were heavy; trial, if it were enough to crush me,
without a word or a look to show that I suffered; any thing I
might say, if it were both unavoidable and severe. But I
never could behave like a man where to behave like a man
would appear to be the easiest thing in the world. The
wreck of a great hope I could bearI
could
bear it, for I
have borne it;the loss of much that I most loved on earth, I
could suffer, without a murmur and perhaps without a tear;
without losing either my self-command or my equanimity for
above a day. And yet, if my shoe-maker should bring me
a pair of shoes that pinched my feetafter I had given him
fair notice and full warningor a pair of boots that were only
to be pulled on by half pulling my fingers off, I should
behave like a mad man, as every body knows. And so it is
with many, whose behaviour would be insupportable to a
bystander
,
if they were assailed by a petty every-day vexation.
But wreck them as it were, body and spirit, fortune health
and character; heap sorrow upon them; pile up grief upon
grief, and you see nothing but a little more gravity in their
look, and a little more serious manhood in their speech. They
may be paler for a time, they may look more thoughtful for
a season, but their foreheads will be high, their voices clear,
and their tread firm, till the shadow of death has gone by, or
till
they
have gone by for ever, on their way to the only city
of refuge for a proud man, who has outlived a majestic hope
the grave.
5*
CHAPTER VI.
HUMAN LOVE PUT ASIDE BY THE HELP OF A FRESH EGG...
BLACKGANG
CHINE... TOURISTS... THE LAND-SLIP... CAVE AT
FRESHWATER.
No, I do not believe that I was ever so angry beforeeven
with a trifle, such as those mentioned in the last chapter.
Had the affair been got up for the very purpose of trying my
temper (which I take to be rather techy) it could not have
been carried through with more zeal, nor contrived with a
more perverse ingenuity. Say what I woulddo what I
would, it was all in vain. Civility was quite misunderstood
politeness thrown away. The more obliging I was, the
more disobliging they were. One would have supposed from
the behaviour of all parties when I offered to give up my
room the night before, that they knew me to be a Yankee,
and saw clearly that I should overreach them, however they
might receive my proposal; for I got no answer, till I was
weary of waiting. And yet, the moment my back is turned
without saying by your leave, they take possession of my
room and occupy the table and chair with all sorts of
trumpery
.
And then to think of the trouble I took to get a fresh
eggproviding for it a full hour before hand; of the
appetite
I had, when I had finished my walk in a high wind along
the very top of the cliff, and through the ploughed earth to
the watch-house, and of the manner in which, after I had
given two or three several orders for the egg, my inquiry
for it was received. Oh! did you order one, said the girl
with red hair, when the breakfast I had was nearly devoured.
Order one! yes, a full hour ago, and over and over again
afterwardsof you and of every body else that came.
Very well Sir
Very well Sir! no, it is not very well Sir. Stopstop
hear what I have to say; if I cannot have an egg
immediately
,
I don't want it at all; but I desire to know whether I
am to finish my breakfast with or without one; either way
will do, but I do not much like to wait half an hour.
The beggage made no reply, but after standing as if she
had a prompter at her elbow for a minute or so, she left me
in a prodigious hurry, and I saw no more of her till she came
to receive her reward.
Now `every body knows or ought to know, and a man
must be extremely ignorant not to know,' as Judge
Blackstone
would say, that a dinner is a thing which few of women
born are philosophers enough to disregard altogetherI do not
say give up altogether; and the ladies know or ought to know,
and most of them do know, that when your heart is fixed
upon a thing, though it be of no more value than a fresh egg,
or a live eel, or a dish of strawberries-and-cream, it is neither
very safe nor very wise to disappoint you. A longing is a
longing whatever it may be for, and by whomsoever it may
be felt; and however absurd it may appear for one to make
such a fuss about an egg in the middle of a pathetic story
which is to end, whatever may be thought of it now, with a
real catastrophe, I am willing to be judged by every man
who knows the value of a dinner at home or abroad, when I
say that an egg was of more value to me at the time I speak
of than a costly dinner would be after a sea-voyage at
another time;and by every woman who knows how
dreadful
a thing it is to be kept in suspense for a whole hour and
be disappointed after all,when I say that the trouble I had
about the egg did more toward making me forget my love,
though the woman that I loved was actually under the same
roof with me, as I found out afterwards, than every thing
that had occurred in the course of the whole preceding day
and night. Such is human loveas Wordsworth would say.
Howeverto proceed with my story. There was but one
way to behave in my case; and so, after waiting a
reasonable
time for a message in lieu of the egg, if the egg was
not endowed with the faculty of forthcomingnessto borrow
a word from Q. S. P.), I gulped down my cold tea, choked
myself with the cold toast, kicked away my chair, and
without
throwing off my coat, though I knew well what I had
undertaken, laid hold of the bell-rope and begun to ring
for the bill, in the hope of getting away before night, when
the egg was brought in and put upon the table without a
word of excuse or apology.
Bring me the bill said I, without turning my head.
It was brought in the course of the morning, and a very
pretty bill it was, to be sure; but I had already made up my
mind how to behave. So, taking up the change for a
sovereign, which if the girl who acted neither as
chambermaid
nor as waiter, though she appeared to have undertaken
both parts, had shown me the least attention, I should have
begged her to keep in her two-fold capacity,1 I dropped it
into my pocket, saying as I did so, that I should have treated
her otherwise, if she had behaved otherwise; but that never
having been so waited upon before in all my life, I should do
with her what I had resolved to do about a week before (at
the Pavilion-Hotel, Brighton) with every waiter who kept
aloof, and with every chamber-maid who neglected me
Sir! said the girl, interrupting me with a look of terror in
the very middle of my speech, as if some how or other, she
did not exactly understand what I had resolved to do with
chamber-maids who failed in their duty. Soafraid lest I
should laugh in her face, if I continued my fatherly
expostulation
,
I cut the matter short by telling her in my mild way
that I should give her nothing.
I thought so! said she, coloring to the eyes and holding
by the door as she spoke (another head was visible behind
hers), I thought so! that's always the way with them that gives
so much trouble.
Don't be saucy said I, beginning to feel a desire to see the
landlord, which I overcame by a quick effortN. B. I was
very glad of this after I had got awaydon't be saucy, my
girl. What you say is very truethose who give you most
trouble are those who pay the least, I dare say. But why
do they give you so much trouble? Because you do not
serve them properly. You give them first a knife and then a
fork, and you call it giving
you
trouble if they ring for either;
and the more they ring the more trouble they give, you say.
The more trouble
they
give! why it is you that give the
trouble. And after they have been kept waiting (for they
are the
waiters
, not you) or tugging at the bell-rope for the
hour together, would you have them treat you as well as
if you had anticipated every want, stood by their sides, or
answered the bell and served them with cheerfulness and
activity? No no, my girlthe maxim, though true enough,
is a very bad one for your purpose. When you are not paid
by the guest on his going away, it is a proofnot that he is
illiberal, but that you have neglected him; a proof that
you
are to blame, not he. I hope what I say now will be
of use to you; and I hope others may have the
courage
to do as I have done by you, and such as you
it would soon be worth your while to behave better; and
it would soon be worth the while of your ten-day traveller
to husband his pocket-money, and behave less like a
spendthrift
school-boy, out on a holyday-trip to see the world;
a sort of men who make travelling what it is nowa series
of petty vexations, whenever it is within the reach of their
pockets merely, because they have not the courage to
give a waiter no more than he deserves, and are afraid
of being thought shabby if they do not behave like fools
to the chamber-maid
Very fairbut I would not have you suppose, readermy
dear fellowthat I said to the girl in question all that I have
said here. By no meansfor long and long before I had
come to the words, No no, my girl, the maxim though true
enough is a very bad one for you and such as you, I had
pitched myself head-foremost into my gig, without observing
that another, a very superb one, was at the door, and that
somebody was standing at the large window whoif I had
caught a glimpse of her before I was fairly off, would have
put a stop to my speech for everif not to me. How long I
should have persisted in what I had to say to the red-haired
baggage, after I had left the house, if I had not been
disturbed
by a remark of the boy who drove me, I do not
know. The whole morning was like another dream to me after
he spoke; and to this hour, if I did not know from other
circumstances that I saw several things which I could not
have seen without leaving the gig, before we had come to the
broad high-way, I should be unwilling to swear that I did
leave it. I remember pretty well however that I had a little
child for my guide, that I walked on the sea shore, that I
descended
a steep hill by a very crooked path, and that I drank
a glass of mineral water, the brightest and clearest I ever
saw. I remember too that I labored up the steepest part
of the gap which is called the Black-gang Chine;1 that I
waded through the sand to the relief of a middle-sized
woman
who appeared to have stuck fast about half way upthe
precipicefor she was on her hands and feet, and there were
no less than four others at work, trying to pull her out of the
mud; I remember too that I ran up all out of breath and
offered my arm with a bow to herthat she refused it, in the
style of an amateur lady, and that I was very glad when I
saw her face that she had refused it, and very thankful for
my escape, having no doubt from her stiff carriage and from
all that I saw while she was floundering in the mud,I hope
I am not over bitterthat she was one of the two ladies
of no particular age who took their tea in a bed-room the
night before, without so much as a word of thanks to me
for the civil offer I made to turn myself out of the house for
their sake; and who the very next morning were bold
enough to occupy
my
room, without a word of excuse
or apology. I remember too that all day long I was
in the track of a party whom I could not escape, though
I tried in every possible wayif I stopped, they stopped
if I turned out of my path, no matter why, they were
sure to turn out of their path no matter how; and that
every half hour, during a large part of the day I was
meeting
with somebody or other whom I had leftI did hope
for eversticking in the mud, or half buried in a niche of
the cliff, or wallowing through the sand or the pebble-drifts
on the beach, or knee-deep through the rough heather on
the top of the precipice, where every path was a goat-path;
or floundering about in the shadow of the Land-Slip half a
day's journey behind me. Odds bobs! thought I, every
time I crossed their path or they mine, what are such people
made for! what on earth brings them here! They are just
like every body elseand whatever they do is done with such
an air of insupportable proprietyI do wish they would keep
out of the way. There is nothing to laugh at in their garb or
their walk; nor is there any thing to admire in either. Why
will they and such as they presume to appear in such a
romantic beautiful spot as thisI do wonder at their
courage
.
They do not help the scenery; they do not enjoy it
I can see that by their very step along the beachthey are too
careful of their feet, and their clothes are too well made by
half. They cannot be groupedthey would not endure
such a libertythey are out of place in a sea-view, and
would be frightful in a free, brave-spirited fresh landscape
what on earth is to be done with such cattle! They are
neither picturesque nor absurdand yet they are eternally
in your way. There they are again! there they are! turn
you to the sky or turn you to the sea, they are always before
youthree pair of short thick legs, a very upright motion of the
body, a very long waist or two, and a heap of broad
serious-looking
ribbons, intermixed with artificial flowers, and a bust
like the figure-head of a ship, with a silk habit pasted over
the neck and shoulders. All this I remember, and much
more. But I remember it as I do things that occurred to me
years and years agonot as if I had seen it in my sleep, for
the imagery of sleep is doubtful in a way of its ownit
is never so clear; nor yet as if I had seen it while I was
broad awake, or when I was unoccupied; but more as if
while I was where I might have seen what I have
described
,
my thoughts were away; or my soul engaged with
some hope which hindered me from seeing what was
before
me; and somewhat as if while occupied with a
view of the sea and the sea-beach, I had fallen asleep, or met
with some accident which made all that I saw participate in
the vagueness that we are troubled with in our sleep. I know
not how to describe the feeling so as to give another even a
tolerable idea of what I meanthe real and the unreal were so
mixed up together, when I came to recall the occurrences of
the day. I remember that I saw the Land-Slipthe green
earth and the huge rocks heaped up together as if the very
foundations of the island had given way, either to the
presssure
of the deep or to the weight of the cloud-capped,
stupendous
wall. I remember too, that I felt much
disappointed
when I saw the celebrated Black-Gang Chine, the place
where if you are to believe what people say now, a gang of
sea-rovers were concealed ages and ages ago, and that I was
quite angry when I saw the cave at Freshwaterit was any
thing but a cave, though I did not lack faith in the story that
I heard of its magnitude, till I had gone to it once in a boat
which lay rocking at the mouth, while I peeped in with a
disposition
to laugh in the face of the boatmen who kept
chattering
about the cavethe cave!a loose hollow in a heap
of loose earth, washed away by the sea, to the depth of a
few yards,till I had gone to it once in a boat I say, and
once more dry-shod after the sea had withdrawn, with a
desire to see how far it was possible for a guide-book to err
I do not like to say fib. And I remember too that I could
not believe the precipice to be more than eighty or
a hundred feet high, though I was assured by a
fisherman
,
who offered to ascend it and let fall a line to prove
his words, that it was either two hundred and twenty or
two hundred and seventy feet high, I forget which, directly
over the said cave; that I was lucky enough to meet with a
very good dinner which I ate mechanically, and without
knowing what it consisted of, in consequence of what had
occurred just before at the Needles(Of which more by and
by)that I looked for shells and sea-weed, bean-stones and
smooth pebbles, with a pretty woman who had never had a
6
peep at the sea before, though she had been sea-sick, she said,
on the passage from Southampton to Cowes!and that in
a word, I was completely bewildered through the course of the
day: for the truth is, that the first thing I recollect with positive
certainty is the shock I received from a remark of the boy,
while I was occupied with my speech to the chamber-maid,
who was then I dare say, full three leagues in my rear. I
wish I knew the time when this occurredfor while I know
from other circumstances that it must have been after I had
grown weary of looking at what I have described, if I were
to judge by my own recollection of the matter, I should say
that it must have been about half an hour after I had left the
Sand-Rock Hotelfor I was occupied with my speech to the
girl, when the boy at my sidewho never spoke but to say,
That is Mr. A. B.'s cottage, or that is the C. D. place
dropped a remark, which led to a conversation that drove
every thing else out of my head. It occurred pretty much in
this way.
Fine gig that, Sir
Fine gigwhere?
I don't see it now Sir (looking around), but shall afore long,
and when I do, I'll speak.
Was that the landlord I saw?
Don't know indeed, Sir
Don't you know whether I saw him or not, all the time I
was there?
No Sir.
What is his name?
Kemp Sir.
How old a man is he? Here I am able to give the very
words of the boy; they amused me so much that I made a
memorandum of this part of the dialogue on the way. How
old a man is he?
Sir?
What is his agehow old is he?
I am sure I can't tell.
Is he fifty, or forty?
Can't say.
Is he a young man?
I don't know.
Is he an old man?
Not very old, nor yet very young.
Here I gave up in despair. The boy was eighteen or
nineteen
;
he was familiar with the road and the house, and yet
I could not discover whether I had seen the landlord or not,
nor whether he was an old or a young man.
There's the gig, Sir!there it is now, goin' over the top
of the hill
What gig do you mean?
Why, that gig you saw at the door
I saw no gig at the doorOh, I remember now; a gig
drew up just as we were setting off.
Yes Sirand that 'ere lady at the window was waitin' for
it; andthere they go now! dashin' over the hillgo by
every thing on the road, Sirfine horse that Sir, should like
to drive that horse.
You spoke of a ladyI saw no lady.
O yes Sir, I beg your pardonmust have seen her;
she was at the window Sir, close by you, when you jumped
into the gig
StaystayI think I do remember something of the sort.
A woman you say at the window; surely I did see somebody
there, but I was in such a fever with what had just occurred,
and you started off in such a hurry, that upon my word I. I..
Pray what sort of a woman was she?
Oh
sech
a beautiful woman Sir!
Beautiful?
Oh yes Sir, and so grand Sir, and so lady-like, and as
proud as a duchess
Proud as a duchess! proudproudwhat a strange
comparison
for you boyas proud as a duchess!... Why, if that
comparison be a natural oneI stopped, for I felt as if I
had got under a shower-bath, such as that wherein the Ettrick
Shepherdbless him for the storyunderwent a trial of
courage
nay
worse, much worse, for I felt as if I had got hold
of the string, not of a shower-bath, like that underneath which
he stood quaking and shivering, but of such a water-fall as
Niagara
.
I was afraid to speak or move. I could hardly get
my breath, as he proceeded to show that the comparison
was a very natural one, for every body at the house had said
the same of her, that she was very handsome, quite the lady,
and as proud as a duchess.
Drive on boy, drive on
Oh Sir, that 'll do no good; we can't overtake that 'ere
horse; we get along very well in our way, but as for that
'ere man with that 'ere horse an' gig Sir,get up, will
you!why Sir, he'd make nothin' o' twelve mile an hour,
and we are most knocked up now Sir.
Get on, I sayget on.
Why Sir, I thought you seed her and was a-goin' to speak
to her.
Speak to whom?
Why, that 'ere lady Sir, what stood lookin' at you while
you was a-gettin' ready.
Looking at me?
Oh yes Sir, and by what she said to the gem'man there,
I thought she know'd you.
Why, what did she say?
Didn't hear rightly; something about Lunnun Sir, an'
Wessminster-Habbey
What!
Beg pardon Sirthey were both laughin' at you, Sir.
Laughing at me! what do you mean?
Why Sir, when you was at the bell-rope Sir, you know I
was at the door with the gig, a-waitin' for you Sir; and I could
see 'em both Sir;they were a-standin' up in the middle o'
the room Sir, and every time you pulled Sir, why that 'ere
gem'man there Sir, in the red shawl, he seemed to enjoy
it Sir, like any thing.
The rascal
I thought you were old acquaintances, may be
How dare you!
Beg pardon Sir; but he cum up to the window as if he
thought you'd speak to him; and there they stood Sir,
laughn'
both together Sir
Laughing togetherlaughing at me, boy?
I thought so, Sir.
And why didn't you tell me?
Lord Sir! I thought you seed 'em Sir, at first; and then,
I thought may be you know'd one another, and I didn't like
to spile a joke for you Sir.
Did the lady laugh too?
Not much Sir; but the gem'man did, all she could do to
hender him. I thought he 'd never stop agin, arter the pull
you made jest afore you jumped in the gig.
He be hanged.
Sir
You be hanged, I say
Yes Sir.
And if you open your mouth to me
Sir
, about that
gem'man, as you call him
Sir
before I have had a chance
to speak to himI'llI'llgive me the whip, it's of no use
to you, give me the whip, I say
With all my heart Sir
6*
Before I have had a chance to speak with himdo you
hear what I say?
Yes Sir
I'll break your neck, you dog you.
What for Sir; what have I done?
Stupid! If you open your mouth about the gem'man,
before
I have had a word with him, I'll beat you to death, that's
what I will!
Yes Sir
Drive on, drive on; we shall never get near the gig, if you
don't exert yourself.
We can't overtake it, Sir; but they 'll stop at the
Light-House
,
and you can see the lady there.
Drive on; they may take another road.
No Sir, there an't no other road for 'em to take. We shall
find 'em there, you may depend, or meet 'em afore we git
there.
Drive on, my good fellow, drive on. If you 'll bring me
along side o' that gig, I'll give you a crown.
Will you?here goes!and away we went spinning
over the smooth top of the hill, without noise or smoke, at a
speed with which at any other time, I should have been
satisfied
,
for it was like that of a ball discharged over the green
turf, by a strong easy player.
There they be Sir; there 's the gig at the door yer see
I told you so! and there 's the footman's horse that I saw,
gallopin' arter the gig; and now Sir, when I drive up to the
gate Sir, if you jump out and walk down to the Needles there,
or may be you'd like to see Allum Bay, nice place that Sir,
every body goes there; prettiest sand ever you saw in your
life grows there, and all sorts o' colors,whoawhoawhoa
there Sir, now if you 'll jump out Sir; you'll find me here
Sir, when you come backjest along side o' the gig Sir, if
you pleasewhoa there, whoa!
I took the hint; and throwing his fee to the boy, set off
toward a place where I saw a lot of people, and among
others
a man that I knew immediately for the drawing-master,
with a tall woman, that I knew or thought I knew even at that
distance, leaning on his arm. They walked upon the very
verge of the precipice; and kept aloof now, as they had three
years before, from all that were treading the same course.
1 In England it is a matter of course for the traveller to pay the
chamber-maid
so much a night, the head-waiter so much a meal, the boots, &c.
so much a day. It is their only wages. They hire their places instead of
being hired, and their perquisites are their wages. In general therefore
they are attentive and careful.
1 Believed by the neighbourhood, by authors of guide-books, and by
every orthodox tourist, to have been the refuge of a terrible band of
pirates
.
Chine is the word there used for cleft, gap, or fissure.
CHAPTER VIII.
ADVENTURE AT THE NEEDLES... THE CLIFF... THE SEA...
PERPLEXITY
...
THE DRAWING-MASTER TURNS OUT TO BEWHAT?
MAD?PERHAPS A PLAYER?
It
was a long while after I saw this manthe merry
gentleman
with a red shawl round his neck, who I began to fear
might have been the cause of all that I endured at the
Sand-Rock Hotelbefore I could make up my mind how
to proceed with him. It would be very foolish in me, though
characteristic enough, to pursue a stranger on the report of
a boy, and pick a quarrel with him for having had the
audacity
to laugh when I pulled the bell-rope at a tavern, as if the
house were afire. It would be too ridiculous to pursue him
with a charge of this nature, on authority of this nature. I saw
this, and I felt it with a continually augmenting force, every
step I took in the path which he had taken before me; and
yet, as if I was never to be any other than what I had
been all my life longa boya mere boy, a testy techy
froward quarrelsome boy, eager to take offence, though not
eager
to give it, I pursued the man for a whole hour,
determined
whatever should come of it, and however strange it
might appear to the ladywhose carriage and step and
stature
by the by, I did not think half so well of now that I heard
she had been laughing at meto encounter him face to face
where he could not escape, and then to be governed by
circumstances in my behaviour not only to him, but to her
her, for whom I would have risked my life the evening
before
,
and would yet, if I could be assured that she had
never laughed at me, or that she never laughed at all.
But some how or otheralthough I tried for an hour to
meet him face to faceI never could get near enough;
partly, if I must acknowledge the truth, because I did not
dare to walk upright so nigh the edge of the tremendous cliff
as they did, and partly because they appeared to suspect my
designfor they avoided me with especial care. The path
ran along within a few feet of the precipice; but instead of
keeping the path as did one or two of the boldest who had
gone a little before them, they actually trod between the
path and the crumbling verge. I bore it till I could bear it
no longerif they walked there to avoid me, as they
probably
did, I felt as if I should be answerable for every step they
took; and every step was on the very threshold of eternity.
Those who have been to see the Needles, which form so
attractive
a point for the voyager to the Isle-of-Wight will
remember
the path I speak of,it runs along the very brink of
a precipice more than eleven hundred feet high, and so steep
that a line with a lead may be dropped into the sea by one
who has no more courage than I hadbut just enough to lie
along flat upon the grass and look over, as I did. Years and
years ago, when this path ran a good way from the edge, it
was probably a safe one; but as every year a portion of the
soil has been carried away, the path has been brought
nearer
and nearer, till now it is dangerous enough to make
me shudder when I think of it; for in some cases, the
chalky soil shoots over the perpendicular side, as if to
invite
you to certain death; and in others, instead of being a
square wall of white earth from the beach half way up to
the sky, it is cut away into a sort of arched cavity two thirds
of the way down. Those who have been there too after a
heavy rain, will remember that the soil is very weak, that
huge masses are easily detached, that what are called the
Needles are nothing more than such masses detached,
several
within the memory of those who are yet alive, and one
with a power like that of the earthquake, for it was felt on the
other side of the sea when its overthrow took place; and
that near the verge of the cliff, at this extremity of the island,
where it requires a deal of courage for a body to peep over,
though lying flat upon his face at the time, stretched out
his whole length upon the slippery turf, and clinging to it,
as if he had been carried thither a moment before by the
winds or waves, and expected to be swept away by the next
wind or the next wave, there are two or three deep cracks
in the soil, dividing the whole mass for aught we know from
the top to the very bottom, the whole body of earth which
composes
that part of the islandcracks which it would be
tempting
Providence for a live creature to stray overunless
provided
with wings. For my part I would not have permitted a
dog to pass over one I saw, at the time I speak of, while
the wind was high, the turf wet and slipperyand sloping
to the very rim of the precipice, and the sea roaring a
thousand
feet below me about the base of the very cliff on which
I stood, and swallowing up as it were before my face the
huge piles that had been detached, one after another, ages
and ages ago, from the very part on which the people were
now gathered together, and walking about unconcernedly.
They who remember all thisand who that has been there
does
not
remember it?may be able to understand what my
feelings were, when I saw a woman walking with a bold free
step and a thoughtful air,
between
the narrow path I spoke of
and the verge of the precipice, while I trod with caution,
though I was a great way off; and what I felt when I saw
her approach a deep wide fissure, and step over it, and go to a
part of the cliff, which owing to the heavy rains that had fallen
every day for a week or two before, I do almost believe I
could have loosened with my foot.
I was afraid to pursue her another inchafraid even to
look at herready to call out and pray and beseech her to
go no farther; for I observed that when I stopped, she
stopped
as
if she had gone thither only to avoid me. Judge
of my feelings when I saw this, and when it occurred to me
that perhaps when I took the path, she took the outside of
the path next the verge to avoid me. I stoppedI
shuddered
I
felt as if in some way or other, I had been pursuing a
fellow creature into the very jaws of death, and I hurried
away with a feeling of bitterbitter self-reproach.
I speak of the woman as if she were aloneof the proud,
beautiful woman that I saw standing up on the wet sloping
turf, within a foot of the precipiceon the very brink and
threshold of the grave: while the winds blew and the
seas roared for their prey. I speak of her and of her
only, for I saw nobody but her at the timenothing but her
while she was in danger. But as I withdrew, I perceived
that she was not alone, that a man was with her whose
intrepid
carriage would have interested me a good deal at
another time; for he did not appear to know, as he trod
along the crumbling edge of the cliff, with a slow firm step,
that he was walking upright where others were afraid to
creep. After I came away, it occurred to me that there
was something a little odd in his behavioura something
which made me uneasy in spite of myself when I considered
the nature of my quarrel with himfor quarrel it was,
whatever
might be the issue; and I stopped as I drew near the
Light-House and walked a little aside from the path, meaning
to have another peep at him before we parted. But when
I looked up a minute or two afterwards, believing him to be
still a good way off, I was thunderstruck at perceiving him just
behind mepressing forward as if with a view to overtake
me before I could reach my gig, while the woman appeared
to be holding back and expostulating with him, as if it was
her wish to avoid me. To avoid
me
and why?
wherefore
,
thought I. Who is she?do I know her?does she
know me?What have I done, that she should try to avoid
me? How have I offended her.By heaven, I
will
know who she is! I
will
have the matter expounded! I
will
see her face.
Will you
? said somebody at my elbow; and before I
could recollect where I was, or what I had been saying
aloudor how I should behavethe man was before me
the very man, the very look that I had seen three years
before
,
as I darted through the porch of Westminster-Abbey
a pale serious man, with a look which it was not for me to
describe, though I could see grief in it, and care, and what
I took to be the ravages of a mortal anxiety. We stood face
to face with each other, and our feet were fixed on the turf
as though we had come out upon the great hill for sacrifice;
but we did not speak, and the woman who dropped her veil
when she saw me look up, so that I could not see her face,
the very veil that overshadowed her beauty when she
appeared
to me among the graves and the sepulchres of the
proud and the mighty, she stood before me now in the
attitude
of supplicationher breathing was audibleher head
was bowed with an air of unspeakable sorrow, and her hands
were clasped, and her arms were wreathed about his arm as if
she foresaw a terrible issue to the meeting.
EdwardEdwardI beseech you; do not speak now,
said the woman, with a low sweet whisper.
But why such alarm? What was there to be afraid of
so much afraid of? Was it altogether on his account, or
was it partly for me that she was in fear? If only for him,
why that peculiar manner toward methat slow motion of
the head as if to assure me that however
he
might regard my
behaviour, she was willing to put her whole trust in me?
But why cling to him so?why struggle with him at every
step? Why urge me away? We had not come together
for strife; we had not found each other out by the instinct of
hereditary foes. And what if we did stand still for a few
minutes by the way-side, or fix our feet in the turf and look
at each other for a while without speaking a wordwhat
was there so very terrible in that?
No no, for Heaven's sake! she added, on seeing him
about to address me. No no, dear! what are you going
to say? what are you going to do?
He smiledbut in such a way that upon my word I knew
not whether to knock him down, or to run off.
No no, dear; recollect yourself, you are deceivedhe
is not what you suppose, I am sure he is not; are you Sir?
Really madam, IImay I beg to know what I am
supposed
to be?
There Edward, there! will not that satisfy you?
He made no reply, but his countenance changedand his
hand shook as it lay upon her shoulder, and he drew her up
to his heartclose up; and it instantly occurred to me for
the first time that the poor fellow was a very unhappy man, a
little disordered by grief, and that I had nothing to do but
appease him and get away as fast as I could.
I pray you to believe Sir, said I, that in crossing your
path, I have not intended either togrieve or disturb you, I
was going to say; but recollecting how sensitive such people
are, and how poor an apology it would be, whether the man
was mad, or was not mad, I stopped short in my speech,
made a very low bow, and was getting away as well as
I could, when he arrested me by a remark which I did not
hear distinctly, but which referred to my behaviour on the
cliff.
7
You have sworn to see her face; you shall be gratified
Sir. You have sworn to discoverpho pho, Mary, what
are you afraid of? The gentleman appears to have a
Are you mad? continued she, in a whisper.
To have a quick eye for female beauty, and I hope,
after an oath such as we heard him swear, you will not
refuse to throw up your veil. As he spoke, he was about
to lift the veil; but she caught his arm with a cry that went
to my hearta quick low cry, which made me feel as if in
some way or other, I had been the cause of outrage to her.
That was enough! Though I would have gone
barefooted
over Europe to see the face of that woman, before she
betrayed her terror by that cry, I would not have permitted a
man to left her veil before me, after I did hear itno, not
for the wealth of a kingdom. But after all, why so afraid of
me? Did she know me? Did I know her? Had I seen her?
was I ever likely to see her againperhaps I knew, or might
know her family; these thoughts hurried swiftly through my
mind, as I repeated my bow and walked away with a
determination
to avoid hermuch as I desired to know the truth,
and to have the mystery cleared upuntil it should seem to
her good to let me see her face, which I now began to fear
was not altogether such as I had hoped forconsidering that
she had never suffered the veil to be blown aside for a single
moment while she stood before me. But I had not gone far
when a new idea struck me, and I felt my gorge rise, and my
cheek burn: for had she not asked him if he was mad, while
striving to subdue his wratha question that nobody would
ask of one who really was mad. I stoppedmy view of his
behaviour was changed anew. What if it should prove that he
was really a wag, that he had been the author of my sufferings
the night before, and that he had purposely gone out of his
way to jeer me, in the presence of a womanof that woman
too of her whole sex, about whose good opinion I cared most?
How should I bear to hear the story toldas a joke
perpetrated
upon a thorough-bred Yankee? How should I bear
to think of the matter after I had gone back to the land of
the Yankees? Who would believe me, though I swore that my
forbearance had proceeded from a belief that the man was
mad,for who could be worse off in that way than I
myself
was thought to be by a few of the people there, and by
not a few of the people here? And if I should say that my
compassion for a female had caused me to overlook the
behaviour
of such a man, who would not shrug up his shoulders
or thrust his tongue into his cheekwhen he knew that I
cared as little for the presence of a woman as I should for
that of a baby in such a case.
Before I could subdue the feeling that shook me, when I
thought of these things, though my mind was already made
up to know more of my gentleman before we parted, and to
deal with him accordingly, I heard some one cry out, Whoa!
whoa! as if a horse had broken away.
Let your horse go, you can't hold both, said my
persecutor
,
in a very mild voice, adding as he saw me, The foolish
boy has tied him with the long reinspho pho, what are you
afraid of childpho phohold on, Philip! hold onI will
be with you in a moment. Please to look to my wife, Sir,
that boy 'll be carried over the precipice if I don't give him
a pullpho pho, dear, what are you afraid ofthere Sir,
therekeep her out of harm's way for a minute or two, will
you!
His
wife!
I recoiled from herI started with dismayI
would have gone to the rescue of any thing or any body at
such a time, rather than approach her with my feelings, when
I heard the man who cast her upon me for protection, call
her his wife. His wife!the woman that I had pursued so
long, thought of so much, dreamt of so much, prayed for,
languished afteryea, languished after for three whole years,
with a vague sweet hope which I never durst acknowledge to
my own heart, a hope which has ended for ever now. Could
it be! was the brave creature a married woman after all?
a wife to that manto that man of all mankind! As I live,
I could not have touched her hand after thisI could not
have spoken to her with an audible voice, had it been to save
her life.
Oh Sir, Sir! said she, coming a little nearer with a quick
step, and with her hands locked and pressed together in such
a way as to keep her veil downI could see that, though I
could n't look upoh, she must be very ugly, I am sure of
that now, said I to myself; and I began to be much better
satisfied with what another might call a dispensationugly as
deathugly as the woman I saw at the PierAs the woman
I saw at the Pier!I started back a whole pace to peep at her
feetthey were the prettiest feet in the worldthey were
enough by themselves to give a sculptor the heart-ache
I never saw such a pair of feetsuch a character! such a fine
spirited instep! such ease and such expression, oh they were
any thing but such feet as are commonly admiredthe
footies
of grown babies.
Oh Sir, I shall be very safe: perhaps you had better go
do
go with him Sir; my poor Edward may require your
help; do go Sir!
Ma'm?
If you would be so obliging Sir
Yes ma'm
He may have need of you
Who ma'm?
Edward Sir, my husband, my dear,
dear
husbandoh,
if you knew him Sir, you would feel as I do
Your husband begulp! I was going to say a very
naughty word, but I recollected myself in season to make a
low bow, and assure her that she had nothing to fear, that the
danger was all over, and the poor dear man was quite safe.
SirSirwith a tone of surprise.
Whereupon I made another bow and took to my heels,
intending to meet her Edward half way, and ask him in so
many words whether he was or was not a madman; but she
was too quick for me, and followed so close after me that I
could not, and I passed on to my gig, without returning the
salutation that he vouchsafed to me as I ran by him.
But the boy, who had gone to Allum-Bay after a
pocketfull
of the sand which is to be had there,1 was not ready for
me, and I turned my steps to a part of the Downs2 which I
had not regarded before. The wind was so light that I could
not make my way in a straight course, and I observed that
while the men were holding on their hats and the women
their bonnets with both hands, two or three of the latter
without convoy, peradventure because of their age, though
all were beating up for the same harbor with the wind in
their teethA figure of speech thatfor many had no teeth
the fine horse of the stranger was pawing the turf, and
arching
his neck, and stepping about with a short quick step, as
if not wholly subdued, or as if terrified by the noise of the
sea, or the screaming of the birds, or the rocking of the gig,
which was actually lifted up two or three times by the wind.
Whoa, whoa, whoa, cried the boy that led him; whoa,
Sir, whoa!
Make him head the wind Philip, or perhaps you 'd
better
7*
take him out, said his master, who stopped and spoke to
the boy, as if he were his own child, instead of a servant.
Yes Sir
Lead him this way; the gig is too light for him now; we
must have somebody in it, or the poor fellowwhoa Sir,
whoa!will never be done shakingwhoa there!
Yes Sir
We are going up stairs to look out of the lantern; but we
shall be back in a few minutes. Have your nag ready, if
you please, when I come down, so that we may be off
without
delay. We have no time to spare now.
1 It is kept for sale by the children that live near, made up in white
bottles
,
and has a brilliant and curious effect, so vivid and so various are the
colors, and so distinct are they, lying in stripes all the way up the cliff.
2 Downs, so called from the descending nature of the land where sheep
are fed.
CHAPTER IX.
NEW SOLICITUDE... ESCAPE... QUARREL... PERPLEXITY...
Very well Sir, said the boy, who the moment his master
had turned his back, jumped into the gig and gave the
spirited
animal a touch of the whip.
My good fellow, cried I, that will never do; you could not
well choose a time so bad, nor or a spot so bad for breaking a
horse. But the boy would not regard me, and the horse
after two or three plunges, threw down his head, and fixed
his fore feet and stood stock-still. I did not care much for
that; I was more afraid of his running back over the
precipice
,
or setting off at full speed for the declivity before him,
where he would have met with no check nor barrier on his
way into the sea.
The devil take the horse! cried the boy, he 'll break
somebody's
neck yet, afore he 's done.
You 'd better leave the gig, I answered. He may start
before
you know it, if you stay there.
Well Philip, what is the matter? cried a voice from a
window that overlooked the spot.
He won't move a step, Sir, all I can do or say.
Nohave you tried the whip?
I gives 'im a little o' the whip now an' then Sir; but he
don't care a straw for it.
No
No Sir; never seed him behave so afore in all my life.
Stay where you are; don't move, don't strike him, I 'll be
with you in a moment. My good Sir! speaking to a fellow
near me who had been very busy, I beg you to keep out of
the way. The horse will do well enough in a moment or two
if you let his ear alone,whoa there, whoa!
Before you could have counted five, the stranger was on
his way toward the gig, into which he leaped immediately,
without a sign of trepidation or hurry.
Get down, Philip, get down my good fellow, and keep
out of the way, said he, gathering up the reins with a light
free armwhoa boy, whoa; give me the whip,and
whatever
you see me do, don't interfere; now is the time to cool
his courage. Whoa, therewhoa
Before I could move or speak, and before a soul of us
could interfere, the animal reared in the shafts, turned short
round with a giddy whirl, and sprang off toward the edge of
the cliff before me.
One solitary cry from the house, and though it was
followed
by scream after scream, she who uttered that cry was
immediately
still as death. But such was the power and
self-possession
of the driver, that he steered away in a sort of
continued circle so as to avoid the cliff, and with it every
other danger, till he passed near me; when seeing that the
horse had a disposition to go straight forward, although his
head was brought round so as to touch his left-shoulder, and
that he leaned away, so that if I took the outside edge of the
circle, it would be safe and easy for me to stop him, if I
could once get hold of the reinsI knew my own strength
I determined to get hold, and if the reins did not give way, I
knew that I could pull the creature down upon his knees, if
it were necessary. Hardly had I conceived the idea, when
a good opportunity occurred,he passed near me, and after
a short run, by the side of the gig, I succeeded in catching
the loose rein without checking the peculiar action of the
horse, though he bore me along with him at every leap, till
I heard some one say, in a loud angry voice, Let him go Sir!
what the devil do you mean! let him go, I say!
It was not in my power to let him go, till I saw the whip
raised over me, and a female running toward us with her
bonnet off, and her garments flying in the wind.I have
no recollection now of what I said in reply, or of what I did
I only know that if the man had struck me with a whip, I
would have driven him over the precipice or led him over it;
I only know that I flung awry, that I fell on my face, that I
heard a tremendous outcry, and that when I leaped upon my
feet, I saw the gig running on one wheel in a narrow circle;
the horse leaning quite as much over on one side as they do
in the riding-school, the driver bending forward with his arm
over the creature's back, one of the reins dragging on the
turf, and a female before me with her lips apart and her
black hair flying looseGreat God! I never did see any
thing so beautiful or so grand!
Oh save him! save him! cried she, with a voice that
made me willing to risk my life on the spot.
I
will
save him! said I. And I did save him. But I had
more trouble than I expected; for though the man was
willing
enough to be saved now, and the horse giddy with his
career, both were obstinate as death, and I had a narrow
escape after all. But I did save himI didand I believe
the woman would have kissed me, if I had not checked her
as she ran up to me with tears in her eyes, and caught my
hands, and held them to her heart.
Very fair, upon my word! You have a deal of courage Sir,
and you a deal of gratitude Marywhoa, whoa, whoa!
said the stranger, with a look which I knew not how to
understand
,
so much was there in it of what I should have
called
sheer pleasantry at another time, with so much of that
grave inflexible manner which appeared habitual to him.
He stood brushing his coat sleeve as he spoke, and holding the
horse by the head-gear.
Oh, I am
so
happy! she added, going up to him and
throwing her arms about his neckso happy dear, that I
could kiss the whole world for joyyou, and him, and every
body else in it.
Well then, if that be the case child, the sooner we are off
the better, said hepushing away her thick hair with a smile
as he spoke, and whispering a word in her ear, at which I
saw her start and color to the eyes, saying
EdwardI cannot bear such levity.
Pho pho; then if you won't, another will: Sir, we
must be better acquainted. Will you go with my wife
to the house where she can get her veil, and say what she
desires to say to you, for your manly behaviour to me, after
my strange mistake
What mistake Sir?
No matter nowwill you be so kind as to go with her?
I hesitated
Or will you stay here and hold my horse?
I would rather stay here and hold your horsebut I see
little need of that now, said I, piqued at the familiarity of his
manner. It was just as if we had been brought up together
as if we had known each other at school. Your servant is
coming this way.
Is heI am glad of it; he 'll do better.
Sir!
Mary dear; run forwardI 'll be with you directly; I
must have a word or two with this manhe is determined
to pick a quarrel with me, any body may see that.
A quarrel! O Sir! I entreat you
Pho pho, Mary, don't be afraidyou have nothing to fear.
I know the temper of my man; make yourself easy.
What the devil do you mean, Sir?
Pshaw, let her escape first, if you are what I take you to
bea gentleman.
I could bear this no longer. Sir, said I, with a very
dignified
air, I will thank you for your cardhere is mine.
Your behaviour to me is of a nature
To require explanationvery truevery true; there's my
cardI know what you mean to say, and there 's what you
requirean explanation.
I felt rather odd in this part of our dialogue; I began to
wish I had been a little more wary; I had even some idea
of backing out, and was putting on a superior look for the
purpose, when happening to glance at the card which I held
in my hand, I forgot myself so far as to read the name
aloud
Piper, said IPiperwhat Piper?
Peter Piper, said he.
I bowed
Peter Piper, he repeated, with a look, which now that I
know his true character, appears to me to have been the
beaudeal
of high comedy. Peter Piperyou have heard of
him perhaps?
Not that I know of Sirgood morning Sir.
NoHave you not heard the verses about him?
You are trifling with me Sir!
By no means. Peter Piper picked a peck o' pickled
pep
Damnation, Sir
What 's the matter now?
Are you laughing at me?
Ilaughing at youLord bless you, no!
Good morning Sir; you shall hear from me
Pho, pho, don't make a fool of yourself
SirSirI will not bear this; I am going away, and if
you stop me again, I 'll knock you down.
Will you indeed?
I will indeed
Then I shall not stop you again, though I confess I do not
see how you can knock me down, if I do
stop
you.
I sayMr. Peter Piper
Colonel Peter Piper, if you please, Brother Jonathan.
What!I was thuaderstruckWho are you!
Who am Iwhothere 's my hand, Sir. I respect
youI admire you. Go with me, and while I am teaching
you to respect me and admire meto say nothing of my
wifeI shall do my best, Mr. C H (calling me by my
fictitious name) to cure you of some of your follies. Pho
photake my hand, will you?
No.
You 'll wish you had.
Colonel Piper
Faugh! don't behave like a baby.
Colonel Piper, I say
My name is not Piperwith a bow.
Not Piper!
No Sir.
Your card says Piper.
Very true
What am I to suppose?
Whatever you pleaseanother bow.
I will bear this no longer. What
is
your name, Sir?
Whyaathat depends very much upon
circumstances
.
Upon circumstances! How socircumstanceswhat do
you mean Sir?
Lord Lord! How inquisitive you areconsidering our
short acquaintance.
Fire and fury! what do you mean Sir? I will not be
trifled
with.
No!
No Sir
no!
Very wellthrusting his hand into his bosom with an air
that provoked me beyond expression, though I recoiled a
step or two and prepared for the sight of a pistol or a knife.
You see that I am provided for whatever may occur
lugging
out as he spoke, not a knife nor a pistol, but a heap of
cards, no two of which appeared to be alike.
Sir, continued I, if you suppose
Pho, pho, keep coolI have a score or two of these about
me.
Keep cool?
You do not understand me, I perceive.
Understand youno indeed, who on earth could
understand
you?
Let me clear up the matter. My name as I have told you
before depends pretty much upon circumstances. I have
your card in my pocket now, along with forty more that I
have picked up much in the same way.
Well
Wellif I should happen to meet with anybody else in the
humor that I found you in, I shall make use of your card
Make use of my card! How Sirin what way?
Oh, in several ways, but on such an occasion, I should
bow as much like you as I could, heave up my chest, and
pop your card into his hand.
The devil you would!
Oh yeswith a bowthat's my way.
I laughed in spite of my wrath. Who are you? said I,
what are you? I must know more about you.
Go with me to the house and you shall know more about
me.
To that house there?
8
No, to my houseto the cottage; you are out on a trip
to see the country I suppose?
I am
I thought so. Rather a queer kind o' chap
Sir!
And as we have nothing better to do, if you have a day
or a weekto spare, and will put up with such a dinner,
and with such a bed as my wife can give you
Your wife
By the way, what do you think of her?
Oh, by Jupiter, but the man is mad! thought I, when I
heard thisI am satisfied now.
Pho pho, what are you afraid of? Will you go, or will you
not? We have no time to lose; the wind is up you see, and
it will be dark before we get home. What say you to the
offer
,
yes or no?
I hesitated. Give me your real name first.
What say you to the name of Molton?
Molton?
Ay, Edward Molton.
Gracious Godwho are you!
Or if you do not like that, I have two or three more at
your service.
Two or three more?
Six or eight more to be made use of according to the part
I have to play.
Oh, ho! thought I. Have I trapped you, my gentleman,
caught you at last, hey; nothing but a stage-hero. No
wonder
he is able to carry a joke through, page after page, as if
it were a scene out of a play.
For example now, said he, as I drew upwhat say you
to the name of Echo?
Of Echozounds!
Or of Randolph, or Copely, or Peters, or Harwood?
Who on earth are you?
Don't swear
on earth
I am what you would never guess.
Do you know me?
Yes.
Have you been over sea?
Yes.
In America, I mean?
Yes.
You stagger me. Perhaps you have been in
New-England
?
I have.
Bless my heart, when?
About a year ago.
Ah, perhaps you are an American yourself?a native?
Perhaps I am not.
Very well, whatever you are, you have bothered me more
than I was ever bothered before, in all my life.
What say you now to my proposalYes or no?
Yesyeswhatever may come of it, yes!
Very well. So much for knowing how to deal with you.
You authors are all alike.
Authors
You are to be tickled as we tickle a trout.
And you players are all alike, you are to be dealt with
as we deal with a gudgeon.
Players!
Players! you are of the stage, arn't you?
No indeednot of the stage where men
play
.
What are you then?
That's none of your business, my dear Yankee.
What could I do? There was no knocking a man down
for a word, which while it was very bitter and very true,
might pass for a joke, by the manner in which it was
delivered
.
The question I put was that which a thorough-bred
Yankee would have put in the woods of New-England; but
then, with him it would have been either the first or the
second
question after he fell in the way of a stranger, while with
me, it was the fiftieth or the hundredth.
CHAPTER X.
THE COTTAGE... MYSTERIES...
Well Mr. C. H., how do you like your room?
Like it Sir
Don't call me Sir, I beg o' you.
What on earth am I to call you? Give me a name to
address
you by, and I will answer your question.
You will?five to one o' that.
Five to one of what, pray?
Five to one that after I give you abut no matter now;
we shall see. What if you call me Piper?
Piper! Would you have me say Piper to any body that I
cared for, after the conversation we had yesterday?
Ten to one, if you dareWhat say you to Copely?
Why do you choose that name; would you keep me in
one everlasting fidget while I am with you?
Fifty to one, by Jove. How do you like Edwards?
Fifty to one! what do you mean by that, pray?
You shall know before I have done with you; Edwards
may do, for Edward is part of my true name.But softly,
softly, you have not said how you like your roomit is rather
dark to be sure, but I hope you may like it, for Mary has
been at work all day fitting it up for you.
Marywhat Mary?
My wifeit is your room now.
My
room now
your
wife?
Ay to be sure, though you seem to think I have made a
mistakeperhaps in the phraseology. What's the matter
with youdon't you like it; rather small I confess, but very
snug, put in order for you by Mary herselfpoor Mary!
8*
Poor MaryI beg your pardon. How do I like itthis
dear little snug bed-roomit
is
a bed-room, hey?
Yes.
Her bed-room?
Our bed-room, if you please.
Oh, your bed-roomHow do I like it? with that fine old
tree there overshadowing the thatched-roof, and the
grapevines
clinging to the little diamond-cut window like a
transparent
green curtain; how do I like it! Pray did you ever
read one of Miss Owenson's books, the Wild Irish-Girl, or the
Wild Irish-Boy, or some such name
Yes.
And don't you remember a passage where somebody says
to somebody else (I've a wretched memory for names) that
somebody said to her, How do you like dancing?
whereupon
,
says the Wild Irish-Girl, I could not help thinking of
somebody who once asked me how I liked poetryhow I
liked
poetry! oh my God. Now poetry is only a sort
of aof aof a, I forget how she explains poetry now,
but dancing she calls the poetry of motion, adding thereto,
Oh what a beautiful idea!
Well
Well!
You have not answered my question yet, my good Sir.
What question?
I asked you five minutes ago how you liked your room.
And I have answered you with a speech of Lady Morgan,
while she was overflowing with enthusiasm about the word
like
, and what more would you have?
What more! a direct answerif it were possible to get one
out of a real Yankee.
Don't be so absurd as to imagine, I beg of you, that the
real Yankee
cannot
answer a question as well as
Will
not, you meanthat is the charge.
A question as well as another, Mr. Edwards
Ha ha ha! Mr. C. H. But will you be pleased to answer
mine?
By the by though, that reminds me of asking you how
you came to know my
fictitious
name of C. H.
Just as I know your
real
nameas I know that of most
people who are in the trade of authorship.
Of authorship! oh ho! thought Iof authorship, hey?
Cat's out o' the bag now! neither a drawing-master, nor a
player. Nothing after all but a retired author, I dare say.
God preserve me! a pretty kettle o' fish I've got into.
Before
the week is over, I shall see a heap of illegible
manuscript
laid in my way to revise, a tragedy or two, a poem or
two, or a novel in three huge volumes, with a desire that I
will speak of their faults in detail.
But how, said I, as soon as I could speak, how do you
obtain this knowledge about authors and authorship?I had
him there I thought.
Another time if you pleaseafter tea.
Why not now?
We are expected below now. Mary is preparing the
turf-seat by the door, and you shall have your tea in the open
air to-nightif you 'll be good. A week more and that
pleasure will be done with for the season. Are you ready?
I'm only waiting for you.
For meyou waiting for me?
I am indeed.
Explain yourself.
After we are belowI want my wife to share the joke;
we are going to have
such
a laugh
Indeedabout what?
About you.
Indeed.
By the by though, as you say, do you remember a joke
told by somebody of somebody else, in a book the title of
which I forget now (I have a bad memory for names)the
latter somebody a countryman of yours, who had been
domesticated
here, a real native Yankee.
How do I know? What is the story?
Why, the joke is that Mr. A, the Englishman, who knew
a good deal of the Yankees, and B, the Yankee, who
ought to have known a good deal more of them, had a
dispute
together touching the habit which I observe in you, of
not answering a questionexcept by another question.
In me!
Yes, in youstrange as it may appear. Well, Mr. A and
Mr. B made a bet. And while they were talking, a native
Yankee hove in sight. Now is the time to decide the bet,
said A, if you are agreed. With all my heart, said B, and
you shall put the question. Agreed. I say, Doctor C,
(addressing the other native) what is the reason that the
Yankees always answer a question by asking another
question
?
Why
do
they? said Doctor C.
And you put faith in such a story said I,
you
that have
been among the native Yankees?
Very fair, just what I said Mr. C. H. You deny the
truth of it, I see.
I doit is very improbable, even for a joke; and what is
more, though the question was a very adroit one, and
calculated
to produce any thing but a
yes
or a
no
, I maintain that
the people of my country are no worse than the shrewder
people of your country, in this matter.
Ah, you have said all that before.
Iwhenwhere
About a year ago, in Blackwood
Zounds! who are you?It is from Blackwood then that
you learned my fictitious name!
No indeedwhatever I may think of Blackwood on other
accounts, I would not scruple to trust him with my true name
as a contributor, if my life depended on itI will say that
for himHe is faithful in such matters.
Oh, he 's an authorone of the Blackwood school, I'm
sure of that now, said I to myself. But he proceeded
So you deny the charge, do you?
Yes, I do.
Beautiful! Do you know that we have been together
now for about half an hour; and that during all that time
you,
you
yourself, Mr. C. H. have not answered a single
question of mine, otherwise than by a question of yours?
Pho phoas you say.
I do not wish to mortify you, but such is the fact.
Mortify!
Yet more; you know the question I put you some
minutes
ago, about this room; you know I have repeated it over
and over again
You are going too far now.
And yet as I live, up to this moment I have had no other
answer to that simple query.
Pshaw!
What say you, Mr. C. H., guilty or not guilty?
Pho pho.
Mary!
The door opened and his wife appeared, with her foot
just over the threshold.
Why Maryhow you blush! What is the matter with
you?
I could not see her blush; I could see nothing but the
little foot.
Come in you simpleton; why what ails youwhy do you
hesitate?
I looked up and saw her standing just outside of the door,
with her head a little advanced.
What are you afraid ofcome in, will you?
It is not our room now Edward.
No more it is, faith! I beg your pardon, Mr. C. H.;
and I beg yours, child. But youheywhatyou've been
crying?
No, Edward.
No! why the tears are in your eyes now.
From laughing then I assure you, not from crying.
So so! laughing at what, dear?
Excuse me.
Pho pho, out with it: you overheard us, did you not?
Yes.
The whole of our dialogue?
Yesbut I pray you to explain how and why; do, my
dear Edwardfor I cannot bear to be regarded by Mr. H
as a conspirator.
Fiddle de dee! Mr. H will enjoy the joke as much as
you do, when you have told him how the matter is. He
then proceeded to say that he had entrapped me merely to
satisfy his wife that a genuine Yankee could not answer a
questionor would not. Having been a good while among
the Yankees, continued he, I thought proper to tell her the
other day that the story you have just heard was no
caricature
.
She regarded it as only a storya mere joke; but
I have convinced her now, I hope, that contrive a question
as you may, and bait it as you may, you will never catch a
bite from a real native.
But surely Madam said I, surely you are not satisfied;
you are not going to put faith in such absurdity; you do not
mean to give up the point, I hope?
She shook her head.
You
do!
I am afraid I must; for to tell you the truth, Iaa
Out with it, there 's a dear't will do him good.
Yes Madam, said I, out with it, I beg of you.
If you will promise to enjoy the joke
I will, Madam,I will!I do.
She looked rather serious; but before we had finished our
tea, I was able to keep my word, able to enjoy the joke, for
she repeated substantially the very conversation that I have
now detailed, and I was so struck with it, and with what she
said of my dexterity in avoiding every question, that I took
minutes of the dialogue from her own mouth.
But how shall I describe the evening that followed, the
days, the weekfor it was a whole week before I got away,
and such a week too! the happiest I had ever spent in my life.
And yet, strange as it may appear, when I left them, I knew
as little of what I desired to know, as I did the first hour we
met on the hill-top. Their very name was a mystery to me
their mode of lifethey saw no company, they appeared to
live only for each other. Day after day went by, and though
we were apparently at our ease, cordial and free as if we had
been brought up together from our very childhood, yet was
there a a something about both which troubled me, a sort
of acknowledged mystery that gave me pain. I felt as if
we were not associating on equal terms. They knew me
they were even acquainted with my family, he by having met
them in America, and she at second-hand, by hearing what
he said of them. Of course therefore, as I did not know
themas they told me over and over again with what was
intended for a smile, though it was any thing but a smile, that I
never should know them as they knew me, I felt in their
company very much as a man would feel, if he were thrown
with his face uncovered, among a party of masked people;
who whatever he might say, would not be persuaded to
unmask
,
and who while they journeyed with him side by side
over the familiar paths and among the every-day scenery of
life, with not only their faces but their hearts in shadow,
were always contriving to lead him toward the light, where
they could try experiments upon him in every possible way,
and watch the changes of his countenance the while, without
fear and without risk.
You are not well, said the woman to meI wish I might call
her MaryI cannot bear the name of Edwards now.Mrs.
Edwards! no faith, I would as lief call a creature that I
loved
a lady, as we do every thing that wears a cap or is
intended
to wear a cap in America. How 's your
lady
to-day
?
I have heard one retail shopkeeper say to another in
the republican parts of my country, and a bit of a
haberdasher's
boy talk by the hour together of the
ladies
whom he saw at
such or such a singing-school or dancing-school, and both it
may be, while they were laughing at the free negroes, for
making a similar inquiry of each other. You are not well
I am sure, said she, laying her dear little hand upon my arm
as she spoke (N. B. her husband was there) and throwing
aside a little cap that she had been at work upon by stealth,
every day and almost every hour since I had been at
the cottage.
Where 's your guitar childwhat say you to a little
music
,
Mr. H?
You are very kind Sir, butand here I made a full stop.
Sir, again!
Well well
I am very kind, but what
I know she plays welland I never enjoyed any
music
half so much in my life, as I do that strange little serenade
of hers; but some how or other, I do not feel to-night, as
ifas ifas if Iin short, I beg your pardonI don't know
what I was going to say
That 's your fault Mary
My fault! how so
Do you see where your hand is? It was on my arm.
Ah
Pho pho, why do you snatch it away?
Really, I do not know
And you did not know I dare say, that your hand was
there?
No indeed, I forgot myself some howMr. H. has been
with us so long now
So
long!
said I.
Very civil to be sureadded her husband.
You know what I mean, Edwardyou distress me; you
know that with some people we get acquainted in a few
hoursand you know that since we have had Mr. H. with
us, we have been as much together as we should have been
perhaps in a whole year of common acquaintanceof such
acquaintance Edward, as we look for at Ba
Mary!
So thatin a word, continued the wife with a look of
embarrassment
,
I feel toward Mr. H as if I had known him a
great while, and just now, on seeing him look so serious, to
tell you the truth Edward, I forgot myself
Very fair
I mistook him for you, I mean
Better still.
No no, I beseech you Edward; no no, it is unkind of
you to teaze me in this way.
You
do not feel, nor do I
nor do you wish me to feel as if I had known him only a
week.
9
Nor have we known him for only a week, child. We had a
pretty thorough knowledge of his character before we saw him.
Before you saw me, said I in astonishment. Howin
what way?
By two or three of your mad novels. Mary, do you
remember
asking me if Mr. H. really was a
EdwardEdwardyou are going too far.
Pho pho, I 'll tell you how that was, Mr. H. About a
year after I saw you in the Abbey, I discovered who you
were, and having already met with some of your mad
rigmarole
storiesdon't bowin America, two of which I had
brought away, I went home to my wife and told her that I
had seen you; that I had found out
who you were
, and that
you were the veritable author of , the only book of the
whole that I was ever able to get through with.
How
can
you say so, Edward!
It is very true upon my soul, dear; but I say though, Mr.
H. I never shall forget her look when I told her that I had
found out who you were. Well now
is
he crazy? said
she.
For shame, Edward
For shame! why socan you deny it?
She made no reply; but endeavoured to change the
conversation
,
so that I could perceive how the matter was.
And so, you really thought me crazy? said I.
She hesitated, and struck the guitar and made up her
mouth for a song.
I know you did; but still I should like to know what led
you to form that opinion.
She smiled. If you are quite serious and will take what
I say, in the humor which appears natural to youfor
to-night
you are so altered by your gravity, one hardly knows
how to speak before youI will confess the truth.
Do, Madam, doyou will gratify me very much.
Perhaps not. She then proceeded to inform me that
when they first saw me in the Abbey they both agreed in
believing
me to be crazymy stepthe look of my eyes, the
manner in which I darted by them at the door, with my hat
off and my hair tumbled up in a very odd sort of a way, with
the wind blowing through it; oh, it was quite impossible to
mistake such symptoms, and they even went so far as to ask
the verger why he had let me in; but he excused himself,
it appeared, by saying that I passed him in a great hurry,
when it was rather dark and before he observed my face.
He agreed with them however in supposing me a little
touched
or so, and promised to keep a better look out for the
future
.
And so, said I, the fear that I observed in you, instead of
being the fear of aof aaabut proceed, I beg of you.
Well, when I heard that you were the author of
and of  which my husband had brought with him from
your country, and which we saw clearly were the works of a
madman, there was no more to be saidwe had no hope
left.
And pray, said I, what is your opinion of me nownow
that you have known me a whole weekdo you think
me crazy or not?
She laughed, and was going to lay her hand on my arm
again I do believe, but she stopped and smiled as I
repeated
the questionWhat say you, crazy or not?
A le-ee-eetle, as you say in Americaa leetle, I do
believe
.
Faith, but you have a pretty way of entertaining our guest,
Mary, said her husband. You have touched him, Is ee.
You have made him more serious than ever.
Very true said I, very trueas I ran over the history of
my own thoughts concerning the people before me. Very true,
as you say; what blockheads we are! And so the beautiful
theory I spunthe fair hypothesis I wove, while I stood in
the niche of the Abbey as they swept by meof what value
is it now? a theory that I prided myself so much upon, for
never theory was half so clear; an hypothesis whichoh,
never
was any hypothesis half so satisfactory. Of about as
much value as the cobwebs that were spun there at the same
time.
The niche of the Abbeywhat niche?
Why, a little dark niche, where I stood when you two
passed
me before I saw you at the door; you were lingering
behind all the rest of the company, and you must have
thought yourselves quite alone, I am sure
Why so pray?proceedMary!
Neither of you spokeand yourwhy, bless me! but I
begin to believe my dear Madam, that you
are
a
conspirator
.
A conspirator! she repeated in a fluttering voice, and with
a change of look that surprised me.
Yesyou are so pale now
CHAPTER XI.
INVESTIGATIONS... DOMESTIC SCENES... AUTHORSHIP IN
ENGLAND
...
EDITORSHIP EVERYWHERE.
She did not
speak
you say? continued her husband, rather
eagerly.
No.
Nor I? more eagerly but with affected carelessness.
No.
Very wellproceed. What was your theory; and why
is it of no value now?
Oh, it is only one of a multitude of errors into which I have
been led by you and her. Every time you open your mouths,
I have a new theory to explain the why and the wherefore.
Indeed
You are both a puzzle and a mystery asas
As somebody sayssomewherehey?
Precisely.
But we are curious to know what you thought of us when
you saw us in the Abbey.
Oh, I drew your character on the spot Sir, and yours too,
Madam; how you
will
enjoy the joke, when you come to
know what it was! I attributed the trepidation that I saw in
your looks, and the deep anxiety that I saw in yours, my
dear Sir, to ato aI beg your pardon, but II
Pho pho, continue to speak out as you have been
speaking
hitherto
freely
.
With all my heart, if you will continue to look as you have
been looking hitherto
cheerful
. But you are getting serious,
very serious, and your wife too. She is no longer the same
woman.
9*
You attributed our behaviour, my anxiety, and her
trepidation
to what?
Why, to a fear of your being discovered together, ha, ha,
ha
Ha, haha! very droll to be sure. Mary!
Edward
Very droll, to be surehaha.
Very
It never entered my head believe me, added I, that you
mistook me for a madman
We do believe you
Or else I might have been able to account for your
behaviour
when you saw me, in some other way.
Undoubtedly said he, with a very inquisitive look, which
I thought he appeared rather anxious to turn off with a smile.
What blockheads we are though! continued I, and then I
proceeded to describe the whole of my conjectures in the
Abbey; but I observed that when I spoke of the suspicion I
had of their not being man and wife, she appeared very
uneasy. And they interchanged a look together which
troubled
me.
In a word, you see what I have come hither for
Well Sirand what
have
you come hither for? said the
man, starting up as if I had avowed some treachery.
Edward Har for God's sake dearrecollect yourself!
I doI do
I have come hither said I, with a determination to know
who and what you are.
The woman looked at me, and grew very pale; and he
appeared to gather himself up for something serious.
I wish you
would
tell me who you are, continued I.
He looked me full in the face for half a minute or so,
before
he spoke, and then offering me one hand with a free
courteous air, and laying the other on his wife's shoulder
he replied No no, you 'll put us in a book if we do.
In a bookzounds! I 'll put you in a book if you don't!
Very wellthat you may do and welcome.
No no, dearno no, said his wife.
Fiddle de dee, sixpence! What have we to fear in a
cottage
like thisnot a mile from the sea, and a bridge over it
when we desire to escape
Edward!
To
escape?
said I.
To escape notoriety, I mean
Of course, what other escape
could
you mean! I added,
with a growing desire to know the truth, a desire which at
last became quite insupportable to me.
I will bear this no longer said II must know more of
you; or I must leave you, much as I like you both.
Very fair. Did you not undertake to be satisfied with
what you already knew of usif you could not know more,
when you were first invited over my threshold.
Yesbut
And did I not tell you that we saw no companythat we
had no neighboursthat our cottage was in a nook of the
hillsthat our very name was not a real nameand that our
only servant could not speak a word of English
Very truebut
And did I not say, that in begging you to stop at our
cottage
for a week, I was doing that which, if you knew the
whole truth, would prove to you that we set a high value on
your good opinion? Did I not say moreover that I urged you
to come, altogether on account of my wife, who having heard
so much of America, was curious to see a tame natyve? and
did I not say, over and over again, that if you could not be
satisfied with such fare, and with knowing little more of us
at the end of the week, than you knew at the beginning, you
had better not go aside from your way?
You didyou didbut I took it for granted that you
did so, only to irritate my curiosity. You know a good
deal of authorsenough to know that nothing stimulates one
of the trade like mysterymystery about any thing.
Very true.
Perhaps you know more of authors and of authorship than
you are willing to acknowledge?
Perhaps I do.
Perhaps you are a bit of an author yourself?
Perhaps I am.
Wellif I did n't think so!
I a bit of an author! Well done Yankee; ha, ha, ha!
I beg your pardon; I took you for one.
You took me for a player only a week ago.
Very true.
I a bit of an author! And here he broke out into a hearty
though rather strange laugh.
The woman herself appeared to enjoy the joke; and after
a short pause I ventured to repeat the query in a more
available
shape. You
are
an authorand after a pauseare
you not? said I. Come come, what are you afraid of?
between
friends, you know. It 's a lawful trade enough, though
a beggarly one.
How a beggarly one?
I pray you to observeMadam the conspiratorthat he
does not answer
my
questions now.
I do observe it, she replied, the water sparkling in her
eyes now that our feud was over.
I wish you would answer
me
,are you not an author?
No, I am not.
You have been, perhaps?
Nobut I will own that I had a wish to be an author, and
that I began to scribble with a hope which I clung toHe grew
very serious here, and the color flashed over his fine forehead
with a hope which I clung to as a mother would cling to her
first-born. It was the man-child of my youth. My heart was
heaving with ambition Sir, and God knows what I might
have done, if I had met with a little aid in the outset of my
headlong career. But I met with none Sirno aid, no help,
no courtesy, no sympathy. I was put aside for blockheads who
were better knownI had to deal as I could with booksellers,
and to negotiate as I could with booksellers' clerks. I had to
endure the judgment of editors, who cared for nobody whose
hand-writing and whose name were not familiar to them. In
short SirI could not bear the trials of authorship, I could
not endure the mortifications that authors are made to endure
so long as they are not popular; and I threw up the pen for
afor afor a prouder and a sharper weapon
Oh the swordI thought so.
He took no notice of the remark, but proceeded. I agree
with you. Authorship
is
a beggarly trade, and beggarly, not
so much on account of the pay, though no author can
possibly
earn so much in a year, as any one of a multitude of
shopkeepers, mechanics, and professional men may do, while
the majority of authors are kept in a condition more pitiable
than that of a clerknot so much on account of the pay, as
on account of the mode of dealing to which they are
subjected
.
They live from hand to mouthall men of genius do
and of course they are eternally in debt. And authors
having
a sensibility in proportion to their genius, are prodigal of
their money when they have itnever hoarding it up, and
of course are for ever at the mercy of literary by-bidders.
They are always working for a dead horsethey feel
keenly
they
never endure a slight, unless it be to escape
dishonor
,
and therefore too, they are always at the mercy of a
scoundrel tradesman, who when he wishes to defraud an
author, is quite sure to succeed if he can either put him in a
passion, or provoke him to a display of magnanimity. God!
how I suffered, before I had the courage to do what I see
now that I ought to have done years and years before!
And what was that, pray? He got up as he finished, and
paced the room with a look of sorrow combined with
irresistible
determination.
Dear
Edward! whispered his beautiful wife, staying him
as he strode by, with a look of dismay and perplexity, and
leaning with her whole weight upon his arm, and as he stooped
over, putting her mouth to his forehead, with an expression
of something more than loveit was piety.
Sir, continued he, after struggling with her a moment or
two,Sir, I have waited whole weeks for a few pounds that
were due me from an editor who had solicited me to work
for himwhole weeks, I assure you, when he was wasting
the money that belonged to his betrayed contributorsand
that woman there was languishing on a sick-beda
deathbed
,
we believed then. We were in want of the necessaries
of life, Sirmy health had given way under the toil which
he had imposed upon meI could neither eat nor sleep,
such was the state of anxiety into which writing for him had
thrown me. If I heard a knock at the door, it sounded through
my heartI had lost all confidence in myself; I grew
nervous
I
doubted whether I was writing EnglishI could not
write so much in a whole week as I had written with ease
in half a day, before I took to writing for a trade.
Upon my soul, I replied, the picture you draw is enough to
give any body the heart-ache; you are unjust in your general
remarks, but there is so much truth in what you say of your
own feelings, that you force my mind back to a period of like
suffering, which well nigh drove me mad.
Ah, but how little you know of the misery, the abject
heavy
misery of authorship. You are a lucky author
I a lucky author! God forgive you.
Yes, yes your books are read.
Query
And you are paid for what you write.
Am
I? I 'll tell you what it is; I have written more than
any man of my age that ever lived, I dare say; and altogether,
I have not received so much money, as I have known to be
made by the compiler of a story-book for grown peopleor
of a school-book for children.
Indeed
Ay, and what is more. The publishers have made out
no better than I.
You are merry.
Not at all. I defy an author to be merry on such a theme.
Well Sir, continued he, to proceed with my catalogue; I
have written paper after paper for the magazines, which I
could never get returned when they were rejected, till I had
written for them, or called for them, or sent for them over
and over again; nor paid for when accepted, till I had
quarrelled the money out of the editors or the publishers
Upon my word, you have been very unlucky. For my
part, I have always been paid, and well paid, for
magazine-work
,
though to be sure I have had some delay and some
trouble in two or three cases, where I had expected a
promptitude
,
a delicacy, and a punctuality, such as I had been
accustomed
to on the part of  you know whom.
Blackwood, I suppose. You have done with him now I
hear.
Yes, and he with me just now; but I have a crow to pick
with him one of these days. I like his journalit is quite a
prodigy in its way, fullbrimfulto riot and uproar of young
and vigorous lifea paper that has no equal for one kind of
writingthe bold and familiar. He has a plenty of courage
toohe has published for me what no other
magazine-proprietor
in the three kingdoms would have dared to publish.
It was with him that I began my career in this countryhe
always paid me fairly and promptly, and sometimes liberally
and I would have died to serve either him or his paper; I did
nearly die oncefor I dropped out of my chair while I was
re-writing an article for him which he had accepted, and
which, as on account of its great length he could not
immediately
publish it, he had sent to me to look at again before it
appeared, if I thought proper; and I grew so nervous at one
time, that I did not sleep for a weeknay, not for three
weeks as an honest man should sleepand yet,
notwithstanding
all this, I have done with what he calls The Maga.
Ah, but you have had no wife toglancing at Mary
to trouble you, or you could not speak in this way of
magazine-writing
.
Very trueno wife to trouble me.
Delay is death Sir, at such a time.
I believe it, and worse than death, if you know that while
she is dying, the money that you have earned by her
sick-bed
,
has been lavished by a profligate upon the pleasures of
a profligate.
Pho pho, as you say. You are speaking too bitterly; and
you have been too easily discouraged. Let me tell
you what I have had to endureI, whom you regard, as a
fortunate author; and see if you do not feel more charitably
disposed toward that class of slave-drivers, who in this
country
are called editors. You do not consider what they have
to endure. You overlook their suffering. Their character is
in issue twelve times a year, if they superintend a magazine;
four times a year if it be a quarterly. Think too of the
loads of paper they have to ransack, of the caprice and
self-love
and obstinacy of their chief contributors; of the
lengthiness
and talkativeness and repetition of new contributors who
are paid by the acre; of the consistency which they are bound
to keep up in some degree throughout a number at least, if not
a volume; and of the irreconcilable views that men are
pretty
sure to have upon a subject, when they have each a
reputation
at stake; and how unwilling such men are to be trimmed
away and fitted and jointed and dove-tailed by other people.
Think too of the multitude of friends and acquaintances who
are always waiting to be served first, and who are only to be
served by a sacrifice of principle or character, nine times out
of ten. Think too of the friends' friends, who are eternally
in the way of an editorintroduced by nobody knows whom,
as people worthy of patronagefor charity-sake.
Ah Sir, I begin to perceive that an editor has no such
easy life.
Easy life! no indeedwere I an editor I would have
nothing to do with a paper, if it came in the hand-writing of
any body that I personally knew; for why pay such a price
for literary ware, if it will not secure you a choice of the
market?
Very true.
Think too of the multitude more, who on the strength of
a half-hour's acquaintance over a dinner-table, expect to be
received as the familiar friends of an editor, if they choose to
trouble him with one of their insupportable visits. Oh, my
dear Sirtalk of the miseries of authorship! they are nothing
to the miseries of editorship! An author may go where he
likes, and write where he likes, but an editor is for ever at
work in the same spot, like a squirrel in a cageor an author
in a tread-mill.
A very pretty comparison.
10
Very, and then to have to deal with men of the same trade
is of itself a misery; to have to judge their work is yet worse,
to say nothing of reading itbut if you are an author, and
are to judge the work of authorsthe most irritable creatures
on earth, your misery is complete.
Upon my word, Mr. C. H., you appear to feel every
word you say.
I
do
feel every word I say. An author has no bowels for
an editor. If the editor is an author, like Mr. Campbell for
example, he is thought to be guided by jealousy whatever he
may do, when it is fifty to one, that being aware of what may
be said of him by a brother chip, he would go out of his way
to speak
more
favorably of him than he deserved. And if
he is not an authorlike Mr. Jeffry for examplethey regard
him as not qualified to judge. Write a book yourself Sir,
they say, before you pretend to judge of our books.
You are making out a good case for the people that I have
hitherto regarded as the very drones of literature.
And then, my dear Sirto have to be answerable for the
vices and errors, not only of yourself but of every body who
may happen to write for you
And with a perfect knowledge, that if a blunder be made by
the author he will never speak of it, while made by
you, he will be sure to proclaim it wherever he goes; and
that if by one of your allowed emendationsa very ticklish
thing for you to make by the way, if your man be much in
favor with the public, or if you are disposed to do more than
cross a
t
, or dot an
i
for himyou have got him out of a
scrape, or have made him say a very brilliant, a very wise, or
a very beautiful thing which had never entered his head but
for you, he will be sure to have the credit of it, and equally
sure to drop never a word about your agency; while if you
should happen to mistake a favorite word of his, or spoil a
joke, or mismate a bad antithesis or two, whether in reading
the proof or in spelling the manuscript, you know that if you
should live a century you would never hear the last of it.
Preserve me from all editorship!
How devoutly you say that, my dear Edward, whispered
Mary, with an arch look that appeared to have a deal of
meaning
in it, for he shook his finger at her and bade her be quiet,
and she put up her lip, so like a child, that I could have
kissed her for itupon my word I could. So! thought I
so so! he may know more about editorships after all than
I dowho knows? That woman was a very odd creature
by the by. She told me herself one day when we were
together
among the treeswith a sky overhead and about us
bluer than I ever saw before, and the sea before us like eternity,
that she knew not which predominated in her character, the
child, the woman, or the man. But I could have told her
She had the courage and thought of a man, the heart and
the look of a beautiful, high-spirited superior woman, the
tricks of a childI do not mean of your every-day child,
but of a dear, simple-hearted, pure and loving child with
a brow all of wisdoma lip all of love,and the
carriage
of a something made of all three, so that each
preponderated
at times, and neither for a long time. But to my
story
Preserve me from all editorship, said he.
How devoulty you say that, answered she.
Very much as if you were praying to escape the
governorship
of another Barrataria, answered I
But go on with your plea, added Mr. EdwardsN. B. I
can bear to call him Edwards, though I cannot bear to call
his wife so.
Very well, said Iand then to have to read so much that
you have read forty times before, so much that you are
pleased
with, you know not why--when you come to see the proof--
and so much that you are weary of, you know not why, till
you are called upon to pay for it. And then after all, to be
pursued by disappointed authors and bored by successful
onesto say nothing of the neuter people, who are accepted
occasionally, just enough to keep them in a state of
perpetual
bad humor with you; and then to be obliged to say civil
things on a bit of paper not five inches square, to every body
that you refuse to trade with, lest he may call you out, or
attack
you in some blackguard paper of the day, or show you
up in a bookor throw himself into a horse-pond for your
sakeoh you have no idea, I tell you again, of the miseries
of editorship.
I begin to believe you;but now for the miseries of
authorship
:
you have had your full share it would seem
That I have; but hear my story and judge for yourself.
When I left America, it was in the hope
Here I was interrupted by a knock at the door, and I
stoppednot so much on account of the knock, though it
was the first I had heard for better than five days in the deep,
green solitude where they had concealed the cottage, as on
account of the behaviour of the man, who rose I thought
with a look of more than usual anxiety, and stood as if
debating
with himself whether to go to the door or not.
I did not hear the dog Mary, did you?
No, she repliednoit is very strange.
Very
, dear; but we have been so occupied you know, that
if she had barked, we might not have heard her. God bless
me, it is very odd
Harkharkthat's her growl, I am sure.
I am not so sure Mary; I do not much like this
Pho pho, said I, what are you afraid of, in such a spot of
eartha little green island walled about by the sea, and
guarded by mighty ships
He made no replyhe did not even hear me; but stood
listening at the door, with his hand upon a huge bolt.
If you do not like to open the door, I will, said I.
His wife caught her breath and gave me such a look that,
if my life had been at issue, I could not have opened the
door. I was actually frightenedmy strength and courage
were gonea terrible idea passed over my heart, one which
I have no power to describe, and I recoiled from her beauty
as if I knew that she was what I dare not mention. But
before
I could resolve how to proceed with her, the knock was
repeated.
Ah, we have nothing to fear now, said he, I know that
knock. It is our friend Fontleroya person whom I had
met with not long before, and who had attracted my
attention
by his extraordinary resemblance to Napoleon
Bonaparte
.
As he spoke, he threw open the door, and the
individual
that I had seena small dark, middle-aged man,
with a mild serious air, and great dignity of carriage, entered
the room. Well, are you ready, or am I to wait for you now,
said the strangerand then he stopped short he stopped,
for he saw me, and appeared to be a good deal surprised.
Mr. C. H., a particular friend of oursfrom Americasaid
the man-without-a-name, at my elbow.
From America! repeated the stranger with a subdued
voice, bowing very low to me, and then saying to
Edwards
with a sort of smile which I did not much likeAre
you ready? we have no time to lose. You are not in
America
now.
All readyI have been waiting for youwas the reply;
we expected you three days agoand I had nearly given up
the idea.
10*
You had!
Yesthen turning to his wife he addedMary, love!
She went up to him and threw her arms about his neck,
and put her mouth to his and clung to himbefore me and
before the stranger and before two or three people that I saw
outside, not as if he and she were parting for a few hours, but
as if they were parting for a twelvemonth, or a long voyage,
if not for ever.
How is the wind? he added in a whisper, as the
new-comer
made a signal to somebody outside.
Fair as it can blow, answered a rough voice at the door.
Ay ay, Sir, an' beautiful dark, dark as Egyptwith a blow
astarn Sir 'll sweep us over the way, like a shot from a
twoan'-forty
pounder.
Be still Sir
Bear up Mary, bear upI shall be back before you know
itI must leave you nowfarewell, Mr. C. H., farewell.
If I should not come back so soon as I hope, Mary will
entertain
youpho pho Mary, pho phodon't make a fool
of me. Good by deargood by Sir.
The next moment they were gone; the cottage was still
as death, and I was leftwho could have imagined such a
thing a few days beforeleft alone with the very woman
that I would have put my life in jeopardy to see.
CHAPTER XII.
THE SMUGGLER... THE PIRATE... A SURPRISE.
It
would not be easy to describe the embarrassment which
followed the departure of EdwardsI knew not which way
to look, nor what to say. And every moment I grew more
and more incapable of doing what, if I had not felt like a
great lubberly boy, I should have done at onceI should
have entered into a free conversation with the beautiful
creature
at my side, just as if nothing had happened. I
should
have done thisbut how could I? I felt every moment that
I ought to have done it at first, and that the sooner I did it,
the better it would be for both of usnay, that if I had done
it but a single moment before, it would have been easier
to do and better to do than it ever would again while I
breathed; and yet, as I live, I could not open my mouth,
nor command voice enough to say a single word.
But if I suffered so much, what must have been her
suffering
?
If I had no courage to speak, what must have been
the state her mind? She saw by my altered mannershe
knew by my very silence, that my opinion of her was altered.
She saw that the mysterious behaviour of the two men
troubled
me, and that I was occupied as I had never been before,
while she was near me. And well she might: for never had
I been so occupied before. She was on trial for a matter of
life and deathand I was her judge. I understood her
thoughtsI understood them by her look, her attitude, her
very breathing. I could hear a low, half-smothered sob every
minute or two, as she sat with her side toward me, and
though I did not look at her, and would not speak to her, I could
perceive that she was at work on the little capat work on
it before my face, though whenever she had touched it
before
,
it had been by a sort of stealth: I could perceive too that
she was in a fair way to spoil it, that she did not know what she
was about, nor see what she had in her hands; that she did
not look up, and that every now and then she caught her
breath and changed her position to hide it. Shall I confess
the truth? I took a pleasure in the idea of her spoiling that
cap; let others determine why, if they are able.
What was I to do? Should I go up to her as a brother
would go to a dear sister, and pray her to tell me the meaning
of what I sawpray to her, not with my lips upon her
forehead
of snow, as I might if she were my sisterbut with tears
in my eyes? Or should I go up to her in my true character,
and sayWoman of beauty! woman of power! in the
name of the Most High God, clear yourself! Womanthought
you are married to another, you are very dear to me. I
love youI began to love you the first hour I saw you,
would love you to my dying day, with all my heart and soul;
and to show you that my love is not such as you ought to be
offended with, lo! I am going away from you for ever! I
mean to avoid you for the rest of my life. Put faith in
me, I beseech you! Believe me when I say that I would not
have named the name of love to you, were I not going where
I shall never see you more, and did I not hope to persuade
you by such proof, to the doing of that which will make not
only you but your husband love and revere my memory. I
beseech you to put faith in me; I beseech you to clear up
the riddle that I saw; I beseech you to let me go away from
you with a feeling which, whatever may become of me, will
make you and him proud of having trusted me. Should I do
this, or should I take my hat and walk out of the housenever
interchanging another word with her who had entrapped me,
I now began to believeinto aI must own the truthinto a
den of smugglers.
Before I had half determined which of the three courses
to pursue, my hat was on my headI never knew how it got
thereand I was moving toward the door.
You are not going to leave me? said the woman. I
stopped
.
I turned toward her. I saw her facethe work had
dropped out of her hands, her lips were apart, and she sat as
if she had no hope left on earth.
Leave you! said II saw that I could not leave her in
such a mood, without saying farewell to her. NonoI
could not; her voice, though to another it would have been
almost inaudible, I dare say, sounded to me like low sweet
music and thrilled through and through meappearing to
issue
not from her lips, but from her heart, and affecting me like
the prayer of one who had a right to say to me with a look of
reproach
,
You are
not
going to leave me?
Leave you, said II must leave you.
TruetrueI know that, I acknowledge itI
Farewell, Madam
Nononot now! we have need of you now; we cannot
do without you now
Need of me! cannot do without me! said Iall at once
recollecting the fate of Weare, a poor fellow who had been
decoyed a little time before, into the house of men who for
the little that he had, put him to death; was I to be betrayed
by a woman? was I to find another Thurthill in the wretch
who had a  my thoughts were checked by her answer
No Sir, noI am sorry that he ever saw you: I would give
any thing in the world Sir, if you had not become what you
arewhat you are likely to be to us now
And what is that? I asked, with a feeling of considerable
anxiety.
Our hope, our stay, our only refuge on earth.
Why, really Madam, it would appear that I have been
decoyed
hither to serve a
Decoyed!
Yes Madam
decoyed
Perhaps it may be so; perhaps at another time, I might
be ready to acknowledge the truth of what you say; but just
now  you will excuse me, I hope; and you will forgive
me if I say that I would rather be left alone here to abide the
issueshe said this with a look of dismayquite alone, Sir
rising, and standing before me with an air of unspeakable
dignityaltogether alone Sir, than have such things uttered
before me in the absence of my husband.
Of your husband.
Of my husband Sir. A long pause followed, which I
contrived
to break at last by saying
Are you really married to that man?
Good God Sirwhat can possess you!
Will you forgive me, if I repeat the question? Oh, you
know not how much you have at stakeyour agitationyour
palenessyourah no! you need not answer me; I see
how it is. Farewell.
Stop Sir. Hear what I have to say, after which you will do
as you think proper. You have already mistaken my dear
husband
for a playeran authora drawing-masterand a
And a smuggler, added I between my shut teethadding
thereto what I meant for a look of astonishing sagacity.
And a what!
A smuggler, said I, planting my foot and breathing as I
never breathed before, in the presence of a lovely woman.
A smuggler! she repeated, standing up face to face with
me, her haughty lip curling with a bitter smile, and her dark
eyes flashing fireA smuggler! Why, what on earth do
you take us for?
A smuggler Madam, or aa
She turned as pale as death, and I stopped.
Or a what SirGod forgive you!
I mustered all my strength in reply.
Or a pirate Madam.
A pirate Sir! A pirate within the four seas of England!
Oh there is no help for you! she added, with a look such as
I hope never to see again while I have breath in my body.
I would rather die than deserve such a look. It was made
up of sorrow, of pity, and of surprise. No help for youno
hope for you! You are all alike. I never knew an author
who was not for ever on the watch for conspiracies or
catastrophes
.
People dare not move nor speak before you, lest
they should be worked up into some frightful story. I
wonder
you are not afraid to go to sleepno matter how sleepy
you may bewith your habit of authorship. I wonder you
have the courage to eatI wonder you are a
Farewell Madam.
Farewell Sir; but before you go, I beg you to hear what
I have to say, although it should happen to disagree with
your plot for a book. We
are
married.
Are
married, Madam! very well Madam; but were you
marriedfor that 's the true question after allwere you
married when I saw you in Westminster-Abbey?
We were.
The devil you were!not a rag of my theory left!
Sir!
Not a rag! Away goes the very foundation of a tale that I
have been at work upon for three years.
Foundationtaleare you mad?
All but finisheda story worth five hundred pounds, if
not more.
She drew back with a proud step. She measured me
from head to foot with a slow motion of her eyesher large
beautiful eyesand for a minute or two she appeared to be
choking. But by and by she recovered her composure, and
they grew steady of themselves I thought, and rested upon
mine, so that Iso that I felt as ifas ifin short, I could
not look up. I knew they were upon meI knew they were
very bright and clearprouder than ever, and lighted up
from their depth as it were, with an expression of severe and
awful integrity.
Your behaviour is very strangeyou do not deserve a
reply
another
in my caseanother alone with you as I
am, apart and away from succor, might be afraid of you.
But I am notI know you better than you suppose.
Alone
! You speak as if you were indeed alone.
I speak as I feel Sir.
Your servantsare they not enough to guard you?
We have no servants. The boy is awayand the poor
girl that I had, has gone back to her mother. She was
afraid to remain here. She could not sleep for the noise of
the sea.
What am I to do? Would you have me stay with you
till your husband gets back?
Yesfor my only hope is in you.
Your only hope!
The only hope I have on earth.
Explain yourself. What can I do for you? When do
you expect him?
Before midnight. Have you the courage to stay with me
tillpointing to a clock in the passage, with a playful air
the
courage
to stay with me till the hand that you see there
points at twelve?
Perhaps I may; but how am I to justify myself to you for
what I have said? How happens it I pray, that you are
already appeased? Why do you not reproach me for what
I have done?
Because I know you.
Meyouyou know me?
Perhaps you had better take off your hat, and hear what
I have to say with less of a tragedy-air.
Upon my soul Madamevery word you speak reminds
me of somebody that I have seen beforeyou smilebut
when or where I do not know. Ahbless mehave I
not
seen you before?
You have.
But whenwhere
Three years ago in Westminster-Abbey
Nay nayhow can you trifle with me at such a time;
you that know so little of me
So little of you! why Sir, I know more of you than any
body alive except your sisteryour twin-sister.
Gracious God! who are you?
Nay nayyou a novel-writer, and a-tiptoe to anticipate a
catastrophe!
I had seen yousurelysurely I had, before I saw you in
the Abbey; had I not?
And if you had, Mr , not Mr. C. H. but Mr. ,
lowering her voice to a whisper and uttering another name!
I was thunderstruck. She had called me by my true name
by the only name that I was
not
known by there, of the
multitude
which at one time or another I had made use of in
Europe
.
If you had, how poor a compliment you pay me now
by not being able to say where.
I beseech you, said Ido not drive me crazywho are
you? what are you? If it is true that I had seen you before
11
I saw you in the Abbey, how wonderful that I should not
remember where. And if I never did see you before that day,
how wonderful that I should feel toward you as I dothat
I should feel as if I had known you years and years ago, in
some other part of the world.
You were in this country about seven years agoah
you are beginning to perceive the truth, I see
To perceive the truth! no madamfar from it, further
from it than ever.
Were you not here?
I wasI was; but nobody knew it. I came hither in a
shape and with a name that I threw off on the passage back.
I did not knowI did not believethat a creature upon the
face of our earth was able to say what you have now
said to meto name that name which I have kept hitherto,
as a proud man would keep the secret of his overthrow, or as
a proud woman the secret of her dishonor.
I believe you
But how came you possessed of the knowledge?
Are you very sure that when you threw off the shape you
speak of, there was nobody alive to betray you?
Quite suremy own people did not know whither I had
gone. They hardly missed me, before I had come back to
their fire-sides.
Nobodynot so much as
one
that you trusted your secret
with?
Nobodyand yetyetas I livegracious God! it
cannot
be! Are you the woman that I saw in the coach, on my
way from Litchfield to Birmingham? You smileyou appear
to know to what I allude
Stop a moment. You shall see.
Here she got up, and going to a desk that lay open before
us, brought forth a paper which I recognised immediately for
a leaf that I had torn out of a book, full eight years before, to
give to a female I saw in the coach on my way from
Litchfield cathedral to Birmingham. The whole affair ran
over my memory like a stream of light. It was on the
Sabbath
daylate in the afternoon. I did not see her face till it
was too dark for me to distinguish her features, and she was
so muffled up that I could not see whether she was well made
or not; but that she was young I knew by the very sound of
her voice, and by the smooth motion of her neck that she was
very beautiful; and that she was dying of untold sorrow,
perhaps
of a broken heart, I judged by the low sweet music
of that voice which had haunted me till now.
And youare you indeed the poor creature that I saw
there? said I. How happy I am to meet with you alive
once more! You have no idea how you interested meI
would have risked my life to serve you, without asking to see
your face, or to know your name.
I believe youI am sure of itshe replied with fervor.
God bless you for it! and her eyes filled with tears, and she
sat looking at me, as if it made her happy to show that she
did believe me.
So sothe mystery begins to be cleared up. I
begin
to perceive now, why it was that I never could recollect
where I had known you, while your voice kept sounding in
my ear with a familiar sound. I perceive too why it is that
the slow graceful motion of your headI beg your
pardon
Oh Sir! you know not how I have reproached
myself
since that day for not having followed your advice. But
how could I? You were a stranger to me; yet worseyou
were a manI a mere child, with no more knowledge of
man's nature than I had been able to pick up out of a
religious
novel or two, the only works of fiction I was ever
permitted to see, though I languished for an opportunity to
know why it was that every thing in the shape of a novel was
so much to be feared by a young woman
Proceed, I entreat you
I willI willwith great emotionI will; for I wish you
to know that if I be not altogether what you believe me to
beI beg your pardonIIit may be owing perhaps
aain part, in some degree perhaps, to the ill-judged
severity
of my poor motherwhoaaexcuse me
There there, don't speak another word now; wait a
moment
you
will be more composed in a minute or two.
Forgive me, I beseech youIIreally I do not know
what I was going to say.
CHAPTER XIII.
RELIGIOUS NOVELS... AUTHORSHIP... EXTRAVAGANCE.
You
were going to say that all you knew of man's
nature
had been gathered from the religious novels you spoke
of
True true. Well, they taught me that men are never to
be trustednever by any body, and least of all by a woman;
that they are to be avoided by her in every case, but
especially
in sorrowand above all, if she be inexperienced, with
no father, no brother, nobody on earth to advise herin short
whenever she has most need of their sympathy and finds
most comfort in their society.
Fools! Do they not know that women dare not speak
freely
to women, where from the very nature of woman she is
obliged to speak freely or die? Do they not know that in her
deepest grief, in her heaviest calamity, it
may
be safer and
better for a woman to put faith in a stranger by the
wayside
,
than it would be to put faith in her bosom-friend,
if that friend were a femalesafer than it would be to trust
her own daughteryea, her own sisteryea, her own
mother
!
Oh Sir. You know not how true your words arehow
terribly true; they are enough to break my heart.
Fools, fools! Do they not knowwill they never know
that while every thing tends to make man betray man,
woman
,
womanjealousy rivalry the hatred of competitorship,
every thing to make woman a severe judge of woman, man of
man, do they not know, will they never seethat every thing
tends to make woman faithful to man, every thing to make
man faithful to woman
11*
Every thing!
Yes every thing, save that childish vanity of his, which if
it be not swallowed up in joy that he has been found
worthy
of being trusted by her, may do her faith as much wrong
as that other vanity of the female ever could
Oh no, there is no trusting to man's love.
Love madam! who spoke of love? When I say faith, I
mean faithI do not mean love. I am not talking poetry.
We are treacherous to you in our love, and so are you to us,
in your love; but few women would ever betray a man,
fewer
men a woman, who put faith in their probity or their
courage
as a friend.
I believe you
Madam, you may believe me. What I say to you, I say
seriously. I know much of man, more of womanfor
women
have been my peculiar study for years, my delight
ever since I had the courage to believe them good by
nature
and
capable of being whatever we would have them
be; and I declare to God, that I would not scruple to trust
my life, or a secret that concerned my life, to the keeping of
almost any woman that I ever saweven as I did with you.
I have known a score, wholike youeven if they distrusted
me, would never betray me.
God bless you for that!
You
never betrayed methough you distrusted me I
believe
?
How could I help it! You were a manI, a woman half
dead with grief. You were so plausible too, and the books
I mentioned were the first I saw after you had left
me. Was I not in sorrowwas there a creature upon the
face of this earth, to whom I could apply at such a time
Foolsfoolsdo they not know that
in
sorrow and
with
sorrow, impurity hath no power! Do they not know that in
deep sorrow the heart is a sealed book!
Ah Sir!
Sealed I mean to the approach of a bad lovein
sorrow
no woman was ever yet betrayed?
But Sir, in sorrow the heart of a woman may be betrayed,
though she herself be not. In sorrow too, the heart may
conceivewhat in sorrow it must bring forth, if the comforter
be away when the hour of travail is nigh. And where is the
value
of a woman, if her heart be no moreif it be another's
if it be gone astrayor if it be full with a joy it dare not
acknowledge
?
How are we to live without sympathy, after we
have once known what the sympathy of a good man is;
and if we cannot obtain the sympathy of good men,
how naturally do we seek that which is most like itthe
sympathy
of bad men. Believe me Sirthe heart of woman
may be overmastered in sorrow, may be betrayed,
irretrievably
betrayed by sorrowsooner than by joy, or in joy. In
grief she is ready to give herself up to the sympathy of the
first man that looks like a good man, whatever may be taught
her in the books. And of what value is the woman, if her
heart be alienated? You may have other ideasfor you are
a man. You smile where we should weep. But to me it
appears a greater evil to foregoto
have
to forego the
possession
of a heart we love, than to give up the possession of
aaof aof aught else underneath the sky.
Our pride will not suffer us to feel as you do. We can bear
the loss of a woman's heart, however much we may love her,
better than we could the loss of a woman herself, to another
manthough we hated her. We know that in most cases the
fault is our own if we lose her heart; and we believe, such is
our stupid infatuation, that in every caseto recover it, we
have only to try. We can bear to see a young beautiful wife
so much at our mercy, that her very health may depend upon a
word or a look from us. We love powerand to show the
world what power we have, and how little we are afraid, not
because of
her
virtue, but because of
our
merit, we drive her
away from our side, whereif we did not drive her away
she would nestle for ever. We drive her abroad for sympathy
we are cruel to her and treacherous to her in a way that
she dare not speak of. We can bear to chill the warm sweet
gushing of her heart, even at the risk of chilling it for ever
and yet, if she go astray, there is no death too bad for her.
You are weeping
No no, I am not weepingno no, what have I to make
me weep?
How should I know? Please to proceed with your story
Well SirI have not much more to say. While you
were with me, it was impossible to doubt you; but the
moment
you were gone, my heart misgave me, and I felt as if I
had betrayed myself as never woman had betrayed herself
beforeto a stranger.
I thought soI told you so. I was afraid your courage
would forsake you, and I put you upon your guard. It was
for that very reason that I gave you the paper I see there.
It was for that very reason that I entrusted you with what
was a matter of life and death to memy real name, a name
that was never yet associated with an equivocal deed, nor
used for a light or a vulgar purpose. It was to prove to you
that I had no evil hope in my heart, no bad wish regarding
you, that after giving you my true name, by which you might
be able to trace me whithersoever I went, if you ever had
occasion
for my help, and by which I put myself in your
power
as
you knew before a month was over
I did, I did!I saw your true name in the papers; and
I saw it on one and the same page with your fictitious name.
Ah! how little they knew of the truth, when they spoke of
you here by one name as a friend of the Greeks, and there
by another name, as a novel-writer of the day
It was to prove to you that I had no evil in my heart,
that after giving you my real name---by which I put myself
in your power as much as you could possibly be in mine---and
both of my fictitious names that I might never be able to
escape--It
was to give you such proof as would satisfy you, when I
was away and you had begun to feel the very misgiving you
speak of, that after doing all this to assure you, I forbore to
profit
by the invitation of your brother, who seeing how you
treated
me, took me for an old acquaintance you know and would
have had me go with you to your house.
My brother-in-law you mean. Oh I shall never forget
your behaviourso delicate and so generous and so
collected
were you. But for your presence of mind, I should not
have been so civil as to second his invitation, so that he must
have seen that there was something out of the usual way in
our acquaintance; and but for your exceeding generosity,
you would have taken advantage of it, and I should have
seen you at the fire-side of my proud sisterwithout being
able to say a word, whatever appearance you might have
thought proper to put on.
And yet after allno sooner had I turned my back, than
you altered your opinion of me.
Her eyes fell at this remark; but after a little hesitation,
she added, Very truefor in sorrow the heart is treacherous
and wayward. We hope and we fear, we know not why,
under the pressure of great grief. Common occurrences
appear
to be strange and terrible. We have no wish to live
we are without courage, without hope, and without
confidence
.
For a great while I could not bear to think of the
escape I had with you.
How madamwhat escape?
Forgive me. I speak of what my feelings were at the
time, before I knew a fortieth part as much of man's nature
as I knew within a year from that very day.
Stop. I know what followedlet me prove it to you.
For a time you were afraid to look at the paper I gave you
though you hadn't the heart to destroy it; and you regarded
me as one of the multitude who go about seeking whom they
may devour
Yes, I did
But after a while, it occurred to you, that---perhaps---I
had spoken the truth
Yes, yeseagerlyand the more I thought of your
behaviour, the more sorry I was that I did not keep your
letter
You saw the letter then
I did, and after considering the affair a whole day, I
concluded
to return it, as if it was not intended for me
And so leave it to be read by the clerks in the post-office
No noyou terrify me.
But you did, I say. I have the letter now, with the
postmark
upon it, `Refused,' or `No such person to be found,' I
forget which. Of course it had been opened, or they would
not have known how to return it to me.
Dreadful---I did not foresee this
No no, your idea was that on receiving the letter back I
should imagine your story or your name to be fictitious.
Very trueit never occurred to me that before you could
receive the letter, it must be opened, and might be read by
somebody in the post-office. It cannot be helped nowbut
I beg your pardon for the trick; I am very sorry
And will never do so again, I dare say
Nevernay nay, you are angry with me now.
Very true. But allow me to proceed with your story;
after a while you began to take another view of the matter.
I did; for happening to meet with a girl one day who had
been four or five years in Americaperhaps you may have
heard of herMiss Harvey.
Not Emma Harvey
The same, perhaps you have heard of her?
Perhaps I have. We were to have been married
No!
Yes, and but for a circumstance whichbut go on
with your story. I see how it was now---it was from her
that you heard so much as to justify you in saying that
that you knew more of me than any woman alive, except
my own sister.
Yes, partly from her and partly from another
From another?
Yes, but let me tell you how it happened.
Poor girl! I never knew how much I loved her till I
heard of her death; you know I suppose that she followed
me here without my knowledge.
Noshe did not speak of you as if she had ever loved
you, nor as if you had ever loved her.
How did she speak of me then
Better than you deserve, I dare saybut I wish you
would allow me to tell you how I came to regard you as I now
doyour behaviour I mean. About a year after I saw you,
I received a note from a lady who knew that some how or
other I had a deal of curiosity about America, and that I
was dying to see a natyveI need not tell you why
saying
that if I would stop at her house for a week I should be
gratified. I longed to go I confessbut as it never entered
my head that the natyve she wanted me to see was a female,
I kept away. Soyou are pleased, I see.
I bowed.
At last however, as good luck would have it, I happened
to hear the truth. I saw the natyve, as they called her.
She was a very superior girl, and though not altogether an
American, she was the child of an American by an English
woman that we knew, and had been educated at
Philadelphia
Near Philadelphiaat Germantown.
Well, it occurred to me one day, that I would ask her
about
you by one of the fictitious names that you gave me.
She had never heard of you; by any othershe knew no
such individual, and was quite sure that America had
produced
no author of that nameYou smile, but perhaps you
remember
that you told me you had scribbled a book or two
Did I?
To be sure you did.
And after that, you never could persuade yourself that I
was in your power
She laughed and continued. Very well, said I, when I
heard this. Very well indeed; so much for this American.
I have heard of their tricks before; and soand sowill
you forgive me? I was just going to pull out the paper you
gave me, and show it to her
You had it with you then?
Yes
A whole year after you saw me
Yes, a whole year after youbut don't flatter yourself: I
had my reasons for carrying it about with me.
What were they?
Well
if
ever!and so, and so, just when I was going to
show the paper, I happened to recollect myself, and as I
stood looking over it, she saw the hand-writing, and made
some remark or other about its resemblance to the writing
ofofwould you believe itshe named the very name
that you told me you were known by in America. I need
say no morewe grew intimate; I was with her till within
a week of her death
Poor Emma!
And she told me so much about you.
Welland she died
Yes, dieddied of a broken heart, I believe now; for the
sorrow that I saw was like no sorrow that I had ever seen
before, though
I
had felt, as I could see that she felt, weary of
the very light of heaven
Well
Wellhave you nothing more to say?
Nothing. What more would you have me say? I loved
hershe loved me. We were to have been married. A
few weeks more and we might have been happy, but she
chose to believe another instead of me. We partedand
she is in her grave.
Good God! how you speak of her.
Go on with your story if you please.
How unforgiving?
Will you proceed with your story?
I will; for I see that you are not so bad as you appearI
can see that your eyes are wet; and your mouth paler than
it was
Pho.
Well. Soon after this, I saw your name in a paperyour
true name, that by which I was to know you, and I felt proud
of you. My confidence revivedI reproached myself,
night and day for not having trusted you further; and having
discovered that you, though a man, were not of such men
as I read about in the book they made me pore overI
began
to believe that book untrue and
all
men trust-worthy.
12
Just what I should have expected. Fools! idiots! Do
they not know that by educating their daughters as you were
educated, they are preparing them for the Destroyer! Do
they not know that by prohibiting with such absurd severity,
a thing which it is not in their power wholly to prevent, they
create a desire for what otherwise might never be thought of,
encourage the growth of insincerity, and teach their
daughters
to confound what
may be
improper with what
is
criminal?
Very true.
Religious novels forsooth! Why, what do they teach but
this
this!
the very end and aim of all novels; namely, that
after a certain portion of suffering, trial and sorrow,
marriage
comes about,marriage with the desired accompanied
by beauty, wealth, rank, &c. &c.,
as the greatest of earthly
good!
If they taught self-denial in protracted adversity,
or fortitude for liferesignation for everif they went to
make people wiser and happier and more contented, though
they failed to come togetherresigned, though a beloved-one
were united to anotheractive, useful and good, though they
were poor, feeble, despised and without character, influence,
or rank, then would they be what they are
not
now
religious
novels
. As they are now managed, they are among
the most pernicious of all the books that appear. And why?
Because under the name of religious truth, we are taught
only this, that the most perishable of earthly things are what
the evangelical should hope to be rewarded with, if they
persevere
through all the temptations that beset their path.
Religious
novels, indeed! And yet these are the novels we
are obliged to readall others were prohibited to me.
Why do they not portray the young and lovely
separated
,
and
for ever
, from what they love; and
supported
nevertheless by their piety, their earnest and
faithful
religion; or coupled for life with the wicked and
perverse
,
and yet bearing their lot in marriage, as none but those
who really deserve the name of the religious of the earth
could bear it!
A woman who has been brought up in the way you were,
would feel, after having read a prohibited book, as a woman
should never feelneverthough she had gone utterly
astray. She would feel as if she could not be forgivenas
if she had done that, of which it would be unlawful to speak
even to her own dear mother.
Yes, and she would feel as ifas ifas I felt when I
discovered
that a
man
could be both delicate and faithful; and
that a religious novel could not be depended upon for truth
of character.
You felt I dare say, as if your heart or your understanding
had been outraged for whole yearsand by your own mother;
and you were ready I dare say, to believe those books true
which were forbidden, because you found those untrue which
were not forbidden.
I was.
And all mankind trust-worthy and high-hearted, because
you had been so lucky as to meet with me.
Are you serious?
I am.
Would you provoke me to laugh in your face!
If you dare
You are the strangest man
Pho pho.
Pho phohow like Edward that is!
Edward who?
My husbandhe frequently reminds me of you; he is
very like you in some things.
I was completely bewildered for a momentyour
husband
!
I am sorry for itwhere is hewhy is he not here?
You terrify me. What have I said?
WomanWomanI perceive the whole truth now.
Look me in the face! Did you ever tell your husband that
you knew me? Did you ever tell him that he was like me?
NonoI can see by your eyes and by the light shining
through your pale forehead as it werenaynay, that look
will never convince meI could swear that you never did.
Sir!
Deny it if you can.
Will you hear me?
A single word is enoughyes or no?
Well then, if that is enough
no
.
I rose from the chair; but she stood in my way with a
composure that awed me. I could not pass her; and she
spoke to me as I had never been spoken to before.
Though I did not acknowledge to him Sir, that I knew
youit was not by
my
advice, nor to gratify
me
, but contrary
to my advice that you were brought hither. If I did not
acknowledge to him, that the inquiries I made about you
while he was in America, and after his return, were made by
me with a feeling of regard for you, it was because I hoped
never to see you again. If I forebore to acknowledge to him
that he was like youit was partly because in America he
had been told of the resemblance to you, and partlyI hope
you will forgive mepartly because he had been told much
that was unfavorable to you.
Unfavorable to me?
Unfavorable to your temper; if not unfavorable to your
integrity and your steadiness. Are you satisfied?
I amof one thing. But before I go, will you answer me
two or three questions?
I willif in my power. What are they?
Was your husband the cause of the trouble I had, when
he and you and I were at the Sand-Rock Hotel?
The causeno indeedwhat do you mean?
Did he not bribe that devil of a chamber-maid-waiter?
Bribe herhow?
To let me ring myself to death.
Oh, I know what you mean. What could possess you to
behave so like aI beg your pardonbut neither he nor I
had any thing to do with your annoyance.
Very wellI am satisfied there; one question more.
Did you invite me to your house to make a fool of me?
Oh! you are mad as a March hare!
What did you mean pray, when you told me with tears
in your eyes, that your only hope was in me?
My only hope
on earth
, I said.
Well well; but what did you mean by that?
MeanI meantwill you take a chair
No! Zounds, if you laugh, I 'll kick a hole through the
side of the house, or escape through the roof
That would be hardly worth your while; the door is open,
you see.
So it is, faith; but you are in my way.
Am I  there  theregoing asidewhy don't
you go?
Would you turn me out of your house neck and heels?
No, but you may turn yourself out if you like.
Oh you may laughbut I am going.
I see you are.
Why do you leave it open though? it 's very coldvery
That I may look upon the trees and the sky, and hear the
noise of the wind over the hill, and the roar of the sea
Indeedis that all
No SirI leave it open that I may hear the footstep of
my husband. You smilehow dare you!
No matter; I 'm going you seeI 'm going for good and
12*
allbut before I go, I wish you would contrive to tell me in
what way it was you thought I could be of use to you.
I willnow that you are in a chair
In a chair!I am not
No, but you were in it when I spoke
Very well, and what if I was
Nothingnothing at all, you know; you were on the way
out.
By Jove
Nay nay, be quiet if you please, and hear what I have to
say. You
can
be of use to me
Howin what way?
I 'll tell you. My poor Edward has got into bad
company
I fearwhat is that look forI do not mean you
Into bad company, has he? I thought so
And I do believe that if you were to speak to him, as you
did to me, eight years ago, when you saw me on the very
verge of destruction, you might save him, as you did me
Did I save you
You did
Enough. I am happythrowing off my hat, before I
knew what I was aboutI am very happy now.
He has a great regard for you, I am sure, and you might
recall him perhaps to a calmer and a safer path.
What sort of company do you speak of
I do not knowI am not surebut I am afraid it is the
company of gamblers.
Ohis that all!
All! Is not that enough? What is there so terrible to a
fond wife?
Bad enough to be sure, very badbut I am glad it 's no
worse, for to tell you the truth, I had begun to fear
To fear whatGracious God, how you frighten me!
Look you. I see how the matter isI
will
speak with
him as I spoke with you, and if it be possible to save him,
IIbut stopwhy do you live in this way? Tell me as
much as you can of the why and the wherefore, that I may
know how to proceed. Ahwhat a load you have
taken off my heart!
I will. He married me contrary to the advice of every
friend he had on earth, I do believe; and for a reason which
I am not now at liberty to speak of, he persuaded me to
live in a style of expense which we could not afford, and
which if I had known the truth, I never would have
consented
to. O that men could bear to acknowledge the truth to
their wives when they are poor! They would find that
poverty would not be half so terrible to a woman, as the
over-thoughtful brow or the averted eye of a dear husband,
for ever occupied in the pursuit of wealth.
Very true
He was brimful of ambitionhe had a high hope, which
kept him idle. He was fond of literature, and if he had not
thrown by the pen, as he told you, in a rage at the rascality
of editors, he would have made a figure in a little time.
But he was proud quick and irritable, and finding that he
did not succeed, or that others did succeed better than
himself
,
he threw aside every thought of authorship and
embarked
all his property in a speculation, which after a whole
year of such vicissitude as I would not endure again for the
wealth of an empireleft him literally without the means of
buying a mouthful of bread. Nor was that allI could
have borne that, for I had still of my own property enough
to be happy with, if
he
could be happy in a cottage like this;
or any where out of the crowded highway of ambition; but
he was in debt, and owing to the style in which he had lived
it was now said with other people's money, though God
knows he never thought sothe creditors were inflexible.
He was too proud to avail himself of the lawI gave up
my propertyand for two whole years we worked together
under every disadvantage, for the profit of those whom we
owed. This could not lastI fell sick, and he fell sick
in watching over me. O Sirif you could know what we
suffered; such misery, such intolerable misery, month after
month, and all to no purpose! Do you wonder that we lay
and talked together at last about death, until we persuaded
ourselves that it was our duty to die? We did so; and but
for the arrival of a strangerthat very man you saw this
evening
,
we should most assuredly have gone to sleep for ever,
on the morning of the day that followed the night I speak of.
God bless him!
But he could not save usfor money would not save us.
My poor Edward! he was no longer the same creature.
And as he would not suffer his new friend to pay his debts,
for a long while it appeared as if he had been dragged away
from the pressure of one misery only to be exposed to that
of another. Oh SirSirI cannot go onhe is
cheerful
now, but cheerful in such a way that I cannot bear to
look at himhe has no appetitehe never appears to sleep
soundly, and he is often away for a whole week together
he, who one year ago, would not have left my side a single
night for the wealth of a kingdom, he who for the first five
years of our marriage was hardly ever out of my sight! Oh
Sirit is very hard to bear!
What can I do for you?tell me; speak to me as you
would speak to your own brother.
I willI will, said she, and I felt the pressure of a hand
upon
my armI was afraid to stir, afraid to breathe indeed, lest
I should scare it awayI willI will if you could
but manage to speak of the possibility of success in
authorship
for
to tell you the truth, it is there he has been struck
to the heart, although he would never acknowledge itOh
Sir! if you would, I am sure it would save him
I willI will
Ah Sir, he would be
so
happyand I should be so happy
and you would be so happy!
Very fair! cried some oneat her elbow
I startedand she screamed for joy.
It was her Edward. I never looked so much like a fool
in all my life. Her hand was resting on my armthat I
knew; but I did not know till she snatched it away and
jumped about the neck of her husband, like a mad creature,
that my hand was on the top of hersGod forgive me.
CHAPTER XIV.
LOVE... SKETCHES FROM LIFE... AUTHORS.
The
horse-and-gig were at the door, it was a beautiful
daysuch a day as women talk of in their youth, when the
great woods are all in flower, very much as if their hearts
were in flower too; and I was getting ready to say farewell
to the man without a name.
I say though, said he, as he sat with his back toward me
and his arm around the waist of Mary, who stood leaning
over him with her eyes upon a book, in which he appeared
to be writing. I say thoughparting the rich hair upon her
forehead as he spoke, pulling her up to him, setting a kiss
there; not as if she were a wifehis wife, I should saybut
more as if she were a child of his
Did you speak to me? said I.
Yeshow do you like my wife? Showing me a sketch
of her he had just made in the book.
Your wife!how do I like your wife?
Oh my God! as lady Morgan would say, oh my God! that
ever you should live to hear any body ask you such a
question
about such a bit of pure poetry!
EdwardEdwardfor pity sake!
I 'll tell you what 't is though young man, she 's a noble
creature, and you 'll find her so.
I have found her so.
You have!umph!
Yes I have.
I 'll bequeath her to you, if you like
Sir!
Edward!
What say you to that?
Sir!
What say
you
to it, Mary! pho pho, if any thing should
happen to me dear, it would be a pleasure for me to know
that you would be provided for. Why, what a fool you
arewe can't both die together you know!
Truetruenot now; but the time was when we could
have died together
both
Mary Pe
Hushhushputting her hand over his mouth.
Narrow escape for you, sixpencewith a laugh.
Don't pray call me sixpence.
Very wellnarrow escape for you neverthelessyou
youyou monkey, you.
No no Edward, no no!
Well well, we can't both die together you see. That's
unpossible; and what's unpossible can't be, and never,
never
comes to pass. One or the otheryou or Imust
precede.
Very true, and therefore I pray that I may go first.
Why dear, 't is the survivor dies, you know
I know it, I know it
And so you wish me to be the survivor, do you?
Oh Edward! Edward! how
can
you talk so!
Yes. I 'll bequeath her to you Holmes, if you 'll swear to
be to her all that I should have been.
You 'll break my heartor drive me crazy Edward, if
you
If I what? pho pho, what are you crying for? is n't he
like me?
Like you, Edward!
Did'nt I hear you say so?
Whenwhere?
Last night.
Last night!
In your sleep
Oh, in my sleep
Oh! in your sleep; you are easy now are you? you have
said as much when you were not asleep, I guesswhat say
you, Mr. Yankee?
Ask her
Have you my deartell me.
YesI have.
There 's a dearkissing her devoutlyI am satisfied
now. The wretch!
Farewell! said IfarewellI could 'nt bear it any longer
I hope to see both of you again, but if I never should, I pray
youand that will be enough to make you both happy, I
pray you to treat each other as you now dofarewell!
No no
Yesfarewell.
Remember your promise.
I doI will; there 's my card, Sir
And there is mine, said heoffering a handfultake your
choice
I laughed in spite of the solemnity of my feelingsNo no,
said II 'll have nothing more to do with your cards, but I
hope to see you again, I have much to say to you.
And I to you. You
shall
see me againafter a pause
should you not like to see my wife again?
I should
Very well; what say you Mary? should you like to see
the na-tyve again?
Yes
It shall be so. Na-tyve this way. Mary dearthis way.
Give us your hand Sirand you too Mary, give me yours.
Now Sir, I have an idea that you are wonderfully like me
I bowed.
Pho pho, it can't be helped you know, and we must
bear it as well as we can. Observe what I sayif any thing
should happen to me, I bequeath her to youwhat are you
staring at, both of you? I am quite serious
You are mad, I believe
There there, you may go now; I shall see you in town
before
a week is over, I dare say. Mary!
Well
What if you give him a kiss
Oh for shame, for shame Edward; your levity is
insupportable
.
Fudgedon't you like him?
Yes, I do like him.
Very much?
Whyaayes.
Love him a little too, I dare say?
Love him!
As a brother you know
Yes
Very well. As a brother you
would
kiss himprove to
me that you do feel toward him as toward a brother.
Prove itI willI will
Enough. She kissed me, but how, or whether on my
forehead or my lips or my cheek, I never knewI only know
that I trembled all over when I felt her breath in my neck,
that whenever I think of her now, I have a thrill at my heart
which it is not in my power to describe, and that I did not
come fully to myself, till I had got within half a mile of the
shore on my way to Southampton, and was drifting along
at the rate of about a mile an hour, with Nettley-Abbeytwo
or three arches and a bit of wall overgrown with the heaped
13
up foliage that you never see any where but in the live
English
landscapejust under the bows of our boat, and a view
before me half clouded with the sea-smoke, so like the view of
Baltimore as you approach it by water, that for a few
minutes
I could hardly escape from the idea that I was still in
America. At last however, as we drew near, and I
discovered
that what I had mistaken for a detached part of the
townlike Fell's Point at Baltimorewas in reality the town
of Southampton itself, and that what I had mistaken for the
body of the town afar off, was in reality but a few scattered
villas gleaming through the river mist, I woke all at once
from the deep revery in which I had beenfor nobody
knows how long, very much like the poor fellow, of whom
we hear in the Arabian Nights, who contrived to escape from
a world of misery, by taking his head out of a tub of water,
into which he had been pursuaded to dip it, for the joke of
the thing, about half a century before as he thought.
Strangebut so it was. At any other time I should have
dropped asleep, as we floated along by the green graceful
unsteady shorewith its overhanging woods and quivering
atmosphere, through which the pomp and beauty of the
landscape
were like the pomp and beauty that we see in our sleep;
with a little sunshine playing loosely over the tree-tops and
among the waters; with a peep here and there at a sweet
blue sky on the other side of the larger trees, and with
just wind enough to stir a leaf or two whenever we were
getting
drowsy or beginning to regard the whole as a mere
picture; but now, instead of dropping asleep, I started broad
awake, wondering to find that I was neither at the cottage
with a beautiful woman before me ready to throw herself
upon
my neck, nor wandering about in the covered paths and
huge dim shadows of Carrisbrook-Castle,1 where I had spent
a good half the day before I knew it was peopled, or that in
clambering over the topmost wall and up the chief tower, I
had been scaling a fortress without leave, and was liable to
prosecution, as I saw by a board that faced me when the
feat was over.
Surely, said I, as we drew near the townsurely the site
for Baltimore must have been pitched upon by somebody
who had reason to love Southampton, just as Portsmouth,
Portland, Yarmouth, Falmouth, and forty other places in
America were probably so named by people who had left
the Portsmouth, Portland, Yarmouth, Falmouth, and forty
other places of their beloved Old-Englandto perpetuate the
recollection of their boyhood, to create a home like the home
they had left, and to keep alive in their posterity a feeling of
regard for the birth-places, after which
their
birth-places were
named. Surely the brave ship that I see there is on her way
up from Philadelphia! That steamer tooshe is on her way
to Norfolk; and the fleet afar off and the signal-guns that I
hear, what are they but signs from the high-sea, that
Baltimore
is about to be invaded again! As I livethere is
North Pointand there the very place where they shot poor
Rossfor which blessed be God, by the by, for nothing else
saved poor Baltimore.
At lastbut how or when, I declare I do not know to
this dayI arrived at my own door in the metropolis of the
British empire, hurried up to the old room, which with its
heavy chairs, and heavy couch, and heavy table, and every
thing to match, I hope never to forget; pulled forth my hoard
of paper, kicked off my boots with a flourish, and prepared
to be happy and altogether at home once more. But no
noI was neither at home nor happy. My books were no
longer what they had been to methe spell was no more
the thread was brokena story which I had been occupied
with till my heart ran over with pride and joy, had no longer
the power of fixing my attention. The very work which a
month or two before was enough to occupy me all the day
long, day after day, and more than half the night week after
weekwas no longer a pleasure to me. The dream was
over. It was a thrice-told tale, without wisdom, without power,
and without beauty. I could not bear even to read over what,
when it came fresh from my heart, like live water from a
newly-found spring, had been to my hope aaI really
would
finish the period if I knew how. But I do notand
I have only to say that I was unable to read, unable to write,
unable to drawfor a very good reason by the by, over
and above that which appearsand quite unable to stay at
home or to sit still, the days were so longafter the week I
had passed at the cottage; the furniture of my room so heavy
when I thought of the furniture I saw at the cottage; and the
air of London so dreadful, when I thought of the sea-breeze,
and heaved up my head in the fog of Pall-Mall under a
notion
that it smacked of the fog that used to come rolling in
before a tide at the Isle-of-WightI say nothing of the
London
sky just now, having lived in London but a very few
years, though I am told that people are to be found who do
not scruple to speak of it, as a thing to be seen every month
of the year.
I began to go abroad more than I had for an age, to hunt
up old acquaintancespeople for whom I never cared, and
never should have cared but for the dread I now had of
being alone; to go every where, to all the exhibitions
parades
reviews and theatres; to lounge about the windows of
the print-shops, to ride to fence to box, to walk for a wager,
to busy myself in a thousand ways which a month or two
before
I should have thought beneath me; to go to bed earlier
and earlier, and to get up later and later every day; glad
when the night came, though I knew that I should not sleep;
and glad when the morrow came, though I had not closed my
eyesfor another day was gone, or another night, and I was
so much nearer the time which I knew must arrive either in
this world or the next, of seeing her, who, although she was
another man's wife, and although I had no wish that I would
have concealed if I could from the Searcher of Hearts, began
to be loved by me as no sister I do believe, was ever yet
loved by a brother. In a wordfor the first time in all my life,
I knew not how to pass the day, nor what to do with myself
when the day was over; I had no heart for workno heart
for pleasure. I would go to the theatre and drop asleep
I would go to a masquerade and forget myself so far as to
unmask before all the company; I would go to church and
stay and stay till I was told that I could stay no longer. If I
went into a coffee-house and took a seat by the table, I
forgot
what I had come forand if I began to read a paper, it
would drop out of my hands, and flutter toward the chimney,
before I recollected where I wasor I would keep it until
somebody asked for it; and if I ordered a dinner it was by
fits and starts, piecemeal, as I happened to be importuned by
the waiter, who had to remind me every five minutes that
something I had called for was getting cold. Nay, what is
yet more strange, I was happy in the idea that perhaps
perhaps
I
might live to occupy a
second
place in the heart of
a proud beautiful woman. Lord! that I should ever be
satisfied
with a second place anywhere!a second place in the
heart of one that I loved. Yealoved! and though such
love may be regarded with grief or dismay by the multitude
who never know what such love isand who do not scruple
to forgive more under the name of friendship than I would
beg for under the name of love; and though it be the
fashon
to cry outsuch is the power of a wordsuch the power
13*
of untruthif the married speak of loving where they are not
bound by law to love; yet I say, and I appeal to my Maker
for the truth of what I say, that if I were married to such a
woman as I would marry if I had the power, I should glory
in having her so loved by other men, were they goodor
were they bad men---as the woman I speak of was now loved
by me. If they were good men, it would make them
happier
and
if they were bad men it might make them
better
and
such love as mine would nevercould never injure
the object of its love; it would but make her more dear to
me and give to virtue a tenfold power. I might call this
friendshipanother would I dare say; I might allege that
my feeling toward her was that of a brother toward a sister
another would I am sure; and I know well that he would
have forgiven, or pitied, or praised, where Ifor speaking the
truth---should be spoken of with horror. But as I happen to
know what friendship for a female is, and as I happen to have
a dear good sister whom I love I hope, as much as a brother
need love a sister---I dare not sayI will not say what
another
would in such a case, that my love here was nothing but
friendship or a brotherly regard. I know betterit was a
warmer deeper holier than eitheryea holier! as I mean to
show before I have done.
Well wella month had passed over in the state of trial
which I have attempted to describe, and I had begun to give
up the idea of seeing Edwards again. Yet more. I had
begun
to feel quieter and happier and more at home with my
books. I could bear my own society againthe days did
not appear so long, nor the nights. And reallyreallyI
had begun to say to myself, that if I should have an
opportunity
of renewing my acquaintance with the people of the
cottage, it would not be very advisable to do so. What should
we gain by iteither of us? Nonosaid I to myself, no
no, it cannot and it will not come to good; I 'll keep away
I 'll avoid themI 'll go to work, and leave not an hour of the
day to be wasted in revery. It may be irksome at firstit
will be soI foresee that I cannot give up the pleasure I have
indulged in so long, that of throwing aside my book or my
pen just before dinner, or just before bed-time, or between
day-light and dark, and shutting my eyes and thinking over
all that occurred to me while I was withI will not say
whomat the cottage. I began to be afraid of myself and
afraid of her. But just thenjust as I had begun to slide
back into my old habits, and to
say
, if not to think that I ought
never to see that woman again while I breathed, and that
now was the timenownow!---to come to a resolution
worthy
of a hero; a superb equipage rolled by me one day, as I
was hurrying through Regent-Street, and as I drew back to
avoid the whirl of the mud, some one called out to me in a
voice that I knew. It was too late for me to escapethe
carriage had drawn up, the steps were downmy heart was
in my throat, and Edwards himself before mebut so unlike
what he had been a few weeks before, so altered, so free in his
bearing, so cheerful, that if he had not spoken to me as he
did, I should have passed him, I believe without knowing
him.
1 A celebrated castle on the Isle-of-Wight where Charles I.the
martyr
!was
confined.
CHAPTER XV.
LONDON SOCIETY... HIGH-LIFE.
Ah
my dear fellow, said he, how happy I am to see you!
Where the devil do you hide yourself nowcome come, in
with you; no time to be lost now; you are the very man I'm
in search of. Why didn't you stop when I called you?
When?
Just now; we have been rattling after you this half hour.
Upon my word, I am very glad to see youbutbut
I'm engaged.
Nonsensefiddle-de-dee; in with you. Mary is dying
to see you.
MaryI beg your pardon; I really
am
engagedI
cannot
go with you to-day.
Pho pho, come along; I 've so much to tell youand she
has so much to tell youand we 'll send an excuse for you,
andandin short, you must go; if I do not secure you
now, you may slip through my fingers. There there, in with
you. I want you to see two or three of the finest fellows in
the worldthey are to be with me to-day, and if you miss
each other now, you may never have another opportunity
while you live.
Ahwhy so?
For several reasons. They may be ordered off; they are
only abroad for a week now, and are liable to a very short
notice.
Ohmilitary men hey?
Nonot exactly. But never mind who they are; they
are men of the worldjust now---and I am anxious to have
them see you, before their holiday is over.
In the navy perhaps?
No nobut you shall see them, and judge for yourself;
they are such men as you never met with before, and either
of them would make a capital hero for Lord Byron or Sir
Walter Scott.
Indeed---are they lawyers?
They know something of the law to be sure; about as
much as they have occasion for, being well-bred men.
But you know that some knowledge of the law is
absolutely
required to finish the education of a well-bred man.
Very truevery truemy friends are pretty much of that
opinion; they regard a knowledge of the law as you do, and
as Blackstone did, as the true
finish
for a gentleman's
education
.
But as for aso so! here we are.
Of what profession are theydo tell me.
Of no profession at allzounds, what a knockto the
footmanare you afraid of being heard by the neighbours,
you great booby? Go it again Sir! rattle away as if you
had some life in you! What are you afraid of! There,
there! that 'll do!
Oh I understand you now, said I, as the huge door swung
open, and another powdered footman stood ready to receive
us. They are men of fortune?
Men of fortune aaPrecisely.
If so, my dear Sirif so, I assure you I would rather
keep out of their way; I am too poor for such company
Too poor! poh pohfollow me. Too poor! the very
thing for youfollow me, my boy; and I'll make your
fortune
for you.
I followed him without another word, into a large
handsomely-furnished
room, where I met his wife who having
heard our voices, had jumped up from a sofa to receive
me.
Oh I am so glad to see you! said she; and as she
spoke, her voice faltered and the tears came into her eyes.
From that moment I saw that I had no business there.
And she saw it toofor I could not speak to her without
betraying
a depth of emotiona feara bashfulness that I
could not for my life get over. I saw my courseand I
determined to pursue it. I could not help seeing her now,
but I determined while we were talking togethereach
without hearing a syllable the other said, never to see her
again. But before I could speak to her, and say that which
would appear plausible enough to justify me in her opinion,
if I should go away at once and never see her again,---to
justify
me and satisfy her without alarming her pride, or the
secret sure instinct of the woman, so as to make her see my
true motive, a servant appeared with the lamp which he put
upon the work-table near the sofa, so that I could see her
face though she could not see mine. How altered it was!
and altered too, not from sorrow to cheerfulness, not from a
look of deep inbred habitual anxiety, to one of renewed
youth and hope and joy, like that of her husband, but altered
so, that if I had passed her in the highway without knowing
her, I should have been half ready to go up to her and say
Madam dear madam, forgive me. But is there any thing
on earth I can do for you! She was pale as deathit is no
figure of speech---I never saw any body half so pale before;
and yet as pale women are to those who feel as I do, she was
more beautiful than ever to meso beautifulso spiritually
touchingly beautiful, with her jet-black hair, and features of
living marble, and with that stamp of sorrow about her awful
forehead, and about her pale sweet mouth, and so dignified
withal, that if she had not been the wife of another man, I
would have dropped upon my knees before hera thing I
never did before a mortal woman yet---and asked leave to
gaze upon her proud beauty as I have an idea I should gaze
upon that of the mother that bore me, if her angel were to
appear to me in my sleep, or stand before me in the great
woods of North-Americasaying that she had offered
herself
up in her youth to preserve me, or that she died in giving
me birth.
I could not speak, nor could she for a long while; and
when she did, it was only to say with a voice and a look that
made a child of meI am sory to see you here
Sorry!
Very sorry---for I did hope
True true, thought I; poor soul! she begins to perceive
that she would not be safe with me.
I did hope never to see you again. I did hope that
by avoiding younay nay, do not look as if you
misunderstood
me; you know very well what I mean
Perhaps I dofarewell.
No nonow that you have come, you had better stay,
for your going would only appear strange; but oh, I beseech
you, let nothing on earth ever persuade you to come here
again
I rose to go, with a feeling which it would be no easy
matter for me to describe. I was grieved and sore---and I
hardly knew why. I had come to give
her
up; and yet I
could not bear to see that she was able to give
me
up. I
understood her well, and yet I appeared to misunderstand
her, that I might have something to reproach her with, now
that I saw her preparing to do in a quiet grave way, what I
had come prepared to do with a show of heroic self-denial.
No no; let me persuade you to stay, now you are with
us. Were you to go before dinner, it would appear strange,
it would look as if you had gone away---
not
as I hope to
have you go away.
I began to feel happy again. I saw that she could not
bear the idea of parting with me; I saw that she would be
miserable after I had gone whatever she might say, and so,
much as I loved her, I was all the happier for it. Strange!
I would have died for that womanI would, upon my life---
and yet I could not bear the idea of being forgotten by her,
though I knew that if she remembered me, it would make
her
life a burthen to her. Such is lovesuch the very nature of
man! Love as we may, we never love another so much
as we do ourselves, even though we destroy ourselves to
make that other happyit would kill us to know that
one we care for could be happy without our help.
Now that you are here, stay; and behave I entreat
you, just as you would if you were still at our cottage.
I will
But ohSir! give me your word---she lowered her
voice here and laid both her hands before me on the table,
in such an impressive way that I never shall forget a word
of her speech nor a tone of her voice---give me your word,
I beseech you, that you will avoid us hereafter
I will, said II will madam.
God bless you
And what is more, I will not even beg to know why it is
that you desire me to avoid you; as if there were something
perilous to you in my society
No noit is for your sake, for yours alone that I pray
you to avoid our society
You are very good
There now---you are piqued
No madam, no; not piqued, although I perceive that since
we parted, a wonderful change has occurred in your
circumstances
.
You keep a carriage now; and you have a house
here worthy of all admirationa superb house with superb
furniture, and who shall say that a change has not occurred
in
you
like that which we see in your circumstances?
The house that we occupy is not oursand if it were, I do
not believe that you would be so unkind as to utter a syllable
of what you have now said, if you knew how that wealth was
obtained, which we now appear to enjoy.To
enjoy!
oh
SirSir!
Good God, madam, what is the matter! what have I
said! Surely the signs that I see herethey are not signs
of mere luck at the gaming-table
She shook her head.
But rather I should hope of inherited wealth, or of wealth
obtained by worthier means. O that you had more faith in
me
Faith in you! Sir, I have such faith in you, that I could
go to sleep on that sofa, and sleep as quietly, with you sitting
at my headas quietly as if I knew that my own dear
father
was watching over me.
Your father---said I. Have I that look of old age then?
Oh nobut what I mean is, that I could speak to you
and deal with you as if you were one that had a title to be
trusted with whatever concerned me---if it did not
concern
others. I should be glad of an opportunity to prove
what I sayIt is proper that you should know whether I
have so much faith in you, or not, and whetherstay! I
shall see you a few minutes before you go?
If you desire it madam; but really
I do desire it! give me your wordpromise to speak
with me before you go. I shall not see you again I fear
I hopeand hereafter the recollection of my words may be a
pleasure to you, when you come to know the whole of my
history. And that you will know it before longI have a
sure presentimentI foresee the issue nowevery step of
14
the way, even to the epitaph which it will be for you to
write for methere there! give me your word; say you
will see me before you gowhy do you hesitate?
Will your husband be with you?
Nobut he will know that you are with me.
Very well. I am satisfied
You
are satisfied! Really Sir, you deserve abut no,
noI have no time now, no heart for dealing with you
as I should, at a less trying hour, if I saw you so careful of
what I hope never to think lightly ofappearances.
Here we were interrupted, and I was called away to
another room, where I met with four individuals who, with a
look of high fashion, appeared to belong to a class of society,
with which I had never had any intercourse. They were
bold and free of speech, and three out of the four talked
well upon a variety of subjects. Among them was a man
who could not have been less than seventy years of age; and
yet he had all the briskness and vivacity of youth, added to
that which we never see in youth, however well-bred a man
may be, the cool smooth self-possession of an adroit
chess-player
.
He did nothing in a hurry, he said nothing in a
hurry
;
and yet, every thing he did or said appeared to be
prompted by the occasion. A brotherhood of gamblers,
thought II am not sorry now that I have come. It will
give me what I have long desired to havean opportunity of
studying these people off guard.
I have seen a good deal of your country, said the man I
speak of, with a bow which it was impossible for me not to
return with a feeling of pride, for with that bow, he said more
in praise of America than most others would have said in a
long speech.
And how were you pleased with it, Sir George? said one
of the company, with a look which must have been thought
very droll, for it set every body a-laughing.Delighted, I
dare say?
Transported Sir.
Another laugh, in which I could not help joining with a
remark which they appeared to enjoy exceedingly
Transported Sir; and so was every body else that I
saw in Americafrom this country.
Really thought I, we have a very facetious gentleman
here; he does not scruple to joke with me about a story,
which if true, is not more creditable to his country than
to mine. What if people were transported to America;
they were but few, and were able to thrive
there
without
stealing.
After a good deal of other conversation about America,
some parts of which he was well acquainted with, he
proceeded
to give us two or three negro stories, in a strain of
pleasantry that I never shall forget. He was remarkably
happy too in his imitation of the negro speech, and must
have had at a very early age, a keen sense of the ridiculous,
and a quick perception of oddity in character. His portraits
were truth itselfno part was overcharged; and his very
caricatures were the caricatures of a gentleman. I heard
him with great pleasure, till we were called away to the
dinner-table
,
and so gratified was I with what he said of my
dear native land, that I contrived to place my chair just
opposite
him at the table, so that I could hear every word he
spoke, and watch the play of his fine expressive
old-fashioned
face, without being observed. He saw my object, and
willing to gratify me, he addressed the chief part of his talk
either to me or to those who sat near me, and gave sketch
after sketch of American character, which appeared to me,
after I had got half a bottle of wine aboard, quite superior
to any thing of the sort I had ever met with, for happy
graceful humor, for truth, and for ease of touch. It would
be impossible for me to give you an idea of his look, or of his
manneryou should see the man, you should hear him, to
enjoy the grave humor of what he said, but still I may give
you an idea of one or two sketches that I happen to recollect,
so far as the words go.
They had been talking of authorshipI thought for a
while to gratify meas if the shop were a theme to trouble
a man with, whatever Lord Chesterfield may say; as if it
were not a sign rather of ill-breeding, than of a knowledge of
the world, for a man who meets another, to fall upon
him about his trade or profession. What is it but to
sayI talk to you Sir about your trade because I perceive
that you cannot talk about any thing else. I bore you about
the shop, my dear friend, because I perceive that you are
not well-bred enough to know that well-bred men are never
guilty of an allusion to their peculiar trade or pursuit in
company
,
if it can be avoided. Thus you will see a shopkeeper
parading about with mustaches; a soldier prattling to a girl
about ribbons and gew-gaws; a man of great science, who
never knew how to make a tolerable bow, tripping up a room
as if he were employed to walk a minuet, while a
dancing-master
of the upper class would play the lounger by
trade; here a cast-iron political economist trying to
remember
a line of poetry, or to introduce a bit of a metaphora
bad one toowhere ever so good a one would be out of
place; and there a poet losing himself utterly on the
subject
of free-trade; here a man of wit playing the
fine-gentleman
,
there the fine-gentleman crowding himself into a group
of authors, and affecting to deal in reparteehere a
sketchpainter
who would be a critic, there a critic who would be a
a painter; here a fellow with abut enough. At first, I say,
I thought Sir George was talking about authorship to gratify
me, and I remember that I touched a gentleman at my side
who had just been giving us a good story of his own about the
tricks of the trade, and asked him if Sir George had not
been a little in the way of authorship for himselfhe
appeared
to know so much of what an author has to endure.
Of authorshipsaid hewhy, what say you Sir George?
You have dabbled in authorship a
few
, have you not?
Yesyesto be sure I have
Ahreally, said I, perhaps you would have no objection
to let me see, or to let me know what you have thought
proper to oblige the world with?
Oh but I should though. I never speak of my obligations to
others; and why should I speak of theirs to me! A laugh.
Ahyou are of the new school I see
The new schoolhow?
You never acknowledge your works.
Neverto tell you the truth Sir, I never wrote any thing
in my life that I should be willing to acknowledge now,
except
a few trifles that I threw off when I was a boy.
Modesty, Sir Georgeha ha ha!
True Edwards, truewe love to blush
unseen
.
Ha ha ha!
Do good by
stealth
and
blush
to find it fame.
Capital, Sir Georgecapital, ha ha ha!
But after all though, said I, if you are not sworn to
secrecy
,
I should like to see something of yours. I have an idea
that I should know your style
Indeed
Yes; and that after to-day I shall be able to recognise
you wherever I see you, and whatever may be your
disguise
I
thought one of the company looked disturbed at this.
Well well, if you can, you mayI give you leave to
catch me, if you can.
14*
Very fair; I'll begin the search to-morrow, provided you'll
answer me one question.
Wellwhat is it?
Have you not tried your hand at genteel-comedy?
At genteel comedy!
To be sure you have Sir George! cried my left-hand
neighbour with a laugh, which was followed by another from
every body at the table. For my own part I could not see
the joke.
Very truevery true Sir, as you say; but then, as the
devil would have it, when these genteel comedies of mine got
abroad, they were mistaken by people for tragedies.
Were they ever played?
Playedyes
Ha ha ha! Sir George!
But in a very serious way though, I can tell you.
Ha ha ha, said my neighbour. And you got nothing by
them I believe, Sir George?
No, not a guinea
Written for pleasure? said I
Yesfor pleasure.
I feel for you. To live by the pen Sir George, is a hard
life.
To die by the pen is harder though; yet cases frequently
occur
Indeed!
Yes, every year it falls in my way to know that some young
author of our creed has literally died by the pen.
Starved to death, I suppose; or dead of a broken heart?
No, by the rope
By the rope!O, I understand yousuicide?
True true, by suicide. By the by though, that reminds
me of a Yankee author I once met with; a very odd fellow
he was too; I never could make out whether he was
laughing
at me, or I at him.
You have hit the true Yankee character to the life, by
that one observation, said I. If a real na-tyve should happen
to make a very foolish mistake or to say a very foolish thing
before you, he would escape in the way you speak of;
he would contrive to say something or do something yet more
foolish before you, in such a manner that you would be
unable
to say whether he was laughing at
you
or you at him.
By the by, said our host, who appeared to enjoy the joke as
much as I did. By the byaddressing himself to me
you
have had no little experience here in the trade of authorship,
and when you hear that we are all authors
all!
every one
of usdeny it if you canhis eyes flashed fire as he said this,
and he grew very paledisappointed authors tooyou will
not refuse I hope, to give us a little account of what you
have had to endure.
With all my heart, said Iit may do you good.But
before I could finish the sentence a footman appeared with a
message for Edwards, who sent me a blank card on which
he had written with a pencil. `My wife wants to see you
go to her without any apology. Don't be away longI wish
you to see what authors are capable of.'
I followed the servant, who led me to a room where I
sawno noI never will name her name again while I
breathewhere I saw the proud beautiful woman of
sorrow
for the last time.
CHAPTER XVI.
DISCLOSURE... GOOD COUNSEL... GAMING.
The
moment she saw me, she started and came up to me
with a sort of eagerness that terrified meit was not the
eagerness
of joy---and putting both her hands into mine, stood
looking
at me as if she would read my very soul.
Who are they? said she, as soon as she could speak.
You have seen the whole of them nowwho are theywhat
are they?
I was terrified at her earnestness.
My dear madam, cried I, what
is
the matter with you!
How you tremblehow cold your hands arecome come,
let me lead you to the fire, I beseech you
Oh Sir, save him! save him! you did save him once;
let him owe more than life to you now.
Dear madamI beseech you! I will do any thing you
desire, any thing in the world for you, if you will try to
compose
yourself. Theretherewhat
can
I do for you?
Her head lay upon my shoulder and I could feel that she
was sobbing as if her heart would break.
Leave meleave mesaid she at last, lifting herself up
and pushing me away.
But you are very illyou are indeedpermit me to call
your
husband
. As I spoke, I drew her to the sofa, and
stretched out my hand for the bell-ropeit was too far off:
I could not reach it, and she hung upon my arm so heavily
that I was afraid to let her go.
Who are they! who are they! she cried again, lifting
herself
up from the sofa on which I had placed her, and locking
her hands with desperate fervor.
Do
tell me! Oh Sir! Sir!
how
can
you refuse to tell me! would you have me drop
down dead before your face; would you have me go out of
my senses with fear!
With fear madamfear of whatof whom?
Of the people thereof youof himof every body! oh
do tell me who they are!
I do not know, upon my wordI never saw them before;
if you mean the people above. Theretherecompose
yourself I pray you, you frighten me to death
I know you never saw them before; I know that very
welland oh I am so glad of it! and if my poor husband,
if he had never seen them beforeif he would never see
them again, I should be so happy! I should be willing to die
thenI should n't care to live another day
Don't talk of dying at your age madam, with such a
husband
as you have, with so much to make life dear to you
At my ageoh Sir! I am very old; very old and weary
of life. At
my
age! Here she wept with tenfold energy
I
will
talk of dyingI willI must! I cannot bear this life
I cannot bear to live without sleep, to live in perpetual fear
I cannotI will not! oh my God, my God! what will
become
of my poor Edward!
Here she was utterly overpowered by a burst of sorrow
the sofa shook with herand I was going to call out for help,
when she started up with a cry that I can hear nowa faint
eager cry, and laying hold of me with both hands, and
clinging
to me as if I were the only friend she had on earth, and
as if she thought I was going to leave herthough I had no
such ideashe looked me up in the face with a quivering lip,
and said to me with a sort of inward whisper that scared me,
SirSirpromise mepromise meswear to me! swear
that you will save him
I will, said Inot knowing what else to say, for she
appeared
to be out of her head.
Swear to me that you will avoid them for the rest of your
lifeswear it, Sir!
I willI do.
God for ever bless you Sir! Oh I thought you would
never
come away; I thought I never should see you again; I
thought
you
were ensnarednay nay, look at me! look at
memay I believe you? Do you speak the truth? will you
keep away from their society?
If you desire it, I will; but why should I? I have nothing
to losenothing to fear; and I love to study human
character
in every shape, and above all, in a shape so new to me.
Nothing to fear! So he thought a few months ago!
There there, compose yourself; you are low-spirited now,
worn out with fatigue and loss of sleep.
I never sleep now
The tone with which these few words were uttered, went
to my heart. I knew she spoke the truth. I could see the
proof in her altered visageI could see it in her neglected
hair which fell about her neck in a heavy massI could hear
it in her low harmonious irregular breathing, for her speech
was nothing more. And yet with all my sorrow and
sympathy
for her, and with all my pure love, there was a touch of
secret gratification herehere at my very heartwhich I
could not wholly subdue. Such is man.
You have made me happy Sirquite happy now, I feel
as ifas ifoh, you are very good to me Sir.
Then why do you weep so bitterly?
Do I weep! oh Sir I beg your pardonI did not mean
to weepI didn't know I was weeping, I declare. You'd
better go now
I rose to go, but she did not appear to observe it; for she
kept on talking as if she thought me still at her side.
After my death, you will be a friend to Edward I hope
you 'd better go now; they will miss you, and it may appear
strange as you saidif I weep now, it is for joydeep joy
I am very glad you camethere there, good by. God bless
you. I am very happy nowI shall die in peaceyou are
not fond of play, and I leave Edward in your care; you will
watch over him for my sake; you will be a brother to him
a father
Upon my soul, I could hardly restrain my tears, hardly
keep from sobbing with her, when she said this, laughable as
the idea was of my being a father to such a mana grave,
thoughtful man, five years older than myself I dare say, and
that too, at the desire of his young beautiful wife, who,
though she was wandering a little in her speech, appeared to
me likely to outlive both of us. For after all, what was there
in the grief that I saw, to break the heart of a proud woman
or to seal her forehead for the grave?
She
was not
shipwrecked
on her way to dominion.
Her
chariot-wheels were not
obstructed for ever. The world was not to her what it is
to the disappointed, proud mana great prison full of bad
air and bad spirits, and covered in with a gloomy
impenetrable
sky.
You are much better I perceive now; and I do hope,
said I, after she had grown a little more composedI do
hopeallow me to speak to you as a friendas a brother
as a fatherif you will, for I have the feelings of each toward
you; I do hope that hereafter you will not give way to such
vague terror; I know that much may be attributed to the
state of your health nowI wanted to say peculiar condition,
but I was afraidbut still, if you do not withstand it, you may
be sure of aof a
You saw them all I suppose? they were all thereyoung
and oldthe whole crewthe man you saw at our cottage?
No; if you mean Mr. Fontleroy. He was not of the party.
Indeed!
No.
So much the worse for you. They are afraid of him
they dare not betray their real characters to him. Poor
fellow
,
he has no idea of the truth any more than you have.
But your husband; he knows who they are surely?
True true SirI am afraid he does. But beware how
you suspect him of treachery; I see by your look that you
are beginning to judge him.
Oh nobut he should have told me who they were.
He will; but he would have you judge for yourself. No
no Sir; he would sooner die than betray you; he knows
you are poorI have heard him say so; and I believe in my
heart he has brought you together, only that you may see how
two or three men, who after all are among the most
extraordinary
men of the age he says
I interrupted her, astonished at the glow and beauty of her
countenance.
How much better you are, said I! do
do
be more upon
your guard. You have no idea how you frightened me
Did II am very sorry; but I had grown half-distracted
with fear while I was waiting for youknowing as I did
that you had been decoyed into the society of that wicked
old man, by my husband.
You speak of Sir George, I suppose?
Of
Sir George
! Never shall I forget her look, never the
tone with which these two words were slowly repeated by
her. Why, what on earth do you take these people for?
For disappointed authors.
Are you mad! They are gamblers, notorious shameless
thorough-bred gamblers.
I then repeated the conversation which had taken place at
the table.
I do not understand it, said she, after musing a while. If
they are all disappointed authors, I could forgive them for a
part of their transgressions, but nonoit is impossible, and
yet my poor Edwardhow came he to know so much of them,
or they of him, if there be not some dreadful sympathy of
the sort between them? Have you told him your story?
No; but I was on the very point of doing so, at his own
desire, when your message arrived.
It will do no good nowhe will never go back to the
cottage
;
he will never be satisfied now with the slow gains of
authorship. Oh Sir, I cannot express to you how dreadful
the idea is to me of living on the pillage of the gaming-table
Perhaps you are mistakenhow do you know that these
people are what you say they are.
I do not know it by any such proof as would satisfy you,
butstay, stay. You have promised never to see them
again
If you desire it I have, though I really do wish to study
their characters
You shall be gratified. Return to the table and watch
every
word they speak. When you have satisfied yourself, go
awayand oh, for the love of God, if they prove to be, what
I believe them to be, do not go near them for the rest of your
life! You may be married one day; you may be a father
you may be aher emotion choked heraathe husband
of a woman, who may live to wish that she had never seen
you, if you be once touched by the dreadful passion that
absorbs
them.
I
will
promise, cried II will! but compose yourself, I
pray you. Your agitation terrifies me; you take the matter
too seriouslyindeed you do.
Too seriously! Oh Sir if you knew all! if you knew the
circumstances of our marriage! The kindest husband, the
truest, and so proud of his wife! never away from my side
15
but with sorrow, till he saw these men. Oh sir, sir! you
would never say that I regard the matter too seriously, if you
knew how much we have endured together, he for me and I
for him, year after year, without one word of reproach or
complaint
how
we have clung to each other in sickness and
povertyin despairin a solitude where there was no hope
each upheld by the other's integrity, and each willing to die
for the other. So happy too! So happy in spite of the
world, for I knew that he loved me with all his heart and
soul, though but for me sir, he never would have known what
it was to be a poor man or a disappointed man. He would
have pursued the mighty, and long before this, he would have
outstripped the mightyhe would not have been what he is
now, a shipwrecked mana cast-away. Oh God! that I
were able to recover the power I once had over his heart! I
was prouder of him in his poverty, than I ever shall be
now, though he were to become to every body what he has
been to mea something superior to the rest of mankind, a
sort of standard, whereby to measure all other men.
You deserve to be happy, and you will be happy, said I, in
spite of th. Be cheerful and you may recover the power
you had, even if that power be lessened, which by-the-by, I
do not believe. It may appear so to you madam, but
perhaps
I am a better judge than you in your state of health,
and I have heard enough and seen enough to satisfy me,
that no man ever loved woman with a more fixed or a
prouder love than he bears toward you
Do
you think so?
Think soI am sure of it.
Ah sir! you have no idea how happy you make me.
I do not say this to gratify nor to calm youthough I feel
for you and pity you, and would say much to calm you: but
I say it because I believe what I say, and because I see that
you are giving up to a fear, which if you do not overcome it
will overcome youand destroy youand
yours
.
You make me afraid siryou fill me with awe. Who
are you that have courage to speak truth to a woman? what
are you that you dare to speak such truth to me!
I have not offended you, I hope
Offended me! No sir! But you have made me feel that
you have a power which you ought not to have, though
you were a good man, a power which makes me afraid of
youover my understanding.
I have no such power believe me; it is the power of truth
which you mistake for that of a man. If you had a
brother
Oh that I had one, sir!
Or a father, he would say to you
Oh my poor father! my poor poor broken-hearted father!
He would say to you what I now say. Never doubt your
husband's lovedeath were better for you. He may not be to
you all that you expected before your marriage; but are you
so to him? He may not always be what he was for a time
after your marriagebut are you? You are alteredand
why should not he alter? You may love him as much as
everyou may love him a great deal more than ever; but
is your love now such love as you felt before the brief
delirium
of your hearts had subsided? No! it is another, and
a holier, and a more serious love. The blood has nothing
to do with itnonor the every-day nature of man. It is a
love that grows up out of tried affection, tried worth, tried
probitya love that never changes but with the changes of
our character, of our immortal part. No nonever allow
either sickness or sorrow to disturb your faith in his love.
Ask yourselfyou are marriedyou have been married a
long whilecan
you
ever forgetunder any
circumstances
of trial or of sorrow, the joy of your heart when you saw
that you were beloved by the man you afterwards married?
Or the sweet sleep that you had as he lay watching over you
for the first time? Or the deep inward thrill, or the secret awe
that came over you when you perceived that you were to
be a mother? Noand why should you fear that a father
would forget such things?
She made no reply; but her tears fell fast and flashed
like large rain-drops as they passed the light.
And so long as he remembers his feeling and you yours, when
you dropped asleep for the first time on his shoulder; so long
as you both remember the convulsion of joy that shook both of
you at the first cry of your first child; so long believe me
you have nothing to fear.
I do believe youI do, I do! she cried, and before I could
prevent her, she caught my hands up to her mouth and
kissed
them, and when I plucked them away, they were wet
with tears. Will you be a brother to meshe addedmay I
call you brother?
I could not speak.
My brothermy dear brotherhow you came by this
deep knowledge of the human heartof a mother's heartI
do not know nor ask. But knowing so much of what you say
to be true, I am willing to believe the restI am willing to
hopemy dear brother.
You have no brother?
No brotherno fatherno mother.
Poor soulI pity you.
If you knew my story, you
would
pity me; you would feel
as ifstaystayblessed be God, I have it in my power to
prove my faith in you! You shall hear my storyyou shall
know that of me, which no mortal at this hour knowsnot
even Edward himself.
Would that be doing as you would be done by?
She hesitated.
How dare you put yourself so much in my power?
Do I not know you? Have I not tried you as never man
was tried before? Why Sir, the very questions you put prove
you to be trustworthy. And where is the woman who would
refuse to put faith in such as you, if she were in sorrow?
Do I not see that your knowledge of the human heart is
employed
her
manner grew very impressivenot for evil but
for good?
At any other time, at any other place I could have wept
for joy, to hear this beautiful woman speak so to a man that
loved her.
Why, when I have it in my power to add to that
knowledge
,
why refuse to add to it, especially when there is no
other
proof in the world for me to give, no other sign of my
gratitude, of my great faith in your integrityI never mean
to see you more
I was thunderstruck at this, though prepared to say the very
same thing to her.
You have been to me all that a brother could have been
or a father. To you I owe more than my lifemuch more
I owe
his
life, and the hope that I shall see him rescued by
you and restored to me. To you I owe it sir, that now
now while I speak to you, I am not altogether a reproach to
womanhood. Sirsirwhat I say to you is perfectly true.
It was you that saved meyou that restored me. But for you,
I should have been a self-murderessyou gave me
I would have interrupted her, but she filled me with such
fear, that I could not.
You gave me hope, though you were a stranger. You
trusted me, though I had never seen your face before. You
were faithful to your charge, and have been so up to this
hour, though I betrayed mine before I slept
15*
Forbear, I beseech you.
No sir, no! I shall not forbear. It is high time you knew
the nature of the obligations I owe you. I would have you
know the wholeevery thing; I would have you know that
which I would have nobody else on earth know. Nay, nay,
are you not an author? And why should I not unveil before
you as I would before a statuary or a painter? You are to be
trustedyou appear to be a good manyou draw from the
heart, and why should you not draw from life? And where
would be the reproach, if I were to become a study for
you
For God's sake madam; do not talk to me in this way!
I know not whether you are serious or not, nor whether you
are mocking me or not.
I believe you, though it goes hard with me to believe that
you could so misapprehend the nature of a woman, who never
mocked at any body nor any thing in her life. But hear
mehear my story. That shall be my answer to your
remark
.
I bowed
CHAPTER XVII.
THE YOUNG METHODIST... DANGER OF BEAUTY.
I shall
be very brief. I am not what I appear. My name
is not Mary; it is MariaMaria Pey, but no no, I dare
not, I will not hazard the name of my dear father even to you.
I was born in A, a village of Staffordshire. I was very
happy sir, and as innocent as a dove, till my poor mother
said to me with a severe look one day that my father and I
were much too proud of my beauty. Of my beauty! and
was I beautiful then! Was I of the few that I never heard
spoken of but with praise, that I never saw approach, but
they were welcomed with joy by my dear father? could it be
so? I will go to him, said I, and ask him before I sleep.
I did go, I went straightway to my father, I got upon his knee,
I crept into his bosom, I hid my face there, and when I had
courage enough to speakfor I was afraid of my mother
I asked him if I was indeed one of the beautiful. He kissed
me and wept upon my neck, and would have escaped the
question, but I persevered until he was obliged to own that
I was what my mother had reproached me for being,
beautiful
;
and that he did not love me the less for being so.
Need I say more? I could not sleep; I could not stifle
the joy of my foolish heart. By and by the young men
pursued
me and the young women kept away, as if they were
afraid of me. Two or three of my beloved companions
forsook
me, one after another, and all began to treat me with a
reserve that made me very unhappy; and when I begged to
know what I had done, they kept away, or spoke to me as if
they no longer loved me; and my good mother, who grew
more and more pious every day, and to make me love piety,
found more and more fault with me, as she grew more and
more pious, till I had no courage left I declareno heartno
hopetold me their behavior was owing to the beauty my
father took such pride inGod bless that father! he never
told me a fortieth part as much; and that if I lived to grow
up, I should be hated for my good looks; and that my fine
shape and high stature would be a curse to me. I could
not believe her. I chose to believe my father. Did he not
love them that were beautiful? And did not I? And had he
not acknowledged that he did not love me the lessand why
should theyfor my face, or my shape, or my stature?
Poor soul! I do pity you; I foresee the issue of your
story.
Well---my dear mother being a very religious woman
could not bear to see me cheerful. She kept me at home
with hershe kept me busyshe would not suffer me to go
abroad nor even to wear a dress like other people. Her
object
was---and she avowed it before my sister Judith, who
belonged to the church, and spoilt her fine dark hair as the
rest of the church didher object was to humble me, to
break down my spirit, to mortify my pride in every possible
way, to teach me that beauty was a thing to be sorry for and
ashamed of. Nothing else could save me, she thought. She
would preach to me by the hour, when I was tired and sleepy
and anxious to be a-bed where and where only I could
forget
my sorrow; and always about something which I never
could understand for my life, or about something which never
appeared to be true, or of any use if it were true. She would
go out of her way, not to shield me, but to expose me to
reproof
,
and to the reproach and ridicule of those, who even
while they ridiculed me, were serious. All day long I had
some heavy unintelligible book before me, about I never
knew whatI never cared what. I only know that I had
much to read, that I had much to learn whether I would or
no, and that if I failed in my task, or dropped asleep to a
fourth or fifth discourse in the same day, I had a chapter in
the Bible to get by heart, or a page of Hannah More---
I
do
pity you!
---Or a detestable hymn or twoI love good poetryover
and above my task for the following day, and that I
discovered
what I take to be a truth of a great value.
What was it pray?
Thisthat what we learn with pain we forget with
pleasure
.
A discovery indeeda truth which deserves to be
recorded
in marble over the door-way of every place on earth
devoted to education
Wellat fifteen she charged me with being too free
before
the young men of the village. Too free! said I, how
so?I really did not understand her. I behaved in the
same way to every body; I was not more free with the
young men that I knew, than I was with the young women.
But she made me perceiveI know not howthat young
men were to be regarded with fear, that every young man
was my natural foe. I wanted to ask her why, but I was
afraidmy courage died away within me, at her look
I was by nature, timid grateful and affectionate
You timidyou, with your haughty step
Yes II with my haughty step, as timid a creature as ever
breathed. But after this, if a young man spoke to me, or
come near me, I could hardly keep down my heart, or
withhold
my tears; and after he had gone away, I could not
sleep sometimes, for the trouble and sore perplexity of my
thought. My mother did not love me---I could see that
she would neither caress me, nor let me caress her, and I
could not live without being caressed by somebody. My
father knew this and pitied me, and loved me too much I
am afraid, because my mother loved me so little. He was a
retired naval captain, a rough sensible good man, much
older
than my mother, on whom he doted until she took to the
church, became a Methodist, and parted her beautiful hair
upon her forehead, in spite of all be could say or do, and
strove to mortify in Judith and me, what he called the
proper
spirit of an English woman. Poor Judith! she obeyed
without a word or a murmur, but I could not obey, my nature
was not the nature of Judith, and so I had no peace of my life.
I
would
carry my head high, for it was natural to me; I
would not stoop, nor drag my feet after me on my way to
church; for it tired me to stoop, and it tired me more to walk
as my mother would have me walk. And yet, I did not
know that my carriage was haughty nor my step free.
For a long while my father used to bring with him a heap of
clothes and trinkets, whenever he returned from a voyage, and
a multitude of things that I never knew what to do with, after
we became religious. And long after I had grown up, he
always had me on his knee, rigged out in some costly garb
or other of which we never knew the value, with my head
upon his shoulder, my cheek to his, and my arms about his
neck. I loved him with a love that no language can
describe
but
I loved him like a child and without knowing
why. It was the instinct of my nature to love and I had
nobody
else to lovenothing else on earth to love, not so much
as a bird, or a tree, or a flower.
I know not why it isit may be because my dear father
was always kinder and gentler to me than my motherit
may be because I never yet received much kindness from
any body in the shape of a woman, but so it is, that from my
childhood up, the kindness of a man has always been very
powerful with me---so powerful, that if he was a great or
a good man, touched with sorrow or bowed with grief, and I
saw the water stand in his eyes, or heard him speak with
great gentleness and gravity, though we were strangers to
each other, I have been ready to fall upon his neck and weep
there, as I would upon the neck of my own father.
I have been told that when I was a baby, I would not
suffer
a woman to take mebut that I would go to a man with
a cry of joy, and that my father could put me to sleep at any
time in a few minutes; nay, that for a frolic, it was common
to deceive me by putting a hat upon the head of a
woman, without which I would never go to one if I could help
it. I mention this to you sir, because I have been twitted
with it a hundred times in a week I dare say by my poor
mother, who teased me and worried me about such things till
I grew miserable, nay Sir---till I was made to understand
many things that I ought never to have understood.
As long ago as I can rememberyou will forgive my
rambling
I hope; I am doing now what I never did before, and
you must give shape to the storyI began to dislike the
society
of my own sex, whether married or single, and
whatever
might be their age. They were always lying about me,
or to me, or teasing me with speeches about some young man
or other, till I was ready to cry for vexation; yet I had
always
a dear friend or two till I grew up to the stature of
womanhood
after
which I never could find either a play-fellow
or a dear friend among women.
I have attributed all this to envy, and the more, because
to tell you the truth, I have always found the bitterest reproof
and the most unpalatable advice to proceed from neglected
womenladies of a certain age, or as
I
should say, of a very
un-certain age. The men have always treated me kindly,
and the very boys that I knew, were all sweet-tempered, and
gentle, and obliging to me. What wonder if I disliked girls
and women who were never so? The older I grew, the
stronger grew my preference for the society of men. I took
no pleasure in the society or the occupations of women. I
despised bothand I had not wit enough nor wisdom enough
to conceal it. Of course they hated meand of course they
slandered me. As I grew up, I discovered that most of the
men were fools, or knaves
Goodness me! thought Iwe have no such
milk-and-water
to deal with here, as I have been prepared for.
But even their gossip was more tolerable than the best
of what I heard from the she-people about me. I had many
offers of marriage, but I refused them allI had no idea that
I ever should marry, I could not imagine it possible, when I
came to know what would be expected of me in marriage.
Why should I give up my libertythe little I have now
I used to say to myself, twenty times in the course of the day.
Why become a slave? Why give up the power I possess over all
the men that approach me? If it be true that I am deceived
by those, who appear to be so gentle and so good, why seek
to be undeceivedand why by an experiment so costly as
marriage? From that, if I should be deceived, there will be
no escape. In a wordwhy leave my dear, dear father, I
used to say to myself; I do not want to be married---I do not
want a bed-fellow; or if I do, there is Judith; I never could
bear to sleep with a mansir!
Madam!
Did you smile?
Smileno indeed!
What I say to you is the truth
I am sure of it. Smileno madam, it were much easier
to weep.
But if you are like other men, it will appear very strange
to youthe simplicity I speak of, at my age---perhaps
incredible
.
Far from it.
You are not like other men; you appear to have a truer,
if not a deeper knowledge of the human heart.
Not of the
human
heartexcuse me, but I have a
knowled
of
woman's
heart, which if it be not a deeper and a truer
knowledge than is common, really deserves to be so, for it
makes all you say appear very credible to me.
A proof that your knowledge of woman, whatever it may
be, has been gathered from high and pure sources.
Not altogether madam, I do not say that,but while
women
are educated as they are, every thing is credible to me
which goes to show that they have been turned over to their
husbands by their foolish mothers, in a pitiable state of
delusion
;
that up to the day of her marriage, a woman, otherwise
well educated, may be nothing more than a great green girl
a great baby.
Well sir, after a time, the lovers that I refusedcontrary
to what I expected of them---for they taught me by their
words
when the affair came to issue, that to refuse a lover
was to make a friend for life, to secure a brother who would
give up every pursuit in life to watch over you, a sort of
guardian angel who would never, never forget you, nor cease
to love youthey went over to the side of my she-foes one
by one, where if they did not mock me, nor lie about me,
they suffered me to be called a coquette. I did not know
the meaning of the word for a great while; but when I did,
I was rather gratified than otherwise; for why reproach a
woman with seeking to be loved?
With seeking to be loved so innocently too---
Yes. By and by, my mother told me to bewarethat I
was getting a bad name. Wife! said my father---starting up
out of his chairwife! Never shall I forget his look. Oh said
I, a coquette I suppose, or a proud vain girl, or a flirt? No
16
Miss
Maria, said my mother. Wifewiferepeated he,
you know how much I love you; you know that I am faithful
in whatever I once undertake; you know that I married you
in spite of the changes I saw, when after twelve years of
separation
,
I got back and found you, a sister-of-the-church, as
you call it, a bride to your Saviournay nay, I will not be
interrupted. You know meexplain the speech, I have
just heard. Be quick, and observe what I sayyou know
whether I am likely to be as good as my word; if I ever
hear you call Maria,
Miss
Maria again, as you did just now,
we are no longer man and wife. My mother was terrified.
Speakspeak wifewhat is the bad name they give her?
They call her the lady now
Lady
Maria.
So much the better, said he; and who cares, thought I. So
much the bettershe
is
a lady; nay wife, she is more, she is
what few ladies are, she is a gentlewoman by nature. Do
what she will, say what she will, she has always the look of a
gentlewoman. Here Mariahere; give me a kiss. I obeyed.
There wife, said hethere; show me another woman able
to do that! able to receive a kiss without looking as if she did
not deserve it, or as if it were a thing not to be proud of.
For shame Robert, for shame! said my mother, as he drew
her up to him and kissed her with a quivering lip, and held
her to his heart, and whispered something to her which made
her smile, in spite of her determination to be serious.
From that hour I began to take pleasure in the idea of
being called Lady Maria, and a sort of childish delight in the
display of my finery, though I was never permitted to go
abroad with it, even by piecemeal. To prove that I knew
how to sit like a gentlewoman too, I would loll on the sofa by
the hour together, when I could get by myself; or sit on my
father's knee with a great India shawl about me, and half my
rich wardrobe on my back, when my poor mother was away.
At last however she caught me parading a large desolate
room in cold weather, with a slow step, as if I were
marching
to music. I do not know what possessed me; but the
truth is, that she found me there quite by myself and blue
with the cold, rigged out in all that I could contrive to get on,
of the heaps of outlandish dresses that my father had brought
from the sea, and the isles of the sea. I knew not which
way to look, and she verily thought me mad, I am sure. I
was the first to recover, and I tried to steal away, but she
caught me, and rung the bell, and would have proceeded to
strip me before all the servants I do believe, had I not
recollected
myself in time to say--Mother, you have called me Miss
Maria againif you do not suffer me to go quietly away,
my father shall know it, before I sleep, whatever be the
consequences
!
I had no time to consider what I should sayI was
half mad with vexation, desperate with fear and shameI
hardly knew what I did say, till I saw my proud mother stop,
and turn pale as if I had struck her to the heart, and throw up
her arms with a feeble cry, and fall with her whole length
upon the floor. I was terrified to death at first; I
screamed
for help---I knew not what I had said, nor what I had
done, till I saw her move, when I gave her in charge to
Judith
,
and escaped to my room where I tore off the finery I was
loaded with, and made a vow never to wear it again; but I
felt as if in some way or other I had been guilty of
parricide
.
She never forgave me I am sure, though I went down on
my knees to her the next day, after watching at her
chamber-door
all night, and tried every way in my power to persuade
her that I had no meaning in what I said. Nonoshe
never forgave me. But the spell of authority was broken
for ever. I found I had within me a courage that I had
never
dreamed of, a brave something which had never been
visible
before.
By and by too I discovered the meaning of her speech
I heard her call a woman of no character
Miss
. Oh what a
bitter
day that was to me! and what a long, long night! I
almost
cried my heart out, as I lay in bed hour after hour,
unable
to get a wink of sleep, and afraid and ashamed to show
my face even to my dear father. I was truly wretched,
humbled to the very dust, and so penitent sir, that with a
kind word or two my mother might have made me any thing
she desiredeven a Methodist. I would have gone to
chapel
,
I would have dressed any how, I would have worn my
hair any way to please her. But some how or other, in
the midst of my grief, it occurred to me that when my
mother
called me
Miss
Maria, she had said something more about
my innocence. Of my innocence!that led me to think of
guilt. You wonder at my courage
I do indeed
But so it was. Until that hour, as I hope for mercy, I
had no idea of what was intended by the speech of my cruel
mother. I pray you to believe meI pray you to repeat
my storyit may do much good when I am no more. I
remember
my feeling now, as if it were but last night, my
consternation
eagernessand
perplexity. I remember that my
blood thrilled with fear as I lay and meditated on the mystery.
I had heard before of reproach and of dishonor, but I had never
known the true meaning of the words till now, when it came
to me like a flash of light. Can you believe what I say?
YesyesI do believe you.
I was very simple to be sureI crept under the clothes I
remember, and covered my face; but when I tell you that
my mother used to say, after the birth of a child, that it had
been brought by the nurse, and that I believed hertill I
was almost old enough to be a mother myself, what I say to
you may appear more credible. Yet such is the fact. I
was full thirteen before I had any other ideaand I was full
sixteen before I knew that babies are what they area part
of their own mothers
Well
I have come to a period of my story nowpray pardon
melet me try to recollect myself. III mean to give
you the truth sir, and the whole truth, but you knowI am
sure you dothatthatshe covered her face with her
hands, I saw the tears trickling through her fingers, and I
trembled with apprehension.Oh sir! believe me, it is more
easy for a proud woman to go astray than to speak of it
I could hardly get my breath
About this time Sir, I became acquainted with a
middleaged
man, who was a tutor in our neighborhood. He was a
favorite with every body, with my father, my mother, my
sister
,
and myself. And yet he never appeared anxious for the
good opinion of either. His conversation was unlike that of any
body that I had ever seen at that time. He was thought to be a
man of high birth, and I believe was, though very poor. My
mother was afraid of him, and my father acknowledged one
day that Mr. OI need not give his namewas quite
familiar
with every thing about a ship. Of course he became a
favorite with my dear father, and of course
A favorite with you, said I.
Yes. But I did not love himI could not love himI
was too much afraid of him for that.
I smiled
Hear me through, before you judge me. Though I did
not love this man, I took a sort of pleasure in his company,
in hearing him talk, and in watching his countenance.I
would sit before him for half the day, listening to his deep
rich voice, and watching the light and shadow that played in
the depth of his eyes, without hearing one word in five that
16*
he spoke, or understanding what he said, any more than if
he had been conversing in a language I was ignorant of.
What color were they?
I do not know.
Very wellproceed.
I knew not how he got such an ascendency over me;
but I declare to you, that at one time, although I did not love
him, he could have made me do any thing he pleased
I thought so
Nay nay, you are angry now; that look is unworthy
of you.
Proceed I beseech you. It is time for me to go; and
your husband will think it very strange if I go without
returning
to the company above stairs.
Very truetouching the bellvery true, and I beg you
not to go without returning to them, nor without hearing the
remainder of my storywe are nigh the catastrophe now.
I thought so, I was just going to say,when a servant
appeared
.
Go to your master, and say to him that Mr. H. will be
with him in a few minutes.
CHAPTER XVIII.
EDUCATION OF A SENSITIVE GIRL: SIMPLICITY.
Do not make up your mind sir, till you hear the rest of
my story. After I knew this man, I grew tired of all other
society; I could not bear the talk of other people, nor the
amusements of other people. Yet if I know my own heart
now, and I think I doI am old enoughit was fear that
worked upon me, not love. He was wretchedI never
knew whybut I would have laid down my life at one time
to make him happy
You have said as much already
Some great sorrow was eating his heart away; but he
never complained, he never spoke as if he needed sympathy,
although I could see that he was more cheerful when I was
near him, than at other times.
Indeed
At last he began to talk with me; but for a good while I
was so frightened, I did not hear one word in fifty of what
he saidyou have no idea how stupid I wasI really could
not hear him, though we sat side by side on a couch like
this
Umph!
And yet the moment he was gone, all that he had been
saying would recur to me with such force, night after night,
as to keep me awake.
You were not in love though all this time; you are sure
of that?
When he saw this, he took pity on me
The devil he did!
Ah, how unreasonable you are.
Very true.
You men are all pretty much alike I am afraid
I hope not
So do I. And after a whileI am quite sure of this too
whatever you may think, after you have heard the whole
story
after
a while, he began to love me.
Indeed
Yeshe could sit by me as you do now, hour after hour,
without opening his mouth
Madamare you laughing at me?
God forbid! You are not a man to he laughed atand he
would look at me, I have heard my father say, till the tears
stood in his eyes, when he thought nobody saw him
As I do, thought II wonder she does not pop me in
there.
And then perhaps, after being very agreeable, he would
start up of a suddenas you did about an hour agoand
leave the house, and not show himself again for a whole
week. I desired to know why he behaved in this way;
and he told me that I was very much like somebody that he
loved, and somebody that he was in some way or other
separated
from.
How did you feel when he said this?
FeelI was very much gratified.
What a mystery you are! I never saw any body like you.
Wellafter this, he began to talk in a very odd way of
sparing me; and of sparing me for the sake of another.
The scoundrel
Sir! He was no more a scoundrel than
Than I am, hey?
She bowed
Proceed, I pray you.
I did not understand him; yet I saw by his look that he had
said something, which he expected me to be offended at.
Wellhe went away
Went away! You are skipping a part of the story
madam
She smiled. No no. He went away, and his last words
were
Were they his
last words
madam; were they, of a truth?
You hope they were, I see plainly.
That I do!
For shame. You are happy now, said heOh sir!
never
shall I forget his look, nor the tone of his deep rich mellow
voice, nor the dead quiet of that evening
It ocurred to me just here, I can't say why, that
my
voice
had never been remarkable for depth or mellowness; but I
said nothingI waited the issue.
You are happy now, Maria. We were leaning side by
side, out of the window of a little rustic summer-house that
overhung the river; the weather was warm
Ugh
And the stars were very thick in the smooth water.
And I perceived as he spoke a ripple just underneath my feet
as if a large rain-drop had fallen there. I looked upnot a
shadow was to be seen overhead, not a dim spot in the whole
sky. And though to be sure, I have known people weep for
joy as well as for sorrow, yet I never knew any body to weep
without knowing it, as I must have done, if the tear was
mineYou are happy now, Maria
Was that all he said?
You are happy now, and I leave you that I may not make
you otherwise. I go away from you that the resemblance
which distracts me, may not be rendered altogether complete.
Madam
Well
Did
he go? that's the point if you please
did
he go?
He did go. But after he was gone, I grew sorrowful,
peevish
,
and weary of life. I spent half my days in walking where
we had walked together, and half my nights in saying over to
myself what he had been saying to me at intervals for three
months before. I began to waste away; every body saw it,
even my dear father, who could not bear me out of his sight;
and my poor mother told me my temper was a trial to her
And yet you did not love this man.
Noif I know what love is, I did not.
Would you have married him?
No.
Very well. Proceed, if you please.
Just one year from the day of his departurethe very day
as I stood leaning out of the window of the little
summerhouse
at
the very same hour toothe sky as bright and the
river as clear, thinking of what he said when he left me,
another big rain-drop struck the water, just underneath my
feet. I was afraid to look upfor the very night before, I
had been visited with a terrible dreamI thought I saw his
spirit coming toward me with a slow step out of the shadow
of the large trees at the end of our favorite walkafraid to
stir and almost afraid to breathe; for though I did not see him
nor hear him, I knew that he was at my side; I knew it by
the feeling of the very atmosphere about me.
Of coursenothing could be more natural. Who spoke
first?
I do not know. He was very pale and haggard
You did look up then, hey? You did stir, you did
breathe, after all?
But his proud stern eyes were prouder than ever,
sterner
than ever; there was a secret in themI could see it
in their fiery depth.
Indeed.
I was very happy; so happy that I did not care to live
another day. The moment he spoke to me, I felt as if the
previous year of sorrow had never been, as if we
had parted in our usual way and met in our usual way.
After looking at me, as my father would have looked at me,
he drew me up to his heart, with the strength of a giant
Wellsaid Icatching my breath as I spoke.
And set his lips to my forehead
Well
He had never kissed me before, and I was dreadfully
frightened by his fervor
Natural enoughbut proceed, I pray you.
But I felt no joy in the kiss; for it appeared to me that his
lips were like a live coal, and the touch of his hand as it
clasped mine terrified me; I could feel every pulsation
through every part of my frame. It appeared to be all alive.
I dare say it was
I do not regard what you say now; it may be my turn to
laugh, by and by
I hope it may; I would give the world to see you laugh.
He told me where he had beenit was a great way off.
He told me what he had been forit was to say farewell
to the woman of his heartfarewell to her whom he thought
me so like
Good God! how pale you are! She appeared to be
suffocating
.
After a short struggle she added, in a voice that
thrilled through and through me with its counterfeit
pleasantry
.
He was a married man
Had he the courage to say so?
Yes, he had been to say farewell to his wife on her
deathbed
.
She was in America
In Americawhat was her name?
I do not know, I never asked her name. He loved her
how could I bear to ask her name? She was now dead,
and some childI hardly know whose or what, for when he
spoke of it, he appeared to be gasping for breathwas dead
also. When I left you Maria, said he, I meant to come back
and marry you, and then I had such magnificent dreams of
the future! I thought of recovering what I had lost, my power
and my birth-right, and of passing all my life with a woman
like her who had betrayed me, and with a boy like him that
I had lost for ever. I could not understand his speechI
would notfor he had never spoken of marriage to me; but I
felt a sickness of the heart, a strange wayward heavy sorrow
stealing over me, as he proceeded. Such was my hope
when I left you, said he; but I cannot marry you now.
Here followed another suffocating pauseafter a brief
struggle she continuedSir!though I never saw the time
when I would have married this man, yet now, when I heard
him say that he could not marry me, when I saw by his look
that he would not marry me, that by no possibility could we
ever be so dear to each other as we might have been--perhaps
perhapsbut for the vow which I thought he must have
made by the bed-side of a dying wif,e or by that of a dead
childoh sir! I cannot give you an idea of the sorrow, of the
heavy, insupportable sorrow that weighed me to the earth
Where was your pride?
Pride sir! where all pride is, when there is no hope. I
felt as if I had no longer any business on earth; I felt as if
I had been betrothed to him all my life, as ifas ifin a
word, I forgot where I wasI forgot my fatherI forgot
myself
A figure of speech I hope! said I, quite thrown off my
guard by her provoking composure.
I love you too much to destroy you, said he. I have come
back, I hardly know why, dear Mariabless me! you have
snapped your watch-chain
So I have; but proceed with your story.
I hardly know why, dear Maria
You have a good memory
dear
Maria, said I.
Dear Maria, unless it be to say farewell to you, and
to caution you against all who appear to you like me, haughty
and reserved and wretched. We are more dangerous dear,
than the youthful or the rich, the happy, the handsome, the
brave, or the eloquent
Fudge
Pity and awe are more fatal to such as you, said he, than
joy, or hope, or admiration, or love
Pho
I could not sleep a wink that night
Here's a break in the narrative! said Ito myself
And I was at my father's door by peep of day, determined
to tell him every thing that had occurred
No!
Yes
But
did
you tell him?
I did
Well
Why! what's the matter with you! how happy you look!
God bless you, that's all! I have nothing more to say;
butsnapping my fingersGod for ever bless you!
To tell you the truth, after my head was on the pillow, I
began to have a sort of aa sort of a misgiving just here
touching her heart with a smileabout the behaviour of this
married man, though I acquitted him of treachery
Of course; but what did your father say?
17
Not much. He was a man of few words; he merely
took me upon his knee, and giving me a most affectionate
kiss and a hearty hug, said he hoped I would oblige him so
far as to drop a line to Mr. O, saying that he had better
keep out of the way of my father.
Which you did?
Yes, with joy, adding for a P. S. that he had better keep
out of the way of my father's daughter.
How could you! was he not still dear to you?
Very dearbut not so dear as my father's approbation.
You are a good girl, by JoveI beg your pardonbut
what said he in reply?
Nothingnot a word.
Wellwhy do you stop? why turn away your face?
I stop that I may gain courage to tell you the rest; I
would have you know the whole truth.
As she spoke, the smile disappeared from about her mouth,
and her eyes filled.
About four months after thisallow me to hurry on to the
catastrophe, I pray youI had begun to be cheerful. My
father was happy, and for a great while nothing had been
heard of Mr. O. But one evening as I sat half asleep
in the little summer-house, which I had kept away from for a
great while, under a superstitious idea connected with the
rain-drop I spoke of, he appeared suddenly before me
looking just as usualjust as if nothing had happened. I
spoke to him freelyI was grieved and sore, I told him, that
he should have so little regard for propriety; and I begged
him to withdraw, immediately and without noise, if he cared
a farthing for his life. When you have heard what I have
to say, said he, I shall go, and not before. I attempted to
pass him; but he stood in my way with a look which at any
other time would have subdued me. I tremble for you, said
he. You have made me a desperate man Mariahear what
I have to say, I beseech you, if not for my sake, for your
own sakefor the sake of your father. Of my father! said
Isecuring the bell-rope as I spokeI have promised my
father to see you no more. I shall keep my word. If you
wish me to respect youif you would not smother at once all
regard in my heart for you, leave medo leave me! But
he would not stir a step, and as I knew that my courage
would not last long, if he persevered, I put on a gay careless
air, and shaking the bell-rope before his eyes, told him if he
did not disappear, in some way or otherup or downI cared
not which, before I counted three, I would alarm the house.
He defied me, and was reaching out his arm toward the
bell-rope, when I saw that no time was to be lost. One
twothreesaid Iand before the words were out of my
mouth, I heard the alarm-bell pealing in my father's study.
Then sir, then for the first time, did the terrible consequences
appear to me. Oh for the love of God, sir, said I, do leave
me! for your own sake leave me!for my sake!for the
sake of my dear father! But nonohe folded his arms,
and stood facing the broad avenue, which now began to
rattle
with footsteps. I could forbear no longerI fell upon
my kneesI bowed my forehead to the dust before his feet,
praying him to go away, and escape death, if it was only in
mercy to me. I know not what followedI only know that
I saw the faces of my father, of my mother, and of two or
three of our old servants crowding up to the door with
dreadful
eagernessthat I heard the voice of my father sounding
as I never heard it before--and that while I was trying to stay
his uplifted arm, a pistol went off close to my ear, and it
grew suddenly dark about me.
I heard nothing more, I saw nothing more, till I woke in
my own bed, as out of a long sweet sleep, and saw my dear
father hanging over me, and my mother, and my sister, and
a nurse all sitting about the room with their faces turned
away from the light, as if they were wearied with
overwatching
.
Fatherdear father, said Iwhat ails you? what's
the matter with you? what have I done? But why tell of
the joy of my heart, when he kissed me and spoke to me
more kindly than ever, and called me his brave dear child;
why say to you that on seeing my father safe, I forgot even to
ask about poor Mr O.
You amaze me
But after a while I did inquire, and I had the grief to
hear that he had barely escaped with his life, that he was
yet under the care of a surgeon, and that he had received a
shot of which he would carry the mark to his grave. I wept
for him
You weep now
Do Iit is for myself then; for he, I have reason to
believe
now, is happy, while IO Father of Mercies!how
much have I to endure still! how much have I had to
endure
in consequence of that dreadful interview!
Her voice died away, and she appeared to be choking; but
after a short pausea pause of unspeakable terror to me
she drew a long breath, as if she had recovered her
self-possession
by a great effort, and proceeded with her story.
CHAPTER XIX.
ADVENTURE ON THE ROAD... THE CLUB-ROOM.
The
substance of that story, I shall now try to give; I
cannot do moreI cannot give her wordsI dare not; nor
can I describe to you the fixedness of her look, nor the
sobs, nor the sharp throes, nor the burst of passionate sorrow
that shook her during the recital. She never saw Mr. O
again, it appeared. About six months after the affair of the
garden, her father took to his bed with a strange malady of
the heart, and the very day before his death, he called his
daughter up to him, and throwing his arms about her neck,
and kissing her as if he knew what was to occur the
following
day, told her to be of good cheer and to take courage, and
whatever the world might say after his death, to remember
that he died glorying in his dear girl; that he had gone to his
grave satisfied with her, and acquitting her before God and
before his angels of that which a bad world had begun to
whisper about her. And what is that? father, said she. But
he would not tell herperhaps he could not; and the very
next day, he died upon her neck. Wellshe got over the
loss and had begun to appear as if she had still some business
with life, when her mother being irritated one day, told her
that she had broken her father's heart; and before she
could reply, that she was the reproach of the family. She
was a high-spirited girl; and having some property of her
own, she determined to leave the house of her mother and go
to Birmingham, where Judith who had cast off the church
and married a man of large property, was then living at her
ease. Her mother too, she had reason to believe, was about
to be married to a sectarian of the village, whom h erfather
17*
could never bear the sight of. This determined her. She
dropped a line that very mail to Judith, and the very next
day, set off in a post-chaise with her maid for Birmingham,
where she expected to be received with a transport of joy
by Judith, who had always appeared to love her in spite of
the church. But on the way, she was met by a man with a
letter from the newly-made wife, saying that she could not
possibly receive the runaway into the house of her beloved
Charleswho had a young sister with him at the time
though it made her very unhappy to refuse; that some how
or other he had got hold of the stories about Mr. O
who was known to be still in the neighbourhood of the village,
lurking about perhaps for another interview; that she could
not bear to grieve her good mother, and that she would
advise
her dear sister Maria to go back to her home as fast as
ever she could. What was to be done? The poor girl was
now half way on her dreadful journey. She grew desperate.
She could not go backand whither should she go, if she
did not go back? Was it indeed true that stories were
in circulation about her and Mr. O? Could it be that
he was yet lurking about the village, in the hope of what
of another interview
? Could it be!was it not very possible
that the dying speech of her father had reference to that
which Judith now alluded to? some story of her, which
made it improperunsafe perhapsfor a female to associate
with her. She considered her pathhow fearful and how
dark it had been! Who was there on earth to defend her?
Who was there to love or pity her? Whither should she go!
Her father was in his grave; she had no motherno home.
Her mother was on the brink of marriage with a man who
could never be to her what even a step-father should be to a
child. Her sisternono! she could not bear to
think of Judith now; it was enough to break her heart. So
young, so beautiful, so good, so happy, and yet able to
refuse
her own flesh and blood a brief asylum beneath her
`beloved Charles's' roof; and why?why?because
forsooth he had a sister with him, and had got hold of the
stories about Mr. O.
Her mind was made up. She seated herself with the
calmness of desperation. She wrote a farewell to her
mother
and
a farewell to her sister; both were blotted with her
tears. Then having prepared for the issue, and secured a
place for herself in the coach for Birmingham, whither she
determined to go, if it were only to hear out of her
brother-in-law's
own mouth what the stories were that Judith had
spoken
of, she discharged the post-boy, and calling her attendant,
whose mother lived in the neighbourhood of the place where
they were, told her to go to her mother's and stay there till
she heard from her. The girl obeyed, and the poor outcast
who had never been a mile from her father's door without a
companion to cheer and guard her, was now left alone to
make her way with strangers over a strange road. It was at
this very time that I saw her. We were both inside of a
coach with a cheerful gossipping nobody, upon whose aged
animal spirits the ride appeared to operate like champaign
or ether. I had been to Litchfield to see the spire of the
cathedral, so praised by Sir Christopher Wren, to see the
birth-place of Dr. Johnsonthe outside of the house in which
he was bornthey would not suffer me to see the insidethe
willow he planted ages before he appeared on earth, and the
poor dear children that were left by Chantrey the sculptor,
dead asleep in the dreary atmosphere of the cathedral. It
was a fine clear dayso fine that I did not much like to go
inside of the coach even after I had reconnoitred; but there
was no help for it, and so in I bundled with a view to find out
whether or no something which I saw in the shape of a
female
,
stowed away in a far corner of the coach, was dead or
alive. It was muffled up to the eyes, and yet I could have
sworn by the smooth graceful motion of the neck, when it
stirred, that it was not only alive but young, though for the
first league or two it jolted about like a dead body, at every
jolt of the carriage. By and by however, one third of our
cargoshe who had been afoot all her life before, after
making
several diverting essays at conversation, got fairly a going
at a rate which would have exhausted any other human
creature
upon any other subject under heaven, I do believe.
Nothing would do but she must give `a full an' partic'lar
account'
of her history, and of the business which had
brought her forth on this memorable day. It was to bring
together
a husband and wife who had married for love, and
separated, nobody knew why; a husband who beat his wife
the first month of his marriage, and a wife who went back
to her mother while the honey-moon was at the full. I
advised
her to give it up, though what she said was not said
either to me or to my companion, but in a sort of soliliquy
such as you may hear every hour in the day, if you happen
to be with people who are dying for a gossip, and yet are
afraid of being snubbed if they speak to you. I have heard
a deal of talk in my day; and I have talked a deal too, I
flatter myself; but I confess that I never saw any body that
would have been a match for this dear old woman. She was
perfectly happy, and she made a noise by the hour together,
like a spinning-wheel; it was not very unlike the purring of
a large lazy cat after a huge dinner. Willing to see what
she was made of, I began to preach to her about the folly of
her undertaking. Why interfere in such a case? depend
upon it, my good soul, said I, if they whose duty it is to love
each other, do not love each otherit is not for a stranger to
make them. You are breeding mischief, you are bringing to
gether two people, who, if they cannot come together without
your help, had better not come together at all;a sob from
the dark part of the coachif you were to reconcile them
to-day, they would quarrel with each other to-morrow and with
you the next dayanother sobI was in a fair way to know
what the matter was with the bundle before me; I had struck
the right chord; I saw the heart heave and the head stir as
with new life; I saw the little fingers agitated wherewith it
clung to the strap of the coach, and I could hear a change
in its breathing; I had only to persevere, and who should say
what might be the consequences? But before I could repeat
the blow which vibrated so audibly, the good woman
opposite
me had got such head-way upon her that I found it no
easy matter to grapple with the subject again. S'il crache
il est perdu1she must have heard the story, for having got
the
parole
, she kept onononas if she were afraid of
losing it by some such catastrophe, and at a rate which
would be inconceivable to those who are not aware of this
great trutha truth which begins to be regarded now
as the foundation of gymnasticks, the Olympian games, and
the glory of the Greeksnamelythat if one set of muscles
be favored with a holyday, some other set is very sure to run
wild with excess of energy.
But I persevered until I got along aside, when after two
or three desperate essays to shoot a-head, she slipped her
wind, gave up the weather-gage, and dropped a-sterna
metaphor worthy of Addison's bridled muse, who longed to
launch into a bolder strainas quietly as a Dutch man-of-war.
The rest of the story may be told in a few words. Before
we arrived at Birmingham; though we had but a few miles to
go, and there was a third person to overhear what we said to
each other, and it was day-light all the way, I learnt enough
to satisfy me that the bundle contained a womana modest,
a youthful, and of course a pretty womanwho if she were
not stayed by a miracle, would be sure to throw herself into
the first river she came to, or into the arms of the first man
she saw, if he spoke to her kindly and appeared to be a good
man. But how could I be of any use to her? We were
strangersand if she had eloped, as I thought she had,
either
from a boarding-school, a husband, or a step-mother; if
she had no home, how could we be otherwise without injury
to her? I considered with myself, and after much ado,
persuaded her to tell me a part of her own story as if it were
the story of another. She did so, and spite of her emotion,
with such success, that the dear old woman at her side,
though she sat with her mouth open watching her all the way,
had no suspicion of the truth. After this, I contrived to tell
her how to proceedcharging her to go straightway to the
house of her married sister, the moment she arrived; to bear
up with couragefor the darkest time of night was just
before
day; but above all to give up the scheme she had in
view, to abandon all thought of hiding herself, or of changing
her name, though it were but for a single day, or a single hour.
It would be worse than death to her. She understood me,
and burst into tears, but they were tears of joy and hope.
To prove that I was playing no trick with her, I told her
who I was, and where I should be found for the next half
year; I gave her my card, upon which I wrote my address,
with my real name, a name that nobody in Europe and few
in America were entrusted with, and I showed her my seal
engraved with correspondent initials. I did moreI gave
her two out of my three fictitious names. How could she
be otherwise than gratified by the trust I put in her?
Confidence
begets confidencefaith, faith. How could she do
otherwise than put faith in me, after I had acknowledged,
and after she had so much reason to believe, that I was in
her
power? Evil or good I must be; if evil she had a check
upon
me; if good, what had she to fear? How could I harm
her? I was going to leave her, not to stay with her; and
at the worst, I could only betray her name; while she had
it in her power to betray me, for aught she knew, to death.
In a wordafter much entreaty I prevailed with her. She
had the courage to trust me with her name, so that if I
chose I might say to her in a letter, on the following, or on
some future day, what I could not well say at the time. We
arrived while she was promising to go straightway to her
married sister's, to give up all idea of eluding the search of
her friends, to pursue the path I had pointed out; and if any
thing happened of a serious nature, to consult with me. I
shook hands with her, alighted, called a coach, and was
helping
her out, when her brother-in-law appeared and spoke to
her so cordially and so affectionately, that she sprang from
the step into his arms with a loud cry, and left me to help
the good-for-nothing dear old-woman out of the coach as I
could. I was rather provoked, and the more as I saw the
brother-in-law eying me as if he didn't much like the cut of
my jib; and I was turning to go away, when she saw me,
and extending both hands toward me as if we had known
each other all the days of our life, she asked me how I could
have the heart to leave her in the street as ifas ifher
sobs choked heras ifwithout saying so much as good-by'e
to her. I was delighted by her altered manner; and seeing
that she was not very likely to remember which of my three
names was the true one, I introduced myself to her
brother-in-law
,
who instantly invited me to his house. The poor girl!
She knew not which way to look; but as I had not lost my
self-commandI never do, by the by in such a case,though
she had hers, I gave her a sign which luckily for her she had
the courage to obey. She seconded the invitation
immediately
and
I, of course, immediately declined it. We
parted
and I saw her no more to my knowledge, till we met in
the way I described, at the Isle-of-Wight. Judge of my
feelings when she told me that I had
saved her
, and of the
deep serene joy I felt now, when I heard her confess that my
behaviour had given her a better, and she believed a truer
idea of the disposition of our sex toward her sex, than she
ever had before; and that, but for me, although she went with
her brother-in-law, as I advised her to do, she would not
have remained a single day beneath his roofso altered was
the look, and so unsisterly the conduct of his wife, who, it
appeared
now, had written the letter which nearly drove her
mad, merely that she might subdue her courage and force
her back to the dominion of her proud mother.
I was happy, for she still had such faith in me, that she felt
safe, she said, in trusting me with that which nothing could
have induced her to trust with any other man she ever saw,
except her own father. She had given me proof alreadyshe
was willing to give more. She had received the letter which
I sent her the very day after we parted, inclosing a brief
appeal
to her mother, so written as not to expose the sufferer
to reproach if it were not well received! And it had been
refused
by her, when laid upon her table, in the hope
that no inquiry would be made by her brother-in-law, with
whom she was more of a favorite in the course of a single day
than her sister had thought it possible she would ever be, and
in the hope that I, on receiving it back through the post-office,
might be led to believe that the name she wrote on the card
was not her true name, and that she was not so imprudent a
girl as she appeared to be. It was a pity she did so, for a
long, long while afterwards, my letter came back to me open
read by every clerk in the office, for all I knew.
She did not stay long at her brother-in-law's; for the
newly-married
wife grew jealous of her, and before a month was
over, took the liberty to say, that really, considering the
stories
that were abroad, it was the duty of her beloved sister to
be very circumspect. Her beloved sister could not bear this,
and having no other home to go to, set off to see a relation
who lived at Bath. At Bath she met her present husband,
who, after a courtship of three years, during a part of which
time he was in America, married her.
Did he know of your intimacy with Mr. O, said I,
when she had come to this part of her story.
He knew every thing that you know, and more, except
so much as related to my poor mother; I could not bear to
tell him that if I was not worthy of him, nor of any other
man, it was her fault
You never spoke of me
Yes I did; but by another name. I never acknowledged
that I knew you, nor when I heard him speak of you, that you
were the very individual, who rode with me from Litchfield
to Birmingham, though I made no secret of your generous
behaviour.
And why did you not speak of me? I wish you had.
And so do I but I have told you the reason before, I
believe
.
I did not even hope to see you again; I did not feel
justified in betraying you after I knew that you had told me
the truth; and what is more, I did not much like to pay him
she did not smile when she said thisto pay him so poor a
compliment as to say, after a courtship of three years, that he
reminded me of you forty times in the course of a day.
Are we so much alike?
18
No, not much; and I may add now, that before he went
to America he had a sort of antipathy toward the Yankees
I beg your pardontoward the Americans.
PhoIf you mean Yankees, why not say so? We are
proud of the title. I am a native Yankee, a thorough-bred
Yankee, and I always take off my hat when I am called
either a Yankee, a na-tyve, or a Brother-Jonathan.
Is it possible!
So he married you after his voyage, did he?
Yes. He would have married me before; but I would
not allow him to do so, till he had gone to the bottom of the
dreadful storiesAh! that we should be so at the mercy of
man! He pursued Mr. O to America; but he was
never
so happy as to meet him, though it appears now that for a
long while, they were in the neighbourhood of each other.
So happy do you say!
I do, for such is the exalted opinion I have noweven
now---of that man's probity and good faith and love, that if
Edward's life was at stake, I would apply to him, almost as
soon as I would to you, and I should be willing to have
Edward
,
or you, or any body receive for truth whatever he
might choose to say of me. I would sign whatever he chose
to say of me, without asking to read it.
I could not bear this. You are infatuated, said I.
So he would say were I to tell him what my opinion is of
you, so would my husband say were I to speak of either, as I
feel. Ah, my dear sir! say what you will of the poor
women, you are worse than we are. I never saw a man who
did not laugh when he heard another man praised for great
virtue.
Bravo! I responded, willing to change the subject. How
much better you look; I should hardly know you, now
that I come to observe the
Men may know each other well; and that may be the
reason
why they have so bad an opinion of each other.
You are severe---
No---but some how or other, my spirits are up; and I
have a joy herea hopewhich is quite new to me. Are
you superstitious
No indeed---
I am. I love to suppose that when I am happy there is a
good reason for it somewhere. The truth is, I believe, that
you are to be the author of much good to us. You are to
save my dear husband as you saved me.
By the by, what will your husband think of my civility; I
have been with you a very long while now.
Pretty much as I begin to think of itstaystayI
must
give you an idea of his real character, before we go a step
further. He married me in spite of the cruel stories that
were in every body's mouth about me, and contrary to the
advice of every friend on earth. He had begun to be
regarded
as one of the first young men of the age. But for
me sirshe grew pale as death, in a momenthe
would
be
now, if not the very first, one of the first men of the age.
For brilliant power, and for variety of power, I never met with
his equal.
But for me
, I sayfor his friends deserted him
after his marriage; not one of the whole would suffer a wife or
a child to associate with me. I cared little for this, but he
could not brook it; and growing desperate, he launched away
into a style of living, with a view to mortify a few foolish
women
who lived near us, which ended in our complete
overthrow
.
It was then that he took to authorshipit was then
that I saw the full worth of what I possessedwe were
happy
;
and if he had been treated as he deserved, we might
have been happy now. StayI will give you an idea of
what he is. You do not know him; you never will know
him; for he is much too proud I fear, and you much too
happy for companionship. You will never be on such terms
with each other now, as you might be if both were proud or
both happyand I out of the way
I understood her; I saw that after so much concealment
on her part respecting me, it would never do for me to be
intimate with her husband; it would be a source of
perpetual
inquietude for the wife, and of perpetual embarrassment
for me.
Here she took something out of a port-folio. You see
this paperit was the reception this very paper met with
which provoked him to throw up his birth-right, his heritage,
his hope in the great commonwealth of literature. Take it home
with you and read it at your leisure. You know the
sensibility
of a young authoryou can feel poetry, you know
what poetry is and what it should be; you know that such
poetry, however worthless it may appear to the multitude, and
however worthless it may be in fact, is the very breath of life to
the poet himself; you know that men who are able to talk
the language you see there, cannot brook the sway of
ordinary
peoplethe crowned and sceptred nothings of our age,
and that if they are not heard with favor in the high place
of song, they are sure to die of a broken heart.
Good God! why, you are a poet yourself. You are
talking
pure poetry now!
To tell you the truth sir, I have made some poetry in my
dayah, how serious you are!but I am sorry for it now,
and hope with the blessing of God, never to do so any more.
I laughed. Her manner was irresistibly comicno, not
comicplayful. Ah how happy
you
are! said I.
As happy as a bird.
I really do not know what to make of you; you appear to
change your character every dayalmost every hour. Now
I am ready to laugh with you; a moment ago, I was ready
to cry with you. Strange! though I have known you so
long and seen so much of you, it never entered my head
before that you were capable of a ofof
Of poetry you mean; I dare say not. We never
consider
it safe to acknowledge before a man that we are neither
fools nor babies. We know that a woman who is
able
to
take care of herself is pretty sure to be
left to take care
of
herself by youpretty sure to be regarded by you with
aversion or fear
No no
Look me in the face. Would you marry a woman that
made poetry?
Why, to confess the truth, I should be a little shy of her;
but you cannot say as much of the world; see how two or
three female poets of our day are puffed and cheered by the
critics. You cannot open a Review
Oh for a female-critic on she-poets! oh for a Review
conducted altogether by women! Their impartiality when
they spoke of your doings would be a fair offset for the
niggardly
praise and weak boyish puffing that we receive at
your hands, though we do that which you are unable to do
We madam,
We!
Oh lud, what have I done!
What I am sorry foryou have made poetry.
And so have you
Well well, it cannot be helped now.
I might have made a better use of my time to be sure
which is a good deal for a woman to say, educated as women
are now. I might have made a prose book, which if it were
tolerable in its way, would have done more good than all the
poetry that ever was made or ever will be made. I might
have abridged the labor of children over their a, b, abs, or
18*
contrived a new method of teaching the alphabet. Ah! you
do not like me half so much I see, now that for aught you
know, I may be of some little use in the world
You an authoressyou a blue-stockingyou a woman of
poetry!
Shame, shame! what would you have us do? We are
not allowed to appear with you, nor to strive with you.
There is no trade nor profession but the stage for us, and
you know how that is regarded. What are we to do? Would
you leave us no hope, no refuge, no resource? nothing to
cheer us, nothing to excite us through life but the desire of
being
thought well of by man
To be sure
But well of by him, for what purpose? How are we to
escape when we know the truth? How are we to behave
when we see that if we desire to be thought well of by him,
we must prepare to be to him what children are to us? We
are bred in a jail; you keep us there, and you reproach us
with our unhealthy condition, with our credulity, with our
simplicity, and with our narrow-mindedness. You would
have us happy and full of courage, and yet you would not
suffer us to breathe the very air that you breathe, if you
knew it would make us independent of you, or able to strive
with youto strive with you, not as the young women of
Sparta strove with the young men of Sparta, in trials of rude
strength, but as women should strive with men, side by side
in the chariot-race of literature and virtue. Would not!
you do not. You forbid us now to breathe the air of heaven
as you breathe it, freely and by ourselves. You do not
suffer
us to breathe such poetry as you breatheeven though
it be to us the breath of life; nor to read the books that you
read. We have but one path-way to glory; you the whole
surface of the earth; and yet, if you could, you would make
us forego the use of that one little path-waya green lane
with hardly a foot-step in itby persuasion or by ridicule
by trick or by
She was interrupted by a servant with a note for her, which
after reading, she handed to me; it was from her husband,
begging her to say that the gentlemen above were about to
adjourn to the club-room, and that they were waiting for me.
What am I to do? said I, seeing her turn pale. It is for you
to direct me. I am ready to do whatever you desire.
She called the servant and dismissed him with a message
to her husband; it was to say that I should be detained but a
few minutes longer.
Yes yes, I have no other hope. I would have you go
by all means; I would have you find out who they are; but
remember your promise. Oh remember your promise! You
are never to go near them again if they should prove to be
what I suppose them to be, a crew of gamesters. Here
heretake this, my friendmy dear friendmy brother! I
may call you so nowand thisand thisgiving me two or
three folded papersand read them before you sleepor
now if you like; one is the paper I told you of just now
read it, read itand say if it be not of a truth, a tremendous
revelation of character
I began to read.
The other is what I hope you will not be offended with
me for having written. You are an author; you have
done a deal of mischiefyou may do more. You have done
much I dare say, because you had nobody near with courage
enough to tell you the truthno, no, do not open that here;
take it home with you. It was written just now while you
were up stairs, under an idea that as we are likely never to
meet againfor I shall avoid you and I wish you to avoid
meit may make an impression upon you. You are at
liberty
to tell my story in your own way, but I beg of you to read
that paper before you do soand to conceal the names if
you publish it before you know that I am in my grave
I know not what I said in reply; I was looking at the
paper
in my hand.
Therethere, you had better go now, said she, when
she saw that I had finished reading the papergo go, you
had better go now; I do not ask you how you
like
such
poetry
I
see it in your eyes, I hear it in your breathing
farewell.
Stay. You mean to avoid me hereafter?
Yes
And you desire me to avoid you?
Yes
But how am I to proceed in this matter; I do not like to
leave you, before I know in what way I can be of use to you.
You
must
leave me. Should they prove to be authors,
write meI shall not reply, unless it be to thank you for
what is dearer to me than life.
And if they are not authors
Write me nevertheless; I dare not proceed in such a case,
without proof.
One word more. Do you wish me to speak freely with
your husband, as freely as I would with you, if on full
inquiry
it should appear to me to be proper
Yesprovided you speak not of me, and provided also,
that however he may take your advice, you neither quarrel
with him, nor allow him to persuade you into a friendship
with him; for that I tell you now would be sure to result in
misery; I should be driven to speak the truth and the whole
truth of you; and if I did, I know that he would never be
satisfied with me nor with himself again. He would be sure
to believe I had married him, that I might have at least an
image of youI staredand all that I have done he would
interpret to the disadvantage not of me, not of you, but of
himself. I could not bear that sirit would kill methere
there! I beseech you to go
Farewell, said I, farewell! going up to her in a state of
excessive trepidation. FarewellI would have kissed her
forehead, but she turned away with a look of alarm and
reproach
,
and the tears started to her eyesI could have thrown
myself out of the windowFarewell! said I, once more.
Do
say farewell to me!
She did not speak, but I saw her catch at the bell-rope.
Say that you forgive me, said I, growing desperate with
fear. Say that you forgive meI forgot we were
alone; I forgot your husband was not near to sanction
what he led me toor I should never have had the courage,
thethe
Do
say that you forgive me!
I doI do
Farewell
Farewellmy brotherfarewell, said she in a voice
that no third person could have heard I am sure; and as she
spoke, she caught my hand up to her lips
What could I say? what could I do? I left her; and
before
I was able to speak, I found myself in the dining-room
above, surrounded by the company I had left, and by two or
three more, one of whom I recollected immediately as
Fontleroy, the man who had called upon Edwards while I
was at the cottage. I was very much struck by his gravity
and by the appearance of a stranger, who sat watching
Edwards
from the time that I entered the room, until we
moved
away in a body for the club-house, with an eye, the
severe
steadiness of which I never saw equalled.
1 Two Frenchman, great talkers, were brought together: one got the
start, and kept on, while the other stood watching for an opportunity.
S'il crache, il est perdu, cried a spectator:
If he spits, he is lost
.
CHAPTER XX.
THE GAMBLERS.
We
were hardly seated on our arrival at a
magnificently-furnished
,
though retired room, in a large building which I
mistook at the time for the celebrated Crockford club-house,
when preparations were made for play, and I was invited by
Sir George, to join a party; but before I could reply,
Edwards interfered with a look which prevented a repetition
of the request, and assured him that I was invited there as a
friend. I was very grateful, for I did not much like to refuse
before I knew the stake; and I had an idea that as they
were pretended authors, they would not play high, and that
by appearing to have no suspicion of their true character, I
should have a better opportunity of studying it, an idea which
but for his interference might have led me into play, before I
knew where I was.
While they were getting ready, he left the room and I took
that opportunity of reading the paper, which his wife had put
into my hands with a remark which prepared meshall I
own the truth? shall I own the besetting sin of authorship?
shall I own that I was prepared, not for censure but for high
praise, much higher praise than I got, even by the fear she
expressed of offending me? NoI will not. An author
should never so betray himself. But, as I never had the
truth spoken so plainly to me before, although it was mixed
up with what would have made even truth palatable to any
body on earth, and as I do believe that I shall profit more
by it, one day or other, than by all the praise and all the
censure I ever received, I mean to do what I told her
husband I should do with itI mean to publish it; and what
is more, I mean to publish it as a part of her own story.
Here it is.
`My dear Friend,
`I am not good for much'I give her own words`but
I lay awake a few nights ago thinking of novel-writing and of
your W A. Shall I tell you what I thought?
You are writing another; now hear meyou once told me
I could write one. I could not; I know myself best. If I
had any talent that way, I would gladly throw my little into
your stock. But I have noneyou have more than enough.'
A very sensible remark thought I.
`You have more than enough. First then, husband
your resources better. Remember that every thing ceases
to astonishto exciteto moveby repetition. Suffering
torturedeathany thing may become familiar and tamed
of its horrors by repetition. Don't launch your thunder at
butterflies and gnats. Don't make your heroes go raving
mad for a cause, an offence, which five rational words would
remove or explain. One ceases to sympathize in such
gratuitous
and self-inflicted misery. Don't let a scene, which
might appropriately end in tearsbitter tears and agonized
silence, end in fire and fury, whirlwind, tempest, lightning,
and the . Are you mad, my dear friend? No,
you will not be angry with me. I could not write this if I
had not a deep interest in all you write. Againyour
characters
all talk too much the same languagehave the same
intense and exaggerated and distorted imagination and
sensibility
.
H and W A, the only men deserving
the name of characters, talk so that sometimes you could not
tell which is speaking. One
very
extraordinary man is
enough. Remember, more than one principal light spoils a
picture. If there be two extraordinary men, they should be
utterly unlike.'
The jade! She was determined not to leave me a chance
of escape. That observation tore up the ground-work of all
I had ever written.
`They should be utterly unlike. So of woman.
Any
very
marked character is still more rare among them. We
complain
of Scott's heroines as insipid. What are most real
women
?
A man of great sense and knowledge of the world once
said to my motherIt is not their faultsit is their insipidity.
They have neither sense to be right nor passion to be wrong.
This, like all
mots
, is an exaggeration. They
have
sense
enough to avoid gross errors generally, and to keep to
traditional
maxims of conduct, and they have passion enough to
`fall in love,' as they call it, with any decent man who pays
them attention and can maintain them in the style they are
accustomed to. But enough of this. They are right and
wise in their generationwiser than the children of light
i. e. of warmth and flame.'
Ah! thought I, when I had come to this paragraphah!
but I am to see her no more. Well, well, it may be the
better for both of us.
`Youaddressing me by my
true
nameyou should
not add your power and eloquence to increase the
wretchednes
of this wretched world. Set your hot brand upon
nothing
that does not deserve it. Think of that my friend, when
I am thousands of miles offperhaps dead. We are beset
enough between the dangers and difficulties which are the
work of nature and those inherent in social institutions. I
am not a
Utilitarian
in every thing; but I am enough so, to
say, pause for God's sake, for mercy's sake, before you add
your strong voice to the cries of remorse, or of infamy, unless
you see clearly that the act is mischievous,
misery-creating
.
But you will think of this'
That I will! said I to myself. I begin to perceive the
truth now.
`
We
are bound with the iron chains of selfish hypocrisy
and prejudice; but think of our posterityI object to the
moral of R. What is it?'
I wish I could tell you, thought I.
`What is it? That a man may by a series of mere
imprudences
make himself and every body connected with him
supremely
wretched, and yet
call
himself innocent. He has no
right to think himself so. He is to be dreaded as much or more
than a villain, for the latter will not injure you unless to serve
himself. Or do you mean that it was a fatalitythat he
must
be a destroyer in spite of himself? This I should rather
object
to also; though then it would be out of the province of
novel-writing, and would be a romance, dealing in the ideal.
There is a class of novels that are the mirrors of common
society
as it is
. Insipid enough you 'll say: Yes, certainly, for
so is the original, but accurate copies. Miss Austin's are
perhaps the best.
You
cannot write so. No, I know it
you
must
write poetry. But subdue, my dear friend, the
coloring of your under characters and under incidents. You
have images of exquisite unspeakable beauty'
I began to be in good humor with my critic here.
`Treasure them and deal them out like a miser.
They will then sparkle like diamonds, as they oughtas
they do indeed but too often'
Very trueI am willing to acknowledge the truth of that
remark, said I to myself, as I read on.
`One thing more. You put yourself into every manor
woman. Do
I
not know you through all the disguises?
Byron
did so. Yes, but Byron did wrong. Shakspeare did
not. That is the way to make your readers know
you
, but
not mankind'
Equivocal, but severe enough either way.
19
`Take care of that delicate line which divides the terrible
from the disguisting, the sublime from the inflated, the
familiar
from the vulgar, the I know-not-what that is lovely,
touching
,
and sincere in what you say about women, from what
makes their cheeks tingle and their eyes quail, and what
would make prudes throw down the book. Yes, women
who could not appreciate the moral beauty and
purity
of the
sentiments would scream and shudderor act itat being
stripped and detected. Take care. You can do much good,
but do it delicately. I have thought and felt almost all that you
have said about
my
sex. But what wonder?
Your
sex
choose to have factitious creatures, puppets, hereditary
dissemblers
denying
their own nature. What wonder that we
are made falsefalse and superficial? I am one of them.
Am I? Yes, at this moment, I feel the iron in my soul.
No, it is impossible for a woman to be frank and natural. It
is destruction and infamy. I could write a volume now, for
my blood rushes to my fingersbut it would do no good.
So down and go to sleep, rebel. You'll think
I
am mad, as
mad as W A. As you please
God bless you .'
`P. S. I wonder, tremble almost, at my boldness. If I
offend you, how unhappy I shall bebut no, I
hope
not.'
Well Sirno bad news, I hope?
I looked up. Edwards was standing directly before me
and eyeing me with a look which I thought proper to put an
end to at once. Read it, said I, handing him the paper.
No.
Yes, take it, take it, it will do you good.
He laughed and took the paper as if it were a drug to
swallow. Well, said he, after running his eye rapidly over
it, I hope you are
not
offended.
Offended! no, faith. I never was more gratified in my
life; I am delighted with her good sense and her courage.
Upon my word, I believe you.
Believe me! that you may. I would quarrel with her if
I could, but she has me on the hip; so bitter, so careless,
and yet so provokingly truegive me the paper.
Certainly, if you wish it.
I do wish itI would not part with that critique for any
thing.
Whyhow your eyes shine! I do believe you are
pleased
with it.
You will see one day or other; I mean to publish it.
To publish it!
Yesto weave it into a book.
The devil you do!
Yes.
Without my leave?
Yesif I cannot
with
your leave.
But consider how hastily it was writtenit is full of
repetitions
,
and failuresand a sort of a
So much the better; if I publish it as it is, every body
will see that it is no invention of the trade. I hate
authorship
.
So do Igive us your hand.
But we are all authors, are we not? said I, glancing at
Sir George, who stood a little way off watching a hazard
party, and grasping a handful of bank notes, which he drew
out loose from his breeches' pocket.
Authorswhyaayes, in our own way. You are
an author, Barry, addressing himself to a young man who
sat near, and you too, major, are you not?
An author? said Mr. Barry, and then after a minute's
hesitation
adding, Ah, yes, to be sure, and the major passed on
with a bow.
I was rather nettled at the tone of Mr. Barry, and after a
short pause, I asked him if he had written much.
Much my dear siryes, a good deal.
And about what, said I, angry at the impudent
self-possession
of the fellow, who spoke, it appeared to me, with a sort
of sneer.
Oh, about several things, histories, and tragedies, and
novels, and poems, and criticism, and the deuse knows what;
a heap of things altogether.
Indeed.
Quite a heap, I assure youon the word of an author.
Perhaps you would mention their titles.
Titlespho phoas if I cared a fig for a title.
Or as if a title had any thing to do with a book now; said
Sir George.
You may call to mind one, perhaps? you that have
written
so much.
Oneayforty.
Well
Wellupon my word sirthe fact isyou 'll excuse me.
A general laugh here, but whether at me or at him, I could
not tell; but I was determined to know, before I gave up the
point.
No no, said I, no no, give us the title of somethingno
matter what, a history or a novel.
Ever read the History of Jack-the-giant-killer?playing
with a cribbage-peg as he spoke.
I bowed with what I meant to be a look of surprise and
admiration. Really, said I, I could not have supposed it
possible.
By George, Barry, cried one of the party,
he
is up to you.
Or Little King Pippin? said Mr. Barry, irritated by a
laugh which followed this remark.
Edwards thought proper to interfere now, and he showed
by his manner that he thought his friend Barry was going a
little too far, as he addedWhat other histories are read now?
What other books? Nothing but story-books, little and big,
and picture-books, and blue-beards, and black-beards, of a
larger growth.
But said I, addressing myself to Mr. Barry with a
determintion
to know whether he had been quizzing me or not, before
I proceeded a step further, You have written a history you
say; tell me the name, if you wish me to believe you.
Have you ever read the History of Connecticut? said
Sir George, with a good-natured laugh.
Nay nay, Sir Georgeyou 'd better not interfere; Brother
Jonathan will take care of himself, I 'll warrant you, said
somebody near me, Edwards I thoughtthen adding in a
whisper which I overheardBarry will have his hands full.
There was a sort of a history of Connecticut, said I
addressing
myself to Mr. Barry, and speaking with a very
subdued
voice, but in such a way that every body in the room
could hear mea small anonymous book, which I dare say
Mr. Barry might have been capable of. The author speaks
among other matters of a stream of water which runs so
swiftly
between two walls of rock and is so compressed by the
straightness of the passage, that you cannot stick a crow-bar
into it
Bravo Barry, bravo! that
is
like you! cried Sir George,
clapping him on the back.
I remember the place, though I do not acknowledge the
historyyou may boil an egg in the steam that rises over
itin cold weatheradded Barry without appearing at all
disturbed.
No doubtcaloric disengaged by the pressure, Barry.
Precisely, Sir George
19*
You have read a book which goes by the name of
Hutchinson's
Massachusetts, I hope? said Sir George, turning to
me, evidently with a view to prevent a squabble.
No said I.
Nor Sullivan's District of Maine?
A great while ago, I did
Our friend Barry, with a wink, always writes under a
fictitious
name, or as he calls it
anonymously
, added Sir
George; and we all burst out a laughing together. His look
was inimitable.
Your friend Barry is to be regarded as the author, I
suppose
?
As you likeI say nothing.
Under a
fictitious
nameor anonymouslyyou said Sir
George?
At this remark, a sudden strange alteration took place in the
expression of the faces about me. Edwards bit his lip, and
Mr. Barry turned very pale, and a look passed from one to
another, round the whole company, a look which any where,
at any time, would have put me upon my guard.
A sort of tautology I confess, my dear Barrysaid Sir
Georgerecovering himself with an effortfor the only way
of writing anonymously nowto advantage my dear Barry
is to scribble under a fictitious name.
Sir George!
Or under another man's nameit stops inquiry
By God sir! if youif Iif I thought you had a
Barryrecollect where you are
No no Mr. Edwards, no no; a joke's a joke, but no such
twitting, if you please.
Are you mad, Barry!
No other way, my dear Barryno other way, continued
Sir George, rapping the lid of his snuff-box, and offering a
pinch to his neighbour, as if nothing on earth could ruffle or
disturb him. But I observed his eye as he spokeit was
riveted on a heap of gold that had been gathered up for play
on the opposite side of the room, and was abiding the issue
of a deal.
You never met with a little story of Barry's, published about
a twelvemonth ago major, did you?
Not knowin' can't say; what 's the name o' the story?
Tom Jones
Never
Nor Sir Charles Grandison, hey?
No.
Nor Clarissa Harlowah, look o' that, major; five to
four on the dealer
Done for fifty
Donedone
A bite, Sir George.
A bite, how so?
You didn't see the play.
Ah it 's loo, is it; I took it for vignt-un
Ha ha ha!
But continued Sir George, you have read Clarissa
Harlow
haven't
ye major?
Never; these names are all new to me. I should like to
read one o' the lot, if you say it 's worth reading
Ask Barry.
Not I, faith; I would not take the word of an author for
sixpenceI beg your pardon sirare they long, Sir George?
Long! no indeed; mere flea-bites my dear major; half
a dozen volumes or so; just the thingwaiterjust the
thing for a lounge under the trees in a hot summer-afternoon
waiter, I say.
Comin' Sir
But give us an idea of the plot, Sir George.
A plot for a story, my dear major! why you might as
well advertise for a moral. No no, that fashion has gone by;
what say you, Edwards?
Just what you say, Sir George. You see nothing of plots
now except in speeches and songs and ballads; nor any
thing in the shape of moral now-a-days
Waiter!
Sir
A table this way; champaign for five, and fresh cards
Except in a charity sermon, or a fable by Mr. Gay
Or Mr. sop
Or a mister any body, who makes little
Red-Ridin'-hood
stories for children. A plot indeed! no noour
fashionable authors are above such tricks o' the trade; most
of them avoid a plot as they would a conspiracy
Here a table prepared with cards and counters,
champaign
,
loo-boxes, cribbage, pointers, and a large silver plate,
was trundled up to the corner we occupied. But nothing
was said about play, and they seated themselves one after
another, some with their sides to the table and some with
their backs, very much as if they had come together to smoke
a cigar and chat over old stories.
And the hero, Sir Georgegive us an idea of the hero,
will you?
The
hero! that 's a good one, faithcapital!why do
you think there was only
one
hero, my dear major!
To be sure I doone herowho ever heard of more at
a time?
One heroand one catastrophesaid somebody near me
who had not opened his mouth before. It was a stranger
a tall grave man with a deep scar over his temple and the
steadiest eye you ever saw in your life.
Oh how little you understand these matters! why sir,
the public would never endure a story, if it were not crowded
with heroes and heroines, and if every chapter had not a
catastrophe
or two of its ownwhat say you Mr. Holmes
addresing himself to me.
Why, to tell you the truthglancing at Edwards,I am
no longer of that opinion. I thought so, to be sure, till a
certain critic did me the favor to say that one
very
extraordinary
man was enough, and that even catastrophes may tire
in a novelsince which
Enough,I understand you, said he; and I hope she
may prove to be right in daring to tell you the truth
Founded upon fact, I hope? continued the major, drawing
up to the table as he spoke, and beginning to play with the
fish in the loo-box.
Ay ay, all founded on fact, all historical; an't they,
Edwards? you know.
Of courseof coursevery bitterlynothing else would be
endured just now. Histories have become novels; novels,
histories.
True true; one of Barry's you knowhis favorite and
masterpiece I believe was founded on a
Sir George!
Nay nay, how sensitive you authors areit was founded
on the true and faithful history of a young man who fell
desperately
in love with his own grandmother
Ninon de l' Enclos, hey?
Ay. It was very popular too, deny it if you can Barry.
Ah my dear Edwards, you have no idea how fond the public
are now of studying history; for ever at work nownight
and day; and then the catastrophe, that was so affecting
Indeed
Yesveryveryfor just when the young dog was going
to be rude to his own grandmother, poor boy! their
relationship
was discovered
By a picture I suppose, or a mole or a scar
Precisely
What a pity there was no moral, Sir George.
Why, between ourselves, my dear major, though neither
morals nor manners are regarded now, in your first-rate
hero
,
by your first-rate novel-reader, there wasto tell to you
the truth my dear major, a sort of a moral invented for it
Or
discovered
Or discovered for it; just for the sake of appearances, to
help off a third or fourth edition among the third and fourth
class of novel-readers
But how, pray?
Oh, as usual. The publisher offered a reward, and a
reviewer
soon found a moral for it; and a very good
moral
it was too. He discovered that the whole work was a
stout and courageous assault upon romping grandmothers and
flirtation; a warning to such as run the risk of
grandchildren
without leave, a severe side-wind attack upon the
profligacy
of high life, hypocrisy, concealment, paint, patches,
and coquetry with boysin old age; and best of all, he
discovered
a defence of the church in it
A defence of the church!
Ay, of the levitical marriage-tablehow serious you are,
my dear fellowto Edwards; You are not offended we
hope; have we gone too farglancing at me.
No noI was only thinking that if authors would agree
to work together in partnership, how much better it would
be for them
Don't you believe it!
A company of authors now, like a troop of players,
playing
for shares
My
dear
fellow! there's nothing new in that idea; if you
look into the best novels of the day, and the best poetry of
our age, you will see that in every case, the author has a
company of his owna regular troop, ready to undertake a
drama of a thousand pages or so, at a few weeks' notice
Very true, Sir George, very true; it's only changing
their dresses, and giving them a new name a piece, and crack!
you have a new novel, or poem, or tragedy half tossed up to
your hands. One of these
managers
will keep four or five
heroes
to himselfhard at work all the year round. Others are
satisfied if they can secure two or three for tragedy in a
summer-campaign
trusting
to chance among runaways, stragglers,
strollers, for broad farce and pantomine. Others having no
easier way of getting a livelihood, may be seen skulking about
among the supernumeraries, and back-door gentry, who are
always to be met with in the neighbourhood of our chief
authors
Very true
Seducing this one away by a promise of better fare,
and that by an appeal to his pride; borrowing a clown from
this company, and a fool from that, an old woman here and
a dwarf there, now snapping up a hero from Bartle'my fair,
and now running off with a star from Lead-an'-all street.
A walking gentleman or two from God knows where
And a bit of the brogue from Convent-garden or
DruryLane
Or a candle-snuffer from some private theatre of the
west-end, where the actors who are generally more numerous
than the spectators, do whatever they do at all, with a
tragedy-step
Very fair, Edwards, very fair; I see what you are driving
at. However, do you knowaddressing himself to me, and
lifting a bottle from which the cork had just been drawndo
you knowthere sir, try that sirfilling a large glass for
me as he spokethat is what
we
call champaign sirno
gooseberry theredo you know my dear sir, that the most
effectual catastrophe of our day, and just now the talk of the
town isAh bless me!
Here a pack of cards which he had been playing with
slipped from the pressure of his hand with such a spring that
one or two of the cards flew half across the room
Five to fifty, I name that card sir! cried one of the
party
at the other table, jumping up as he spoke and setting his
foot on the card, which lay face down.
I was about to speak, merely to say that the chances were
as one to fifty-two, when Edwards prevented me by a pressure
of the arm, and the bet was taken by Sir George, who
proceeded
with what he was going to say, while the other
named
the card and acknowledged he had lostA very capital
idea, I promise you; a catastrophe worthy of our day; a
brother and sister marry each other in the last page of a
fourth volume; she in the dress of a man, he in the dress of
a woman, each believing the other to be what the dress
intimated
Pshaw! how could that be! did the woman disguised as
a man desire to marry a man; or the man disguised as a
woman desire to marry a
How should I know! I only mention the factsa laugh
the work is now under consideration, catastrophe plot and
all; Anotherand all eyes were turned upon Barry who
appeared
to be getting very uneasy; but you are not aware
perhaps
that novels are made now, the characters of which are so
mixed up together, and so doubled and twisted into each
othersir! to Edwards, what the devil was that for!
never
tread on a fellow's toe; but if you have any thing to say,
out with it like a man
A very hearty laugh, in which I could not join for the life
of me; particularly after he added, that a book had lately
appeared, the characters of which were so mixed up
together
,
that although he had read it with great pleasure, he had
never been able to say which was which.
You have wondouble or quits on the other card sir
George, if you
Done
Ah, but you didn't hear me through, Sir George!
Ha ha ha! that reminds me of a bet I heard in your
country, said Sir George, addressing himself to me. A
dispute
occurred between two people where I was. After it
had continued a good while, one of the two struck his hands
together and offered a bet in the usual way there
A beaver-hat, I suppose
No, a dozen of madeira; but before the words were well
out of his mouth, he was taken up; I'll bet you aavery
deliberatelysaid one of the two, a dozen of Madei
Done! said another with a snapAh, but you did not take
me up quick enough! replied the first.
Admirable! thought I; for his imitation was perfect; and
I was just going to say that he had hit off the manners of my
countrymen as well as ever Mathews did, when we were
interrupted by a remark about a tragedy, actually in
rehearsal
at the time, all made up of heroes and heroines, most
of whom appeared on the stage only to give a soliloquy or a
speech and be killed
Of coursewhat would you have in tragedy?
Ay, and the characters are all married on the stage
A catastrophe indeed
20
Ah but that is only a part of the catastrophe; for then
sirthen!they all die, every one of them, in their nuptial
robes, with all their flowering coronets on
Ah!
In all their bridal purity
Do
they indeed? that must be very awful, but how
By the yellow-fever
Devil take you Sir George! you are laughing at me.
My dear major! how could you imagine me capable of
such a thing
What is the name of the tragedy you speak of? said I
with a woful misgiving, though I saw his eye fixed upon poor
Mr. Barry.
I forgetI believe though, if I do not mistakebut by the
by, have you seen the Murderers
Another tragedy I suppose; and full of murder
No such thing, my dear sirnot a murder in it, nor a
death, nor a naughty word, nor a drop of blood spilt from
beginning to end. The author is a reformeryou must have
heard of ithe is a countryman of yours. He doesn't like
Mr. Shakspearequite shocking he says, people are cut up
so many times, and in such a variety of ways by him, that
his great tragedies are exceedingly improbable. And so, his
tragedy is full of madmen, ghosts, and goblins, which prove
to be neither goblins, ghosts, nor madmen; every character
in it is a hero; and every speech a soliloquy or something
worse, and about one fourth of every page is employed in
particular directions to every body, heroes, scene-shifters
and all, how to stand, how to step, how to look, and how to
use their pocket-handkerchiefs
Ah, said I, with a very unsteady lookah but why, Sir
George?
Several reasons were given by the author, after his
tragedy
appeared, among which
Oh it appeared then, did it, cried I, inexpressibly
relieved
;
for some how or other, I had begun to fear that my turn
had come to be baited.
Yesit appearedpublished, though never played that I
know of
I had not another word to say.
He chose to write something he said, between a novel
and a play, to compound the properties of the two
narrative
and the drama; to give a connected story, to describe
the looks and behaviour of all parties, as you would in a book,
so that if it did not do for the stage, it might do for the
closet
For the
closet
Umph
To relieve the actor from the trouble of study, to
embody
the whole conception of the author, about which no two
actors ever agree, in such a way, that hereafter it would be
impossible for any two actors of that play ever to disagree.
CHAPTER XXI.
THE WINE-CRITIC... THE PLAY... THE ARREST.
I could
bear this no longer; pray sir, said I, addressing
myself to Mr. Barry who appeared to be enjoying the joke
as if he knew that every part and parcel of it was intended
for mepray sir, allow me to put a question to you, which
you will please to recollect, I put half an hour ago, but which
you have not answered
With all my heart sir
I beg you to be serious.
Wellthere!biting his lips and bracing his feet.
Are you an author?
Whyafter a little hesitationwhy, to tell you the truth
yes
.
Bravo, Barry, bravo! bravo! cried three or four of the
company, gathering about the table, and preparing to take
their places for play, at the same time.
Have a care, said somebody at my elbow; you are a
stranger. It was the man I saw at the cottage, with a head
so like that of Napoleon Bonaparte when he was first Consul
I judge by the busts.We had not interchanged a word for
several hours; but I had observed his gentlemanly air, and
remembering what Edwards's wife had said of him, I thought
better of the whole company for his being there. But for
Edwards and him, and the tall stranger with a scar on his
cheek, I should have had no doubt of the profession of the
crew, notwithstanding all their talk about authorship, which I
begun to believe was intended as a trap for me. But if
so, Edwards had betrayed meand for what purpose?
not surely to injure me, for he had put me upon my guard:
perhaps to give me an opportunity of seeing how they
wheedle
their prey into the snare. Be it so, said I to myself
be it soI shall drink no more champaign; I shall avoid
playI wouldn't play for straws with such men; I'll take
no bets, however advantageous they may appear; in short,
I'll run no riskI'll trust nobody.
Come come, said Sir George, come come, Barry, you are
in for it now; and you will try to speak the truthfor once
I hope
I will, Sir George,I will
Very well said I, as you have sworn to
try
to speak the
truth
for once
will you say whether you have published
any thing?
Publishedwhy, to tell you the truth, if you mean by
publishing
, what authors mean who live by publishing
books
,
I can't say I havebut if you mean
Stop sir; excuse me, I should like to know where I am
Why you are at Crockford's.
Pholook me in the face.
Wellthere!
Indeedis that what you call looking a man in the face?
To be sure
Well now, upon your oath, have you ever written any
thing
To be sure I have.
That's a plumper faith! cried one of the party
Mind though; I don't say I've actually finished any thing
for the press
Finishedhave you ever
begun
any thing for the press.
That's a very pretty seal o'yoursgive me leave
Answer me, I beg of you; have you ever
begun
any thing
for the press
20*
For the
press
I am afraid I have, said heglancing
at the major with a piteous look, and with a significance of
manner which set every body about us in a roar of laughter
afraid I have
begun
rather a tragical story for the press. I
did not see the joke, but I laughed as heartily as the rest.
Allow me, said Sir George, before the laugh had subsided,
allow me sir, attempting to fill my glass, which I withdrew,
while another of the party pushed a pack of cards up to my
elbow, praying me with a very careless air, to cut for the
deal
Excuse me, said I
Ahyou don't play?
No sir, I'd rather not.
Well well, said Sir George; do as you like about play;
but being here, you'll not refuse to tap another bottle of
champaign for us, I hope?
Indeed Sir George, I had rather not, I assure you. The
glass you gave me is very deep and large, and after the
madeira
we have drunk, the best madeira I ever saw in my life,
by the way
Tut man, tut! our madeira is not to be compared with
your Boston madeira. Every body knows that
Why to be sure, I have heard the Boston madeira praised
by two or three of the best judges of wine that I ever met
with in this country
Are you a judge of wine?
Ino indeed; I hardly know madeira from sherry; and
when I praised the wine we had to day, I praised it for
madeira
,
because to tell you the truth I saw that name on the
collar of a large decanter that stood near me before the
cloth was removedI tasted no other; and for all that I
know, it may have been sherry or any other white wine.
Sir George bit his lip, one of the party cried bravo!
bravo
!
and interchanged a look with Edwards who colored to
the eyes, and for a minute or two appeared to be heartily
ashamed of me; but the tall grave stranger with the scar in
his cheek, thought otherwise of my behaviour.
Young man, said he, it requires no little courage to tell the
truth in your case.
I thought so, for the words were hardly out of my mouth
before I begun to feel as if I had betrayed myself in a very
foolish way.
Very true, said Sir George, very trueI do not know
another
man, who would dare to say that he does not know
madeira from sherry; I would rather acknowledge of the
two, that I do not love music.
The stranger withdrew his quiet stern eye from Edwards,
and looked at Sir George without speaking a word; but I
observed that Sir George grew uneasymore uneasy than
he had been while the bets were at issue, and that he took
an early opportunity of whispering to Edwards, after which
a sort of combined attack was made on the stranger,
evidently
with a view to overcome his reserve.
Very true, as you say sir, very true, continued Sir
George thrusting a handful of bank-notes into his pocket, and
preparing to deal as if nothing had happenedvery true
So with music, so with wine, so with a multitude of things
which to be ignorant of or not to like, is to be aI beg your
pardon sir; I have heard Charley-over-the-water called for
by twenty voices at a time, years and years ago, when I was
a young fellow; and I have been told, on asking the reason,
that a particular lady present was particularly remarkable for
that particular song; so I have gone up to the lady, whom I
happened to know, and pursuaded her to sing The moonlight
on the tufted bank, or some other pitiful affair which is never
heard of nowand the whole company have been delighted
with itsome declaring they were very fond of
Charley-overthe-water
and
others that they had never heard it half so
well sung before.
I laughed heartily, and so did the major; but Edwards
appeared
to be lost in thought, and the stranger sat with his eye
on the door, as if he expected somebody else to join the party.
Meanwhile the bank-notes covered the table, and heaps of
gold were passing from hand to hand with a rapidity that I
never saw equalled, and with a sort of high-bred indifference
which gave me the head-ache.
But speaking of your Boston madeira, said Sir George,
addressing himself to me. That reminds me of a
circumstance
which occurred full three-and-thirty, four-and-thirty,
five-and-thirty years ago, at a table in Boston. That's your
sort majorpam be civil!
Very true sir, what you saidvery trueaddressing the
strangerdare say you have seen a bottle of wine produced at
a table sir, covered with cobwebs, decanted as if it was the
elixir of life, into little glass acorn-cups, and swallowed with
affected enthusiasm by grown men, who if they could have
had their own way, would rather have swallowed so much
cider, if not so much physic.
The stranger knitted his brow, and I began to feel rather
uncomfortable for Sir George; but he proceeded with his play
and his story at the same time, as if he neither knew nor
cared
to know what the stranger thought of him.
While I was there said he, a young chap from the city
arrived with a cargo of Manchester goods to a merchant of
Boston. I was invited to meet my countryman, who
probably
did not know that he was going to dine with perhaps the
most extraordinary humorist of the age, a man of great
wealth, who was a prodigal and a miser at the same time.
It appearedah you are in luck my dear Barry, I thought my
hand a sure one a minute agothe youth had been laughing
at your Yankee wines, I heard; they were not strong enough,
they lacked bodythey hadn't so much flavor as the Thames
water, which you know is remarkable for a sort of
champaign
spirit, peculiar to itselfour sailors, God bless 'em!
when they talk of the briskness of our Thames water have
no idea of the cause of that briskness
No, faith!you may swear to that Sir George.
Well, there were six or eight of us. Now said Mr. G.
our worthy hostwe had been sipping a variety of liquors
and four or five sorts of wine, which I thought very well
of, though my countryman looked as if he had never tasted
such wine before
He never had, I dare say
Now gentlemen said our host, I am going to fetch you
a drop or two a little out of the common way; you are to be the
judgesI say nothing. He left us, and there was a deal of
whispering and chuckling and rubbing of hands till he came
back; for he was reckoned the best judge of wines, and by
far the most liberal provider of the day in America, never
permitting a bottle of portwhich by the way was not much
drunk with you, when I was there
Nonor is it nowwe prefer madeira; and white wines
are preferred all over the country.
To stand up or to be decanted, nor a guest to take hold
of a bottle under any pretence, otherwise than by the neck
ah my dear Barry you are playing a desperate game.
Curse the cards!
Pho phonever curse the cards; play off and fight shy,
if they don't run as you wish; you are up like a bottle of
soda-water
just nowwell sir, he came back with a set of
clean glasses which he wouldn't suffer the
help
to carry.
We never say help Sir George, in the cities of America,
nor in the large towns, nor any where indeed except in a small
part of the back country.
I dare say notwith a bow. They were very small glasses,
and richly ornamented. He put them upon the table with
his own hands, wiped off the cobwebs from the bottle, drew
the cork as if he were drawing a tooth, and went around
with it on tip-toe, pouring a little into every glass in
succession
without filling any, and then going round again, till he
had divided the contents of the bottle in such a way that no
man appeared to have a single drop more than his neighbour.
There gentlemen said he, when he had finishedthere my
young friend! lifting his glass with compressed lips and
watching the look of my countrymansteadysteady!
Full-length, cried one of the party; ay ay, full length!
cried
another, and up we all rose to swallow the wine. There,
gentlemen, said Mr. G., I want to know your real opinion of
that 'ere stuff. We looked at each other all roundwe
sipped
a little of the sunshine, as we called itwe smacked our
lipsand then we replaced our glasses very cautiously,
without
venturing to say a wordall eyes were upon my
countryman
,
whose countenance was particularly solemn and
thoughtful. But he did not appear inclined to speak, any
more than the rest of us; and stood looking sideways at the
glass before him, with a sort of expression which might be
interpreted either way, as the result should require. At last
however he spoke, and vowed to Gad the stuff was pure,
and worthy of a duke's table. We agreed with him,
smacked our lips again, protested he was right, and swore
it was a mouthful worthy of a prince's tablea king'san
emperor'sliquid amber to say the least of it. And what
may that wine have stood you in? said a rich na-tyve, with a
sober calculating brow. No answer. How long have you
had it by you? said another. We thought of the dust and
cobwebs, and we smacked our lips again more heartily than
before; but our host would not answer the question. It must
have been a great while in the cork, said another: how long
pray; do tell us; we have a curiosity to know. Guess. Did
bottle it yourself? No. Ah ha! so I thoughtbefore your
time I'd swearputting the glass to his lips with great fervor
so I thought; heard o' this 'afore: but may be you 'll have
no objection to say how it stood you in by the pipe. By the
pipe! said Mr. G. By the pipeno by the gallon, said
the other. By the gallon sir! By the dozen I should say
beg your pardon. By the dozen! said Mr. G.with a
look which made the other throw up his hands and cry, Good
God! you did not lay it in by the bottle! No. But
your father before you did; I see how it is, ah ha! Never
mind who laid it in, but say what you think such wine
ought to be worth now in the bottle. Why,say about
aavery cautiously; eyeing Mr. G. between every two
syllablesa-a-about-twelve-dollars-a-doz-en, hey? What;
interest and allbottles and all! said Mr. G. Interest!
why to be suresaid the other, why to be sure, that ought
to be considered; no, noglancing at our host and then at
my countryman, who sat as if he were the foreman of a jury
in a matter of life and deathno, noI did not mean
interest
and all; no no, interest and all indeed! excuse me. I
began to feel a very uncomfortable awe upon me when I
heard this, and saw a merchant of high standing, and upwards
of fifty years of age, gravely calculating the interest on a
small bottle of wine; I felt as if I were doing what was
hardly
justifiable, in partaking of so precious a liquor. Say
fifteen
dollars a dozen, said another, touching the glass to his
lipsor sixteen, or sixteen-fifty, interest and all, which would
be one twenty-five, one thirty-three-and-a-third a bottle, or
one thirty-seven-and-a-halfsipping a little before every bid
interest and all. Moremore! cried another, who after
looking
at our host, threw his head back, and shut his eyes, with
an air of perplexity, and sat with his lips moving as if he
were saying over the multiplication-table to himself. Ah
but I meant hard money, neighbour; sixteen dollars and
fifty
cents hard money; why bless your heart, only consider!
one dollar and thirty-seven-cents-and-a-halfcashah, but
you didn't say cashcashfor a bottle of wine, why it 's out
of all reason! Very true, retorted the other; and so, I say
two dollars a bottle; two-fifty cried another; two-seventy
five, two-eighty! and a full stop. No, said our host, no!
You are wide o' the mark yet; you have no idea of the
actual
cost o' that 'ere wine I see; you surely haven't smacked
the flavor; try it again, my lads, try it again; a little o'
that 'll make you fat, as the song says, all round the body O!
Nantucket for ever, cried a sly old codger; what stuff it is
man; say three dollars a bottle! Nosaid our host very
positively, no! Four?No! Fivesixseveneight?up
went all the glasses togethernonono, said our host, and
we felt as if every drop was a jewel. Another dead stop.
Fluid gold, as I 'm a sinner, cried the youngest man at the
tableeight-fifty, eight seventy-five. But still our host
answered
no. The company were all struck dumb. Wine had
been soldwe knew thatfor ten dollars a bottle in Boston;
but that was at a time of great political excitement, and under
very particular circumstances. And though the purchaser
bought only five or six dozen, he had a supply years and years
afterward.
No one dared to guess again. There was a deep dead
silencedead as that of a New-England meeting-house in the
middle of a warm summer-afternoon. We looked at each other
at the wineat our hostand then we dropped our eyes
one after another, as if we had been guilty of some
unpardonble
sin. What had we to do with the precious ointment;
what right had we to be drinking wine more costly than that
in which Cleopatra dissolved the pearl
That was vinegar, Sir George.
And how could we drink it off with so little emotion. It
was a thing never to be forgotten or forgiven. Why sir, to
tell you the truth, even II cannot deny iteven I had
begun
to look upon the rich Mr. G. with singular veneration;
to wonder now that he had been so prodigal, with his one
little parsimonious, niggardly bottlebottle, it was n't a
bottle! it was nothing more than a large phial; I began to
reproach him for having dealt out the sunshinethe fluid
goldthe liquid amberso munificently, in the vast
acorncups
.
Our glasses were nearly or quite empty; mine had
been so for some timethere was only a lurking drop
at the bottom, the usual thumb-nail offering, which had been
concocted from the rich exhalation of the glass, while we
were engaged in estimating the total value of the treasure.
I lifted the glass. I turned it up and held the edge upon the
tip of my tongue, till that one thick drop had slowly trickled
outO, the flavor and fragrance of that one drop! I had
never tasted the virtue of the liquid before; and while I
looked
about me upon the more experienced wine-bibbers, and
saw their glasses not more than half exhausted, I felt
ashamed
of my unskilful voracity. They were voluptuariesI a
sensualist
.
But I was younger than they; and there was still
hope for me I thought, if I should ever fall in the way of
such another drop of wine while I breathed
Here the stranger drew forth his watch, and keeping his
eye upon the door, appeared to be getting very impatient.
I observed him, but I did not believe that any body else did,
so engaged were the whole party between the play, and the
story of Sir George, who continued as follows.
21
I was the first to speak after the last no of Mr. G. had
been articulatedthe first to get my breath I believe. Now
pray sir, said I, pray do tell usI stopped, I began to fear
that I was going too far, and the company sat with their heads
advanced and their mouths all open, as if they were so
many purchasers in a lottery, the high-prize of which would
appear at the first word spoken by Mr. G.how much
did that wine cost you, interest and all, as near as you can
tell? Why, said he, after a long pause,it would be very
difficult
,
perhaps impossible to say exactlytimeinterest
compound-interest, labor, storage, leakage, breakage, agency,
&c, &c, &c, butbutas near as I am able to saywe all
pressed forward, and my poor countryman gasped for breath
and I have taken some pains I promise you to arrive at
the truth, knowing what sort of men were to drink itwe all
bowed, my countryman lower than any body elseto arrive
at the truth, and as near as I am able to sayanother pause
and another long breath from the whole companyand I
assure
you that I made the calculation myself not three hours
ago, it cannot be far from twelve-and-a-half, or perhaps twelve
and three-quartersWhy how you talk, Mr. G., twelve
dollars and three quarters for a bottle of wine! why you ought
to be, what they say you are, the richest man in America.
No sir, said Mr. G.; No sir, you are rather too lively.
I did not say, nor mean to say, twelve and three-quarter
dollars
but
twelve and three-quarter
cents
.
Bravo! Sir George, bravo! bravo! cried the major, just
as the door opened, and a short, square-shouldered,
vulgarlooking
man stepped into the room and took a remote position
which allowed him to reconnoitre the whole company. The
moment the tall stranger saw him, his eye lighted up, and
fell upon Edwards with a look which made me shiverit
was but a momentary glance, but coupling it with what
followed
,
I am sure I never shall forget the expression, till my
dying day.
Well, how do you think we behaved, how do you think
we felt, continued Sir George. Mr. G. had told us
nothing
but the truth. It was a wine that he had picked up for little
or nothing, nobody knows where, and bottled off in old
weather-worn, crooked bottles, covered with dust and
cobwebs
.
It was a good lesson to me sirbeginning to shuffle
the cards, for a new dealI have never forgotten itI never
shall forget itthere is not a day, nor an hour, in which the
moral of that lesson may not be applied, onetwothree,
to the every-day transactions of life, onetwothreeNo
sir! the value of every thing now is to be estimated by the
cost in
Here the fellow who had just entered the room drew nearer
to the party, and appeared anxious to catch the eye of some
one at the table
By the cost in pounds, shillings, and pencea laugh,
and he continued with a burlesque air of gravityIn a word
sir, the prodigal and the spendthrift are followed, and the
worthy are despised now
Here the square-built stranger held up his fore-finger to
Edwards, who did not perceive him, so diverted was he by
the drollery of Sir George, and so deeply occupied with the
game. He had been very successful it appeared, for the gold
and the bank notes lay in a pile at his elbow, and he was
more cheerful than I had ever seen him
Parade imposes upon every body. Champaign would pass
for perry at a farmer's table; perry for champaign at a lord's
well sir! who are you! He had caught the eye of the
strangerwhat is your business here!
He grew very pale and the cards dropped out of his hand,
as he spoke.
Every eye followed hisand every lip quivered; for there
stood a man, who was not of their party, nor of their
knowledge
,a
man they had never seen before, and his hand was
up, and his finger bent, and he was beckoning to one of the
party to get up and follow him, as if he knew that no one
there would have courage to disobey the signal.
Nevernever shall I forget the scene that followed.
Every
body silent as death, every body speechless, and yet
every
body aware of the truth, before half a minute was over.
Edwards got up, for he saw and they saw that the signal
was for him and for nobody else; and when they were
satisfied
of that, they grew cheerful, and crowded about him,
and whispered with him, and told him to be of good courage;
but he shook them off one after another as if he could not
bear the sympathy of such men, stood up with a brave
desperate
air, and was about to speak to the stranger who had
betrayed him, as if
he
were the only creature to be trusted,
at such a time. I could not bear thisI stepped forward
What can I do for you! said I. He seized my hand which
he wrung with all his mighthe would have spoken I dare
say, but he could not. Beware of that stranger, said I in a
low voice. If you are betrayed now, he has betrayed you.
Impossibleyou do not know him; he is the truest friend I
have on earth. However that may be, said I, I tell you again
that he has betrayed youask him; he will not deny it.
Ah! what say you Mr. O.? Good God! not the Mr.
O.
whom your wife was acquainted with years and years
ago. The same. I have nothing more to say! And you,
I believe sir, have nothing more to hopeI should say
to you now, if you were my own brotherI
do
say to you,
after what I have seen of his behaviour to-nightbe
prepared
for the worstyou do not hear mefor the worst
whatever it may be.
I willI am.Stay, Mr. O., stay! a word with you,
before we part. I have regarded you as a
Here Mr. O., who had been watching us, got up, and
walked away as if he had never seen Edwards before.
EnoughenoughI am satisfied now. Fellowthis
way
Fellow! said the man, with a look which made my very
blood run cold. It was the brutal impudent leer of a low
nature
invested with extraordinary power. Why there 's no great
hurry d 'ye see; the gemmen better finish the game; we likes
to show fair play to them as
is
gemman
My dear Holmes, continued the prisonerI knew he was
a prisoner, and I could have sworn that he was in great peril
by the very tone of his voicemy dear Holmes, I have no
other friend leftno other hopetake this ringit was my
wedding-ringtake it to my wife
And what shall I say to her
Nothingnothing
What! have you nothing to say; no message to send to
her! not a word
Poor Mary! The ring will be message enough to satisfy
her. She will understand itfarewell
No nowhat more can I do for you? where shall I find
you to-morrow
To-morrow
!with a bitter smileGod only knows; but
I pray you to leave me now, and go straightway to Mary with
that ring; do that my dear sirI was deeply affected by his
mannerdo that, and you will have done for me all that it is
now possible for man to do
Edwards! what do you mean
I mean what I say. There is no hope for me
No hope! -
21*
Now sir, he added, before I could finish what I had to
say, turning toward the messenger who had several
banknotes
in his hand which he had picked up, without being
observed
,
and which had been carried away, by the draft from
the open door, while we were engaged in the fearful inquiry
that his appearance had provokedNow sir, I am ready
for you: Good night allgood night!
Good night! Good night! said every body in the room;
and almost every body with a voice of deep-seated emotion.
They were scattered about, some sittingsome standingas
if a thunderbolt had fallen through the roof.
He passed out, and I was going to follow, when I was
stopped
by two strangers, while the man that I saw at the cottage
Fontleroystepped forward with a cheerful air and
begged
to know if bail would be received.
BailNosaid a gruff voice, and we parted; he
for a lock-up house I thought; and I to deliver a
message
to a woman that I had vowed never again to see.
CHAPTER XXII.
THE RING... THE WATCHMAN.
The
moment I was in the street, I began to look about for
a coach, determined whatever might be the hour, to lose no
time in the delivery of the charge entrusted to me; for how
could I be sure of the morrow? how could I know what
story the ring would tell to the deserted wife? What was to
be done? Should or should I not see her? Should I go
to her at once, or wait till the morrow? There would be
no sleep for her, while the husband of her heart was away
no sleep for me, till I had done what I had undertaken to do.
But there was no coach to be had; the great squares and
wide streets before me were all deserted. I drew out my
watch with surpriseI had no idea of the hourit was after
three o'clock; the lamps were going out, and I saw on
looking
up, what I had not seen for a twelvemonth before, the
day-light spreading over a clear blue sky, and felt as I stood
there debating with myself how to proceed, what I have not
felt sincethe cool air blowing upon my forehead as if I
were at sea. There was no time to be lost, and after a
little hesitation I hurried away, agitated with a fear that
grew more and more insupportable at every step, and giddy
with a feeling that I dare not speak of now. Before I had
determined what course to pursue, I found myself at the
door of No. ,  street, Bedford Square. I stopped---I
stood stillmy courage died away; and I strove to reason
myself out of the dreadful vague fear that possessed me; but
I could not, and I was actually turning away from the door,
with a determination which a few minutes before nothing
would have induced me to make, when I saw a light which
appeared to proceed from the back parlor on the ground
floor. It was a clear steady light, such as one may be sure
to see from the place where a fond faithful wife is watching
over a baby, or waiting for its father.
I knocked, and immediately the light moved, and a voice
reached my ear with an accent of joy, and a step came
hurrying
to the door; but just when it was so near that I felt it
necessary to draw back, I heard another step, and a heavier
one approach, and after a word or two in a sweet kind
voice that nobody could hear without emotion, the light
eager
step withdrew and the door was opened a little waya
very little wayjust far enough for me to see the head of a
man, stooping with age, who started back when he saw me,
saying, Who are you? What do you want here, I should like
to know? Where is master Ned?
Who is it, Philip? cried some one at the top of the
staircase
,
where I saw the shadow of a woman projected along
the white wall, with her clothes huddled up to her bosom,
and her whole attitude that of one who listens with breathless
anxiety.
I don't know I 'm sureit 's a stranger, said he,
grappling
the heavy door-chain with both hands, looking at me as
if he had just been waked out of a sound sleep, and speaking
as if he thought I intended to force my way.
A strangeris he alone?
I believe sopeeping out as he spoke.
Go to your mistress and say to her, if she has not retired,
that I beg leave to see her, said II have a message for her.
Open the door, Philip, open the door! I know that
voice
But the old man could not open the door; the chain was
heavy, the catch had slipped, and he shook so, that I could
not help asking where the other servants were.
He made no reply, but I saw by his look that
notwithstanding
all I had been a witness to a few hours before, the
show of powdered lackeys and rich livery, there were no
other servants in that large house, now that the dinner was
over and the company awaynone but this aged and faithful
man, who did every day in the week perhaps, what, on this
particular day, five younger and better-clothed men had
pretended
to do. Shall I confess the truth? Shall I own that
after this idea occurred to me, my sympathy for the sorrowful
wife, my admiration for the deserted and beautiful wife grew
less and less every moment? Who would have the courage
to avow this? And yet, who is there to disbelieve me when I
avow it? If the servants were contributed for the occasion
who should say that the rich wines were not, and the
superb
furniture? And if the husband were not so wealthy as I
had hopedof course the wife would not suffer so much by
an overthrow.
PhilipPhilipcontinued the voice.
Madam
Say to Mr Holmes that I cannot possibly see him.
D' ye hear that sir? no use openin' the door now
But perhaps he will be so kind as to leave the
message
with you.
Very fair, thought I, vexed and sore at my receptiona
pretty reward for my trouble! tearing a leaf out of my
pocket-book and writing these words on it`I have no
message
to deliver; nothing but thisI have called now at the
desire of your husband; I do not know that he wished me
to see you, but in the hope that I might be of use, I have
begged the favora favor that I shall never beg either of
him or of you, again. Farewell!God bless you. If it be
in my power to serve you, command me.'
There, said I, wrapping up the ring in the paper and
giving
it to the old man. Theretake that to your mistress
immediately
Yes sir
Give it into her own hands, d' ye hear?
I left him as I said this, and had got a considerable way
off, when I heard a shrieka screama short brief cry that
pierced my heart like a knife. I stopped and listened and
held my breath, and hurried back just in time to have the
door shut in my face, to see lights moving about, and to hear
steps hurrying hither and thither through every part of the
house. O, the agony, the unutterable agony that followed!
for I knocked and knocked and nobody came to relieve me,
and the whole house grew dark and silent as the grave.
But I would not stir from the stepI would not leave the
door, till I heard some one say in a low terrified voice from
within, For God's sake, who is there!
I repeated my name.
Do
go away sir! do, do! you know not the mischief you
are doing; you 'll have the watch about you.
I 'll never go awaynever, never! till I know how she
is
Go away sir, for God's sake! you have killed my poor
mistress!
Killed her
Yes, that you have; she can hardly speak now; and you
are determined not to let her sleep
Why don't you send for somebody?
We' ve nobody to sendI wish you
would
go away!
Off I started, meaning to go for Dr. Armstrong, who lived
not very far off; but the moment I left the door, somebody
called out for me saying, Heave to! Holloa there, heave to, I
say!
I paid no attention to the call
Heave to! heave to!
Some sailor thought I, with too much grog aboard
I 've been a watchin' you this half hour, my fine feller;
which if you don't heave to, afore I give the word, you 'll be
brought up with a round turn
Who the devil are you? said I.
I 'm the watch; who the devil are you?
Oh, I beg your pardon
What were you doin' there jess now
Delivering a message
Ughand what are you runnin' away for?
Going for a doctor.
Ughyou must go with me if you please.
With youwhat for?
Don't like your lookspretty story to gammon them as
knows what 's what.
My looksyou impudent blackguard!
Come come, master, none o' that now; better keep a civil
tongue in your head, afore we clap the screws to you.
Why, how dare you speak to a gentleman in this way!
A gentlemanpohdon't I know you?
Know me!
Yes you, and all the rest o' the troop; and wasn't we put
on our guard no longer ago 'an yesterday; and didn't I see
you try to get into that 'ere house not an hour ago under
false pertences; but they knowed you afore to-day, they
was up to your tricks, and wouldn't let you in
Look you, said I, pulling off my gloves and buttoning up
my coat
A nice gentleman you, to be sure; tryin' to get into a
house when you know the people's away; come come,
give an account of yourseff.
Look you, I have not much to say to you; you are under
a mistake
Phoowith an impudent leer.
You are under a mistake, I say! You have your duty to
perform and I have mine. There lies my way; I am going
for a doctor, and if you stop me, or interfere with me, you
shall rue it the longest day you have to live.
Phoo
Shall I knock him down! said I to myself; or shall I set
off and try to outrun the watchor shall I try to escape in a
quieter way. It would be the devil to be stopped here.
I adopted the latter course, determined to try the value of
a system which every body recommended to me, almost
every day in the weekthat is, whenever I was in a scrape
or just out of a scrapeto give soothing syrup.
My good fellow, said I
UghI thought you'd come to
You see how it isa matter of life and death; I tell
you I am going for a doctor; if you don't believe me, go
with me.
He shook his head with a sort of smile which gave me a
convulsion of the right shoulderI saw that I should have to
drop him. Phoo phoo, said he, that won't do, that's an old
story; every body we catch a runnin' away, is always agoin'
for the doctor.
Upon my word, it 's a true story
Well well, you come along o' me, and if they believe you,
they 'll either send a doctor to the house, or let you go for
one.
Here, said Ihere 's a crown for you; you may either
go with me or let me go by myself.
Thank your honor; but you seepocketing the crown with
a bow and buttoning up to the chin as he spoke, with a very
deliberate slow motionwe never goes off our beat.
Well then I suppose you dare not go with me?
No your honor
Very wellgood night
Stop, your honor.
Stopwhat for? Don't you mean to let me go?
No, your honor
Why you impudent rascalhow dare you! Do you
mean to keep the silver?
To be sure I do, your honor.
You are a knave.
How so, your honor
I 'll have you dismissed.
What for, your honor? If your honor 's a gemman you
gives it to me as a free gift, you know, an' if your honor is
no gemman, its a bribe, an' as I mean to own to 't as soon as
iver you are safe, I don't see where 's the harm.
What could I say? There was but one hope leftI took
out a sovereign. If you will suffer me to go, said I, here is a
sovereign for you and here is my card
He took the card, and holding the wrong side up, affected
to be reading it
What say you; it is now four o'clock.
Ugh
Will you take the sovereign?
Yes, your honor.
Will you let me go?
No, your honor
Shall I give you more?
As much as you like, your honor
Will you let me go, or will you not?
I will not, your honor.
22
I looked at my watch; it wanted five minutes of four;
and without saying another word, I walked away. He
pursued
me, and got before me, and put out his hand to arrest
me. Touch me at your peril, said I.
Phoo, your honor
I quickened my step, he touched me, and received a blow
which sent him headlong into the street. He was probably
stunned, for though I walked away, I had time to get a
considerable
distance before I heard the noise of pursuit or the
spring of the rattle. It grieved me to strike the poor fellow,
but what was I to doa guinea would repair all the damage
that
he
suffered or could suffer, while on the other side the
damage might be incalculable.
It was a very awkward affair thoughthe rattles were
sprung at last, and in five minutes more, owing to the noise
of my heavy-shod boots in the vast echoing solitude, I was
captured and led off to the watch-house in broad day-light;
and although I succeeded in satisfying all parties, and in
sending a message to Dr. Armstrong, it was near five
o'clock in the afternoon before I was liberated. And how
was I liberated after all?why, in such a condition that I
was afraid to look up as I hurried through the streets, afraid
to appear at my lodgings, till I had sneaked into a bath at
Leicester-Square, and afraid even to go to a chop-house for
a dinner, till I had changed every rag of clothes I had on.
It was eight in the evening before I got back to  street,
Pall-Mall, whither I hurried with a mixture of feelings which
it would be idle for me to attempt to describe. To this
hour I know not, I cannot imagine how I lived through the
day as I did. The woman I most loved on earthfor
aught I knewwas no more. The proud, beautiful woman!
I had struck her to the hearther cry had reached mea
whole day had passed over, and yet I knew not whether she
was dead or alive. And why so fearful a change? The
day before I would have died for her. Could it be that a
little wrath was too mighty for such love? Could it be that
my hope was not pure, and that by refusing to see me, she
had rebuked it for ever? And how had I passed the day? I
did not know; I do not know to this hour; I only know that
I was in a fever all day long; that I was piqued when I left
the message at the door, and that I was in wrath, when I
got back to my lodgings after a day of bitter trial, to find that
no message had been left for me.
It was very dark when I arrived at the house; and my
heart failed me when I lifted the knocker. It sounded
heavily
to my ear, and perhaps I struck it heavily; but however
that may be, I declare that I was not much surprised when a
little boy came up to me and said that the people of the house
were gone away.
Gone away, my poor boyand where have they gone?
said I.
We don't know, sir
Weand who are you? Do you belong to the house?
Nomother an' me, we had the run o' the kitchen till
to-day
;
and to-day the poor lady has gone off; and we don't
know what to do sir, please.
What time did she go?
Jest afore dinner
Did you see her? was she well
Oh no sir; she was very bad, she and the little
chambermaid
and the poor old man; but she didn't cry, and they
did.
Where is your mother? Did she see them?
No sir; mother's bad too; she hasn't been here this most
a week, but the poor lady used to send her the vittles every
day.
Do you know who owns the house?
No sir.
Did she leave no message for any body when she went
away?
No sir; she went away as fast as ever she could, sir.
In a coach?
In two coaches and a cart, if you please sir.
Very well, thought I; if I do not hear within a day or two,
I will give her up entirely, orstayhere 's my old friend
the watchman; perhaps he can tell me more about the
matter
.
I say, heave to there!
Heave to yourself then! cried a voice from the box; but
it was not the voice of the man that hailed me the night
before
;
it was altogether different, more good-natured and
more agreeable. At first, I gave myself credit for the change;
but on coming to the box, I found out my mistake. It was a
new watchmanI felt sorry, for in spite of the rude
behaviour
of the fellow whom I had quarrelled with, I was
delighted
with his humor and courage; and his fidelity was worthy
of all praise, for I could neither terrify, nor coax, nor bribe
him. It was a pity for such a pure specimen of the
Charleys
to be turned adriftI will intercede for him, thought I;
and I spoke to the incumbent, who speedily satisfied me that
I had no occasion to give myself any farther trouble about
him, for he was still in office, and likely to be there as long
as he could wear a watch-coat or twirl a rattle. So much
the better, said I; vexed nevertheless, that I had no
opportunity
of showing how magnanimous I
could
be.
But this man was unable to give me any farther information
about the people of the house; they had not been there long,
he said, but some how or other, a notion had got abroad
before
they had been there a week, that there was a sort of
mystery about them. They were very quiet people to be
sure; but they saw nobody, they never went abroad, except
in the evening; the door was always kept bolted and barred,
which was all proper enough to be sure in such a place, but
then they had no servants, and they never appeared to eat
any thing. God knows how they live, said he
Very true, said I. But as I do not happen to care much
how they live, I wish you would take my cardhere take two
or three of themand here's a trifle for you, and if you
hear any thing more of the parties, or if you are able to find
out who owns the house, let me know immediately.
Yes, your honor
Fire and fury; if you ever say yes your honor, to me,
I 'll serve you as I did your predecessor!
No your honor
I started off! it was quite impossible to bear another such
attack of yes your honor, no your honor, and the devil knows
what, from a watchman surprised into civility by a bribe.
22*
CHAPTER XXIII.
THE CATASTROPHE.
My
next move was to Russel Square, No 48, where Dr.
Armstrong lived. I was lucky enough to find him at home. He
had called with my note, according to my desire, and
immediately
after receiving it; but the lady would not suffer him to
see her; she would see nobody, the servant said, being very
ill, and trying to get some sleep. I went away, said the
docter
,
with a design to see you; but was prevented by a
variety
of circumstances, and I took another opportunity of calling
on the lady. But the house was already shut up, and all that
I know of her is, that a fee has been left here which I do
not choose to receive, with the respectful compliments of Mrs.
M Ewho being attended by her own physician has only
to thank me for my obliging promptitude, &c. &c. &c.
M. E., M. E.allow me to see the note if you please;
It will be a great relief to me to know that she is able to
write.
Certainly, said he.
But the hand-writing was not hers. And here it might be
well for me to stop; for if I were to write for ever, it would
be impossible to give a true idea of the perplexity and grief
that pursued me day after day, that pursue me still on
account
of that mysterious woman. I would go on a
pilgrimage
to the ends of the earthI would journey the world over
to see her again, as I saw her at the Isle-of-Wight.1 I would
givebut noI have begun the story and it must be told
now, and what is more, it must be told in such a way, that
those who hear it shall go with me step by step, through the
labyrinth, out of which I am now laboring to extricate
myself
as I never labored before.
A week passed over, and as I heard nothing from her, from
Edwards, nor from any body else, relating to either of them,
and as I could not throw off the trouble that was changing
me hour by hour, and making me peevish in spite of all I
could do, I determined to lay every thing else aside for a
week or two, and give up my whole time, if necessary, to the
investigation of the affair. I saw the landlord; but he could
give me no satisfaction. All that he knew was, that he had
been well treated by a gentlemanly man, who after engaging
his house for half a year and paying for it in advance, went
away long before the time had expired, and leaving the
furniture
in the best possible order, and every part of the house
in capital condition. Others might say what they liked, but
he should say from that circumstance alone, if there were
nothing else in their favor, that they were well brought up. As
for the wife, he never saw her but oncebut that was enough
to satisfy him that she was a gentlewoman, every inch of
herno leaning her head against the new paper, no shuffling
about over the carpets, no dragging of chairs, and sofas, and
tables, every thing was lifted up and carried in a lady-like
way where she was; that any body could see, by the sofa
she occupied all the time she was there. Why bless you
't was as good as new, and quite smooth when she left it. And
as for the manhe was a gentleman too, though rather
uppish
if any thing, but he liked him all the better for that.
Why so
It showed he had good blood in his veins, or ought to
have.
Truedid he refer to any body when he took your
house?
Ay, to a banker in Great Berners street, describing the
very individual whom I saw at the cottage, and who on the
night of the arrest had offered to bail Edwards.
Enough, I will go to him, said I.
He is out of town Sir, just now. I wanted to see him two
or three days ago, about this very affair, and I was told that
he would be absent for three weeks.
For three weeks, thought I. Then will I see some one
else of the party; Sir George, or Mr. Barry, or that
blockhead
of a major; but where were they to be found? At
's Hotel to be sure; and away I posted to 's
Hotel
,
where I had the satisfaction to hear that nobody knew
either Sir George, or Mr. Barry, or that blockhead of a
major
.
They had never met there till about a week before one
of the party was taken up, nobody knew what for, while they
were engaged at what would never have been permitted in
the house, if it had been knownvery high play. Their
behaviour had always been proper enough, said the principal
waiter, eyeing me as he spoke, but no one of the party would
ever be permitted to play under that roof again, till the
matter
was cleared up.
I had nothing more to saynothing more to do; my
search was at an end; I had come to a full stop. I knew
this, and yet I could not give up the inquiry, nor the hope
that something would come of it; until at the end of two weeks,
finding that my health was impaired, that I could neither eat
nor sleep, that my hair was falling off with a fever of the
mind; that I was growing nervous, actually nervous, and that a
preternatural anxiety had got possession of me, which I knew
would be fatal, if I did not make a desperate and a speedy
effort
,
I determined to throw up my books and go into the country
for a while. There was much to see, and how could I
employ
my time better than by seeing it, under circumstances
which, whatever else they did, were pretty sure to make me
happier and healthier. I could not be worse---for I had begun
to feel what I had never felt before and what I hope never to
feel again, a dread of the future. I could not bear the idea
of living to old age; time was getting too heavy and the
days too long for me. I could not workperhaps I might
play.
But nonoI mistook the remedy; for after journeying
east, west, north, and south, till I was wearytired of the
large trees, the blue water and the deep green earth, tired of
the very sky, and fatigued with perpetual change, I
discovered
that when the heart is too full for work it is much too full
for play; that when the spirit is overcharged and vexed and
sore, it is no time to go abroad for joy, or to move in the
pathway of strangersa bitter truth to know after solitude
has worn us to the grave; but still, the sooner we know it
the better; for if we are unhappy it may drive us to the only
refuge below for the unhappyoccupation. If there be no
hope in solitude, no hope in the great over-crowded
thoroughfares
of life, there may be hope, there is hope in steady
and useful occupation. We have but to persevere for a few
days, and that which was a labor, will become a joy to the
heart.
I could not keep away after I came to the knowledge of
this truth; and so I lost no time in returning to my studies.
To-morrowfive weeks to-morrow, said I, as I sat on a little
stone-bridge that crossed the river  at  three of
which I have spent here, I hardly know why, I hardly know
how, here in the very neighborhood of  where she was
born. Every body knew her, and every body speaks well
of her, and yet nobody knows, not even her own mother,
where she is, nor whether she is alive or dead. I have been
to the cottage, I have been to the sea-shore, I have trod
again every step of the way that we ever trod together, I have
pursued her as the North-American savage would pursue his
prey, and I have no hope now that I shall ever see her again.
Five weeks to-morrow! To-morrow I will be where I was,
before
that woman crossed my pathon my way over the sea;
or to-morrow, I will return to my studies and forget herif it
be possible. I drew out my watch, there was time for
either. Liverpool was not far off, and I might be at sea
before
the morrow was over; London was not far off, and I
might be at work, before the sun rose again. But wherefore
at sea? Shall I give up and go back after all that I have
endured
,
because of a beautiful woman? Shall I forego my
birthright for ever, my proud hope, and the high station that I
have struck for, day after day and year after year, because
of that, which they who best know me, would not believe to
be capable of turning me aside for so much as an hour? No
noI will do what is more worthy of her. I will go back to the
great business of life. It may be in my power to do much
goodI will try to do it. I will try to be a man, the
recollection
of whose love, wherever she may be, and whatever she
may be, will be a comfort to her. I started upso proud,
and so happy, and so eager to begin! with my heart and my
lips running over! Five weeks to-morrow! said Iit is now
early in the day: one more stroll into the woods there,
one more look at the river while it passes underneath the
little window of the summer-house, where I have stood by
the hour, agitated with a hope that I am sorry for now, and
ashamed ofa superstitious hope which would be
unintelligible
to the happy; one more look at the smooth dark water
she told me of, where the tear-drop fell, and though my
heart should break for it, I will go away from this
neighbourhood
for ever before the sun sets.
I did so. Before the sun set I was on my way back to
town. That I might keep my vow the better, I took a
postchaise
,
after getting as far as I could by the coach, and
arrived
on the morrow just before the clock struck eight. I had
been asleep for two or three hours, when a heavy bell,
connected
in some way or other with a dream I had, awoke me.
It was several minutes before I could recollect myself; the
carriage had stopped, the morning was very dull and thick,
and there was a heavy roar about me for a good while after
I awoke, which I could not imagine the cause of; it
appeared
to be growing louder and louder, and was like the roar of
the sea. After a minute or two, the great bell sounded
again so near me and with a sound so unlike any thing I ever
heard in my life, that I started broad awake, and calling out
to the boy, asked him what he was stopping for.
Can't move sir; wedged up sirno help for it now sir,
till the job is over; whoa there, whoa!
Stop stopwhat 's the matter! said I, tearing away the
curtain from the glass and looking through it as well as
the moisture would allow me. There appeared to be a great
multitude on every side of the carriage, most of whom had
their hats off, though the fog was like a heavy dew. Who
are these people? what are they doing here?
Before he could reply there was a great rush among the
crowd, cries and shrieks, and before they had subsided one
universal groan.
Theretherethat 's he! cried some one who stood upon
the wheel of the carriage.
That 's hethat 's hethere they come, cried several
others
,
who appeared to be on the top of the carriage.
Poor fellowpoor fellow!God bless you! God bless
you! cried several more, just as the boy let down the window
and called out to me to look, look! and I should see 'em
better
nor if I was outside, or on the top of the coach.
Where are we? How long have we been here? said I.
Above an hour.
How did you get over the chain? cried a bystander.
What chainI saw no chain.
Here a man rode up on horseback, and ordered the
people
off the carriage, with an air of authority.
I shuddered at his look, and began to have some idea of the
dreadful truth, for I could see huge walls before me, with heavy
fetters and bars hung up in festoons over the arched gate-way.
Drive on drive on! I cried---I see where we are now! Drive
on I say---or let me escape.
Lord Sirthere they go!
I could not help looking outfor there was no other way
to look; nor could I help seeing right before me, within a
few yards of the carriage, when I did look out, preparations
for putting a fellow-creature to death. I was terror struck
fascinated with fearand though I withdrew my head and
shut my eyes, and stopped my ears before I drew my breath,
I had time to see the figure and shape of the man who was
about to dietime to feel what I would not feel again for
the wealth of a kingdom, for they were the figure and shape
of a man that I knewof the man that I saw at the cottage
time to hear the multitude speak his name, as ifOh God!
as if they were no parties to the dreadful worktime to hear
that he was to die for forgery, though heaven and earth had
been moved in his behalf.
Let me pass over what followed. I could not bear to
think of the frightful possibility which the death of poor
Fontleroy obtruded upon my mind. If he was a forger,
what were they who appeared so inferior to him? Could
this be the authorship they meant? If so, how heartless
their behavior! how treacherous their levity! If he were
worthy of such a death, he who had occupied so high a place
in good society; he who whenever I saw him and wherever
I saw him, had appeared to such advantage over all that I saw
him with, if nothing could save him, what was to become of
poor Edwards? If there were no hope for the man, who
but a little time before, the very last evening I saw them
together, had been permitted to go free, while Edwards went
away before him, as it were under the ban of society, what
hope could there be for Edwards?
I grew sick with terror, giddy with a strange fear. I
thought of my own escape, of the beautiful woman, of the
wretch who betrayed her husband, of all that I have related
here and of much that I want courage to speak of now.
But I returned to my studies, fearful that if I inquired
further, I should learn the issue of what I trembled to think
of; and lose the only hope I now had left. Month after
month passed over, and I had begun to be cheerful. I never
trusted myself to speak of my adventure; to be idle for a
day, nor even to look at the papers which now lie before me.
I had begun to sleep as I did in my youthI no longer
dreamed of the cottage and the sea-shore, the summer-house,
the bridge, or the cliff. But one day, as I stood in the
square at Somerset-House, happening to turn my head, I
saw the tall man with the scar in the cheek, who it appeared
to me was chargeable with whatever had happened to poor
Edwards. For a moment or two, I could not have spoken
loud enough to be heard, if it had been to save my life; but
afraid of losing the only opportunity I might ever have, an
opportunity that I had languished for, of telling him to his
teeth what I thought of him, and what she had thought of him,
the poor credulous wife, whom he would have sacrificed over
and over again, if he had had the power, I pursued him and
put myself before him; and signified to him that I had
something
to say as soon as I could speak.
23
The moment he saw me, he stopped with a look of
surprise
,
and putting his hand into his bosom appeared to be
griping after what I felt sure was a knife or a pistol.
As soon as I had got my breath, I lowered my voice to a
very quiet pitchone that I never use till I am ready to put
my life at stake, and after a brief apology began to relate so
much of the story told me by Mary Pas concerned her
faith in his word, long after she was married to another, and
her high opinion of his probity; and I was just going to add a
few little remarks of my own, to show that I, who knew
mankind
better, had always a very bad opinion of his behavior;
but before I came to this part of my speech he put me out
with a bow and a grave smile, which provoked me beyond
measure.
I am very happy to meet with you, said he; I have been
looking for you.
You have---here is my card.
Much obliged to you; this, I take it, is your
real
name?
It iswhile I am here.
I wish I had known it a few weeks agoI had a message
for you.
A message for me!
He drew out a memorandum-book, opened it, and produced
a letter as he spoke. I have a letter in which you are
interested
;
I have been very anxious to see you, but as I had
not your address, and knew not where to obtain it, for the
lady herself could not furnish me with it, I have not been able
to find you.
AhI know that hand-writing!
I dare say you do; she speaks of you, as if next to her
husband, there was nobody on earth for whom she cared so
much. Herehereread it---folding down the top of the
first page as he spoke---you may read all but the date and
address.
I read the letter; and as I read it, such was the joy that
came over me, such was the sorrow I felt for having
outraged
a lofty nature, that upon my word, I was ready to
kneel down at his feet, and beg him to forgive me. I do
not remember the wordsI have no copy of the letter
it was not intended for mebut I remember that I saw in it
all the proof I could have prayed for, touching herself---her
husband---this man who had saved her husband's life and
restored him to her love, and I may add of her affection for
me.
But where are they now? said I.
He shook his head.
You mean to let me know, of course?
No.
No!
I am afraid she cares a little too much for you.
Sir!
And you a little too much for her! She says you would'nt
mind the voyage, if you knew where she was.
The
voyage
, hey?
Yes, poor girl! and being aware of that, she has begged
me to do nothing which may lead either to a renewal of your
acquaintance, or to so much as a correspondence by letter.
You are a little piqued I see.
PiquedIoh no, not in the leastno---no
no
.
Yes you are. But you are to know that she has only
written me once, and that although the letter she wrote then
was more to
you
than to me, she promises never to write me
again. And what is more, she begs you to send your
address
.
I gave her my address at the door, that morning.
So you thought, and so I told her; but the paper you
speak of did not contain your address, or you would have
been told that day, what I now tell you in her name, that
she refused to see you from a fear whichbut enough
you have done more than I, toward making her happy, and
therefore it is that she will never see you again.
A pretty reward!
So it is.
But how am I to know, after I have left you, that she
is
happy? That voyage you spoke ofI understand you, I
suppose; Botany Bay or Van Diemen's Land, eh?
Botany Bay!
Yes---gone there, eh?
No indeed.
Where then?
To America---the United States of North America.
Gracious God! you don't say so, then I shall see her
again!
END.`My dear Friend,
`I am not good for much'I give her own words`but
I lay awake a few nights ago thinking of novel-writing and of
your W A. Shall I tell you what I thought?
You are writing another; now hear meyou once told me
I could write one. I could not; I know myself best. If I
had any talent that way, I would gladly throw my little into
your stock. But I have noneyou have more than enough.'
A very sensible remark thought I.
`You have more than enough. First then, husband
your resources better. Remember that every thing ceases
to astonishto exciteto moveby repetition. Suffering
torturedeathany thing may become familiar and tamed
of its horrors by repetition. Don't launch your thunder at
butterflies and gnats. Don't make your heroes go raving
mad for a cause, an offence, which five rational words would
remove or explain. One ceases to sympathize in such
gratuitous
and self-inflicted misery. Don't let a scene, which
might appropriately end in tearsbitter tears and agonized
silence, end in fire and fury, whirlwind, tempest, lightning,
and the . Are you mad, my dear friend? No,
you will not be angry with me. I could not write this if I
had not a deep interest in all you write. Againyour
characters
all talk too much the same languagehave the same
intense and exaggerated and distorted imagination and
sensibility
.
H and W A, the only men deserving
the name of characters, talk so that sometimes you could not
tell which is speaking. One
very
extraordinary man is
enough. Remember, more than one principal light spoils a
picture. If there be two extraordinary men, they should be
utterly unlike.'
The jade! She was determined not to leave me a chance
of escape. That observation tore up the ground-work of all
I had ever written.
`They should be utterly unlike. So of woman.
Any
very
marked character is still more rare among them. We
complain
of Scott's heroines as insipid. What are most real
women
?
A man of great sense and knowledge of the world once
said to my motherIt is not their faultsit is their insipidity.
They have neither sense to be right nor passion to be wrong.
This, like all
mots
, is an exaggeration. They
have
sense
enough to avoid gross errors generally, and to keep to
traditional
maxims of conduct, and they have passion enough to
`fall in love,' as they call it, with any decent man who pays
them attention and can maintain them in the style they are
accustomed to. But enough of this. They are right and
wise in their generationwiser than the children of light
i. e. of warmth and flame.'
Ah! thought I, when I had come to this paragraphah!
but I am to see her no more. Well, well, it may be the
better for both of us.
`Youaddressing me by my
true
nameyou should
not add your power and eloquence to increase the
wretchednes
of this wretched world. Set your hot brand upon
nothing
that does not deserve it. Think of that my friend, when
I am thousands of miles offperhaps dead. We are beset
enough between the dangers and difficulties which are the
work of nature and those inherent in social institutions. I
am not a
Utilitarian
in every thing; but I am enough so, to
say, pause for God's sake, for mercy's sake, before you add
your strong voice to the cries of remorse, or of infamy, unless
you see clearly that the act is mischievous,
misery-creating
.
But you will think of this'
That I will! said I to myself. I begin to perceive the
truth now.
`
We
are bound with the iron chains of selfish hypocrisy
and prejudice; but think of our posterityI object to the
moral of R. What is it?'
I wish I could tell you, thought I.
`What is it? That a man may by a series of mere
imprudences
make himself and every body connected with him
supremely
wretched, and yet
call
himself innocent. He has no
right to think himself so. He is to be dreaded as much or more
than a villain, for the latter will not injure you unless to serve
himself. Or do you mean that it was a fatalitythat he
must
be a destroyer in spite of himself? This I should rather
object
to also; though then it would be out of the province of
novel-writing, and would be a romance, dealing in the ideal.
There is a class of novels that are the mirrors of common
society
as it is
. Insipid enough you 'll say: Yes, certainly, for
so is the original, but accurate copies. Miss Austin's are
perhaps the best.
You
cannot write so. No, I know it
you
must
write poetry. But subdue, my dear friend, the
coloring of your under characters and under incidents. You
have images of exquisite unspeakable beauty'
I began to be in good humor with my critic here.
`Treasure them and deal them out like a miser.
They will then sparkle like diamonds, as they oughtas
they do indeed but too often'
Very trueI am willing to acknowledge the truth of that
remark, said I to myself, as I read on.
`One thing more. You put yourself into every manor
woman. Do
I
not know you through all the disguises?
Byron
did so. Yes, but Byron did wrong. Shakspeare did
not. That is the way to make your readers know
you
, but
not mankind'
Equivocal, but severe enough either way.
19
`Take care of that delicate line which divides the terrible
from the disguisting, the sublime from the inflated, the
familiar
from the vulgar, the I know-not-what that is lovely,
touching
,
and sincere in what you say about women, from what
makes their cheeks tingle and their eyes quail, and what
would make prudes throw down the book. Yes, women
who could not appreciate the moral beauty and
purity
of the
sentiments would scream and shudderor act itat being
stripped and detected. Take care. You can do much good,
but do it delicately. I have thought and felt almost all that you
have said about
my
sex. But what wonder?
Your
sex
choose to have factitious creatures, puppets, hereditary
dissemblers
denying
their own nature. What wonder that we
are made falsefalse and superficial? I am one of them.
Am I? Yes, at this moment, I feel the iron in my soul.
No, it is impossible for a woman to be frank and natural. It
is destruction and infamy. I could write a volume now, for
my blood rushes to my fingersbut it would do no good.
So down and go to sleep, rebel. You'll think
I
am mad, as
mad as W A. As you please
God bless you .'
`P. S. I wonder, tremble almost, at my boldness. If I
offend you, how unhappy I shall bebut no, I
hope
not.'